Stars in the Making 
THE HARVARD BOOKS ON ASTRONOMY 
Edited by 
HARLOW SHAPLEY and BART J. BOK 
ATOMS, STARS, and NEBULAE 
Leo Goldberg and Lawrence H. Aller 
THE MILKY WAY 
Bart J. Bok and Priscilla F. Bok 
TELESCOPES AND ACCESSORIES George Z. Dimitroff and James G. Baker 
GALAXIES 
Harlow Shapley 
OUR SUN 
Donald H. Menzel 
THE STORY OF VARIABLE STARS 
Leon Campbell and Luigi Jacchia 
BETWEEN THE PLANETS 
Fletcher G. Watson 
EARTH, MOON, and PLANETS 
F. L. Whipple
Stars in 
the Making 
BY CECILIA PAYNE-GAPOSCHKIN 
Phillips Astronomer, Harvard University 
HARVARD UNIVERSITY PRESS - CAMBRIDGE - 1952
Copyright 1952 
By the President and Fellows of Harvard College 
Library of Congress Catalog Card Number 52-9378 
Printed in the United States of America
TO MY YOUNGEST SON 
PETER JOHN ARTHUR
PREFACE 
A series of lectures, delivered at the Lowell Institute in 
Boston, led to this book. The interest and stimulation of the 
audience encouraged me to put the material into more permanent form.

If any astronomer chances to read what I have written, 
he may deplore the sins of commission, but his own experience will, I hope, incline him to excuse the sins of omission, 
and the popular form in which I have expressed technical 
results.

My gratitude is due to Dr. Walter Baade for epistolary 
discussion of many problems concerning galaxies. I express 
my warm thanks to Dr. Harlow Shapley for reading and 
discussing the manuscript, and to Mr. J. D. Elder, of the 
Harvard University Press, for his editorial help and advice.

Especial thanks are due to Dr. Bart J. Bok, whose care in 
reading these chapters, interest in discussion of the problems that they expose, and generosity in providing photographs for illustration, have far overstepped the obligations 
of an editor. I am grateful also to Miss Sybil L. Chubb for her skilful typing of the manuscript.

The verse on page 151 is from James Elroy Flecker, “A New Year's Carol,” and is quoted by permission of Martin 
Secker and Warburg, Ltd., the publishers.

C. P.-G.

Contents 
INTRODUCTION 
Cosmic Evolution xi 
PART ONE 
THE PLAYERS 
1 Stars 3 
2 Dust and Atoms 30 
PART TWO 
THE SCENE 
3 Pairs of Stars 49 
A Clusters of Stars 66 
5 Systems of Stars 81 
PART THREE 
* THE DRAMA 
6 the Ages of Things 101 
7 The Evolution of Galaxies 119 
8 The Evolution of the Stars 132 
Suggestions for Further Reading 155 
Index 157 
Plates
Introduction 
Cosmic Evolution 
The man who presumes to talk of the evolution of 
the stars must needs be an optimist with a sense of humor. And 
astronomers are incorrigible optimists. They peer up through a 
turbulent ocean of atmosphere at the stars and galaxies, forever inaccessible. They speak of million-degree temperatures, of densities 
smaller than our lowest vacuum; they study light that left its source 
two hundred million years ago. From a fleeting glimpse they reconstruct a whole history.

The study of cosmic evolution is perhaps the most daring flight 
of human imagination. For the universe seems changeless. Day succeeds day, the steady rhythm of the seasons moves against the 
background of the unchanging stars. Hipparchus made a record of 
the constellations two thousand years ago, and the same figures look 
down on us today. The Dipper and Orion were as familiar to Homer 
as they are to us. The Zodiac, the path of the Sun’s march among the 
stars, was divided by the ancient Babylonians into figures whose 
very names were the forerunners of those we use. Recorded history, 
which has witnessed the change and decay of civilizations, furnishes 
no evidence, gives no hint, of changes in the nature of the stars.

And yet, as we shall see, the stars are changing. The drama of 
cosmic evolution is played out upon a stage that stretches beyond 
the limits of our vision, at a pace so slow that the span of human 
history has witnessed no action.

None the less, evidences of the drama are spread before us. We 
are like people who stand outside a movie theater, and try to reconxi
INTRODUCTION 
struct the story from a display of single “shots.” The telescope furnishes a tantalizing array of “still pictures” that show the protagonists of the cosmic drama grouped in a variety of situations and attitudes. Each “still” represents the interplay of a group of actors. We 
witness individuals in moments of crisis, and individuals that radiate 
tranquillity. Intimate scenes pass before us, groupings that reveal 
crucial moments of the drama. Stupendous mob scenes reveal the 
tendencies of stellar communities. The task of astronomy is to analyze 
the interplay of forces that has produced each situation, and to weave 
the situations into a coherent drama.

I can but present the story as I see it. I may have misinterpreted 
some of the pictures. Some crucial situations may be missing. But, 
despite the size of the stage and the slowness of the action, I seem to 
discern the main thread of the story.

The first two chapters introduce the actors. Many of the great 
stars are already familiar; but those in the supporting roles carry an 
equally important share of the action. And a host of characters, so 
minor that we recognize them only as members of a crowd, are the 
real masters of the situation.

The three chapters that follow will analyze the “still pictures”: 
first intimate situations, then stellar mob scenes, and finally the huge 
panoramas in which the whole stage is exposed to view, all characters caught at one dramatic moment.

In the three final chapters the situations are woven into a drama.

The first of them is of the nature of a prologue, which sets the stage 
by flashbacks that build up the situation. Then follows the story of 
the slow development of the great stellar communities. Last of all 
comes the analysis of the actors, great and small —the growth of 
their characters, their interplay, their ultimate fate.

The attempt to tell the story of the cosmic drama may well seem 
to call for unexampled temerity. It far outruns the critical analysis 
of single situations, and presumes to generalize from a glance at a 
few “stills” — pitifully few and inadequately recorded. Astronomy 
dares, in the words of the mystic: 
To see a world in a grain of sand 
And a heaven in a wild flower, 
Hold infinity in the palm of your hand 
And eternity in an hour.

xii
| PART ONE x 
THE PLAYERS 
T Stars 
Five thousand stars are visible to the unaided eye; 
a four-inch lens reveals over two million; and over a billion are 
accessible with the 200-inch mirror. The fainter we go, the more 
rapidly do the numbers increase. The story is told that Edward C.

Pickering, of Harvard, was describing a formula that expressed the 
number of stars brighter than any given magnitude.” One of his 
hearers remarked that the formula required two stars brighter than 
apparent magnitude —1, whereas there is only one such star — 
Sirius. “Ah!” said Pickering, “You've forgotten the sun.” Perhaps 
familiarity breeds contempt; it is easy to forget that the sun is the 
nearest of the stars, the most readily studied, the only one that can 
be kept under continuous surveillance.

The sun is a typical star, a common kind of star. A quarter million 
stars have been analyzed in some detail, and 10 percent of them 
resemble the sun; it merely happens that most of them are far away, 
and our luminary is near by. A typical specimen of the cosmic population is, so to speak, on our doorstep — giving us a superb opportunity to study the construction and habits of stars in general.

The Light of the Sun. ~ The sun is a gigantic globe of glowing 
gas, and so is every star that shines, though not one other is near 
enough to appear as a disk, even to the most powerful telescope.; 
* Magnitude is the astronomer’s measure of stellar brightness — a logarithmic scale 
in which the smaller numbers express the greater brightness. A difference of one magnitude corresponds to a ratio in brightness of 2%.

t The planets that move round the sun are distinguished from stars by the facts 
that they do show disks in the telescope, and that they do not shine by their own light — they merely reflect sunlight. All the stars that we observe, on the other hand, 
are self-luminous — they are so hot that their surfaces glow.


THE PLAYERS 
With over a hundred times the diameter of our planet, more than a 
million times its bulk, three hundred thousand times its mass, the 
sun is yet a small star and a lightweight. The dazzling surface, intolerable to the eye even at a distance of 93 million miles, many 
times brighter than the most powerful artificial light, pales in comparison to those of the hottest stars. Yet, in its degree, the sun displays the same capacities as other stars; close-ups of its face reveal 
nuances of expression that elude us at greater distances, and provide 
clues to the behavior of the other members of the cosmic population.

We take the steady dependability of sunlight for granted in 
everyday life, and not without reason. The most careful measurement has revealed only infinitesimal variations during the past halfcentury, and most of these have probably been caused by variations 
in the transparency of our own atmosphere.

The earth’s temperature is almost entirely governed by the 
amount of heat received from the sun, and the very fact that life on 
earth has existed in unbroken sequence for hundreds of millions of 
years shows that the sun has been shining steadily at least as long as 
that. The earth receives energy at the rate of 4,690,000 horsepower 
per square mile from the sun, and has been doing so for hundreds of 
millions of years, and yet our tiny planet intercepts less than two 
thousand-millionths of the sun’s radiated energy. Such numbers 
beggar the imagination.

Put in another way, the output of the sun is even more impressive.

Modern physics recognizes not only the interconvertibility of various 
forms of energy, but also the equivalence of energy and mass. The 
famous Einstein equation states that 
E = me’, 
where E is the energy in ergs, m the mass in grams, and c the speed 
of light, 3 X 10'° centimeters, or about 186,000 miles, per second.* 
* The gram is the physicist’s unit of mass, the mass of a cubic centimeter of water under standard conditions: 1000 grams = 2.205 Ib, or 1 gram = 0.03527 oz avoirdupois = 0.08215 oz troy. An erg is the amount of energy required to lift 1/980 gram of matter one centimeter — a very small unit. About 40 million ergs equal one calorie (the amount of heat required to raise-the temperature of 1 gram of water under 
standard conditions by 1 centigrade degree).


STARS 
In the sense of this equation, light has weight just as matter does.

The sun pours four million tons of radiant energy into space every 
second, and if (as we believe) this has been going on for at least 
a hundred million years, more than 10,000,000,000,000,000,000,000 
(or 10”) tons of light and heat have issued from our luminary in a 
steady stream! Large as the figure is, it represents less than one 
millionth of the total mass of the sun. As we shall see, the sun is 
actually converting its own substance into radiant energy. But it 
draws upon less than one million-millionth of its material capital a 
year — a very modest expenditure. Many stars are far more prodigal 
of their resources.

The Surface of the Sun. ~ The sun’s steady output suggests tranquillity, but its surface is far from quiescent. Dark spots on it are 
often visible to the naked eye, and a completely unspotted sun is extremely rare (Plate 1). Closer scrutiny reveals a continually changing fine granulation over the entire disk. The sun’s face is not a 
smooth unrufled sea of gas, but a heaving, churning expanse, with 
whirling tornadoes (sunspots) that break through from below, 
tongues of gas (spicules) that surge up and subside, clouds of glowing vapor (prominences) that float, swirl, and erupt high above the 
surface, and sudden localized blazes of intensely brilliant radiation 
(flares) (Plate 4). On the sun these things can be seen; on the stars 
they can only be surmised or indirectly observed, but we can be sure 
that they are often even more spectacular than on the sun.

The whole surface of the sun — flares, granulations, even sunspots — glows with intense brilliance. A complete array of color * is 
present, from x-rays through the visible spectrum to radio waves, 
and perhaps it is no coincidence that the sun shines most brightly in 
the colors to which our eyes are sensitive. The fact that the sun is 
brightest in the yellow-green gives a clue to the temperature of its 
radiating surface. Common experience tells that the hotter a glowing 
surface, the bluer is the light by which it shines; and the quantitative 
formulation of this fact (Wien’s law) enables us to say that the 
* Light is only a small section of the spectrum of electromagnetic radiation.

X-rays, ultraviolet rays, light, infrared, microwaves, radio waves are all of the same nature, differ only in the length of the wave.


THE PLAYERS 
radiating surface of the sun has a temperature of about 6000°C 
(11,000°F ). And this is true whatever the sun is made of.

The Composition of the Sun. — The brightness of the sun is not 
distributed among all colors with unbroken brilliance. When sunlight is passed through a prism, and spread into the artificial rainbow 
known as the spectrum, some colors are seen to be greatly depleted.

The rainbow is broken up into an array of sharply bounded regions 
of color, separated by others, far less brilliant (the “Fraunhofer 
lines”). Something has robbed the sunlight of these colors, and the 
atoms above the solar surface have been convicted as the culprits 
(Plate 18).

Each atom has its own characteristic array of colors, and it can 
take up or give out these colors only, absorbing or emitting energy 
as it does so. The distribution of the colors in sunlight, and our 
knowledge of the behavior of atoms on earth, make possible a chemical analysis of the sun’s surface, actually more delicate than we 
could perform in the laboratory if we had a chunk of the sun given 
us to analyze.” The results of the analysis show that the sun is 
made of the familiar chemical elements known on earth.

The matching of characteristic colors led at first to a qualitative 
analysis, and showed that all known atoms with spectrum lines in 
the accessible region of the sun ¢ are represented in its spectrum.

A few simple compounds, such as cyanogen, are found, but most of 
the material is in the form of isolated atoms. In other words, the 
spectrum shows that the outer layers of the sun are completely 
gaseous. One can go further: the array of colors characteristic of an 
atom varies with temperature, and so the temperature of the lowlying atmosphere of the sun, which produces the Fraunhofer lines, 
can be determined; it agrees fairly well with the temperature inferred from the color of sunlight.

Growing knowledge of the physics of spectra has actually made 
it possible not only to identify the atoms above the sun’s surface, but 
* This is because of the great depth of the layer of atoms above the sun’s surface, 
and the vast number accordingly available for the analysis. A large number of 
spectrum lines, only predictable on earth, can actually be observed in the spectrum of the sun! 
+ Molecules in the atmosphere of the earth, especially those of ozone, oxygen, 
and water vapor, obscure some parts of the sun’s spectrum almost completely.


STARS 
to count them. The sun, we find, is mainly hydrogen; there are more 
atoms of hydrogen, lightest and simplest of atoms, than of all other 
kinds put together. Next in order comes the second lightest atom, 
helium, and, with some notable exceptions, the numbers of heavier, 
more complex atoms fall off steadily in order of complexity.

This scheme of chemical composition is not peculiar to the sun.

It is typical of the composition of the whole cosmos, not only the 
stars, but also the loose gas and dust that pervade interstellar space.

The atomic makeup of all stars is not identical — and the differences, 
small as they are, may be of great significance — but the general 
uniformity is amazing, and it would be difficult to point with confidence to any cosmic object that does not consist mainly of hydrogen.

The Sun’s Surface. —Each atom has its characteristic array of 
colors, and a photograph of the sun in a single color records the 
atoms of one kind by themselves. Luckily the sun is so bright that 
even a very restricted range of color can be photographed, either 
with the instrument known as a spectroheliograph or by an ingenious 
arrangement of light filters. Pictures of the sun made by the light of 
calcium or hydrogen show not only increased detail, but revealingly 
different detail (Plate 3). Whereas a direct photograph, in light of 
all colors, shows only dark sunspots and vague granulations, calcium 
light reveals brilliant variegations in the neighborhood of the sunspots, and greatly accentuates the contrast of the granulation. Even 
before a sunspot swirls through the surface, bright calcium “flocculi” 
herald its presence; and they remain for some time to mark the 
place after the spot has died away. The bright areas shown by the 
calcium atoms reflect the greater disturbances, more violent motions, and probably hotter regions, near the tornadoes that are sunspots.

Hydrogen poses are more difficult to take, because hydrogen does 
not cut so wide a swath in the spectrum as calcium, and less light is 
available for the photograph. This may seem surprising, for there is 
much more hydrogen than calcium above the sun’s surface; but it is 
a consequence of the idiosyncrasies of the two kinds of atoms. At 
the sun’s temperature nearly all the calcium atoms are in the right 
state to emit light, but the atom of hydrogen is more recalcitrant, 

THE PLAYERS 
and is only about one-millionth as prone to emit as calcium at 
6000°C. Hydrogen atoms are more than ten thousand times as common as atoms of calcium, but even so, the lines they produce in the 
spectrum of the sun are less than one-hundredth as intense.

Photographs in hydrogen light (Plate 4) show the disturbed 
regions near sunspots, but with less brilliance, because of the difficulty of stimulating the atoms. Both the hydrogen and the calcium 
photographs reveal slowly changing patterns of dark filaments silhouetted against the bright surface of the sun. The filaments are not 
really dark; they seem so only by contrast. When one of them extends beyond the sun’s edge it is seen as a glowing prominence — a 
great cloud of gas poised above the surface (Plate 5). Some prominences are so brilliant that they show up as bright streaks, even 
against the face of the sun.

Prominences are protean in form (Plates 6 and 7), and have an 
infinite variety of motions. Some hang poised over the surface. Some 
spurt upward, in filamentary surges, like geysers, and seem to dissipate into space. Some rise and fall like fountains. But a surprising 
majority shower downward, not upward, and many give the impression of being sucked into a point at the surface.

We are far from understanding the motions of prominences.

Some are associated with sunspots, but many are not. The variegated 
brilliance of the sun’s surface may affect them. Electric forces may 
be of importance; magnetic forces probably play a crucial role.

Whatever be the significant factors in producing the protean variety 
of solar prominences, they are important also in stars of very different kinds. For, as we shall see, prominence activity is characteristic 
of many stars, and often on a scale that makes the sun’s activities 
seem puny.

Whether or not the motions of prominences are governed by 
magnetic forces, very intense magnetic fields are observed on the 
sun. The spectrum of a sunspot tells the story, through the medium 
of the spectra of the individual atoms in the tornado. An atom in a 
magnetic field absorbs and radiates in a special way; its peculiar 
series of colors subdivides into an intricate pattern, and the stronger 
the magnetic field, the more is the subdivision accentuated. The 
sunspot behaves like a tremendous electromagnet, many thousand 

STARS 
miles across; no doubt electrically charged particles, whirling around 
the axis of the tornado, play the part of the current in the electromagnet, and a powerful magnetic field is produced along the axis of 
the spot. Sunspots, like prominences, are incompletely understood, 
but that they possess magnetic fields of several thousand gauss * is 
certain. Large as such fields are, even larger magnetic fields are 
found for certain peculiar stars as a whole; and like many sunspots, 
they reverse their polarity at regular intervals.

The times when sunspots are thickly scattered over the sun’s face 
are marked by striking events nearer home. The Aurorae, the Northern Lights, gleam and shimmer in the sky. Magnetic storms disrupt 
communications and intrude on radio programs. The disturbances 
that produce spots on the sun have direct effects on our planet.

Disturbed areas of the sun are showering particles into space at 
high speeds, and a rain of electrons, protons, and even heavier particles pours down into our atmosphere. An electrically charged 
shower plays upon the atoms and molecules of the upper air, and 
excites the auroral glow. Oxygen in the high atmosphere emits its 
peculiar red and green light; molecules of nitrogen and other substances contribute their characteristic colors. The spectrum of the 
rain of solar hydrogen has recently been photographed by Meinel.

The earth receives showers of particles that left the sun a few hours + 
ago. Even more significant: the sun is continually spraying matter 
into space. Many stars, as we shall see, are doing the same.

Prominences are not the only features that rise above the sun’s 
bright edge. At the crucial moment of a total eclipse, when the 
moon’s disk cuts off the body of the sun, a brilliant rim of rosy light 
—the chromosphere — appears around it. The spectrum of the 
chromosphere shows that it consists of radiating atoms, the same 
atoms that were revealed by the Fraunhofer lines in a layer nearer 
the sun’s surface, but with a difference. The pattern of colors that 
they radiate is modified in a way that admits of but one explanation 
— the temperature of the chromosphere, from five to ten thousand 
* The gauss is the unit of magnetic field. The magnetic field of the earth, which 
affects the compass, is small — a fraction of a gauss.

+ The particles travel at 125 to 625 miles a second, and make the trip from sun 
to earth in from 200 to 40 hours.


THE PLAYERS 
miles above the solar surface, is more than three times the temperature of the atoms that produce the absorption spectrum of the sun! 
Even helium, which is far more refractory than hydrogen, and requires a far higher temperature to excite it, appears not only in 
normal form, but even in the “ionized” condition, with one electron 
torn away —a situation found only at the surfaces of the hottest 
stars, at temperatures of over 30,000°C, 
The chromosphere consists of a sort of hairy rim of tiny spicules, 
or jets, which spurt upward and disappear in a few minutes. The 
spicules may be related to the minute granules that pepper the face 
of the sun, and seem equally short-lived.

Other stars than the sun possess chromospheres, and with some 
of them, unlike the sun, the chromosphere is far larger than the star 
itself, and shines so brilliantly that the glowing atoms in the spectrum produce bright spectrum lines on the background of the star’s 
light. Some chromospheres are poised, like the sun’s, above the star's 
surface, with little motion. The shining atoms around other stars are 
flowing or spurting steadily outward, and some stars occasionally 
blow great chromospheric bubbles, which thin out gradually and 
dissipate into space.

Outside the chromosphere of the sun gleam the pearly streamers 
of the corona (Plate 8), which extend to distances comparable to 
the size of the sun itself. Like the chromosphere, the corona has a 
spectrum given by glowing atoms, but for many years its nature was 
a mystery. No such colors had been produced by any atoms on earth, 
and they used to be ascribed to a mysterious substance, coronium, 
that was unknown elsewhere. Now we know, from the work of the 
Swedish physicist Edlén, that the corona consists of well-known, 
common elements (such as iron, calcium, and nickel) but under 
conditions that represent temperatures never attained on earth 
(Plate 9). The corona — the “iron crown” of the sun — seems to be 
at a temperature of about a million degrees! 
Other stars, too, have coronas, and some of them are intensely 
brilliant. The spectral colors of the sun’s iron crown have been 
found in the light of certain peculiar stars that have suffered sudden 
explosion.

Perhaps the most remarkable thing about the outer regions of 

STARS 
the sun is the increasing temperature of successive outward layers.

The reversing layer and the photosphere * have temperatures of 
about 6000°; the chromosphere is at about 20,000°; and the corona, 
at 1,000,000°. The sunspots, which look like depressions in the solar 
surface, are even cooler than the reversing layer; their spectra and 
colors point to a temperature not far from 4000°.

The remarkable temperature stratification of the sun is not an 
isolated phenomenon. Other stars show it, and some of them display 
an even greater span of conditions. If we did not know that the sun 
is a single star, the variety of its spectra might tempt us to doubt; 
other stars whose spectra look as though they must be complex may 
be similarly put together.

The Sun's Rotation. — From the human point of view, the most 
important thing about the sun is the fact that it has planets, and that 
one of them presents physico-chemical conditions favorable to life.

But from the standpoint of the sun, all the planets are negligible: 
even Jupiter, the largest, weighs less than one thousand as much as 
our luminary. Within the planetary system, Jupiter is the only really 
influential member; it is the most potent factor, for example, in governing the motions of the comets and asteroids, the lesser members 
of the system. In one respect, Jupiter excels even the sun: the giant 
planet possesses most of the total energy of rotation of the solar 
system — far more than the sun itself. True, the sun is spinning, but 
spinning very slowly. It takes nearly a month to make one complete 
turn. This fact has always been one of the great difficulties in the 
path of a theory of the origin of the solar system; almost all the 
theories that have been moderately successful in other ways seem to 
require that the sun possess the greater part of the energy of rotation of the whole.

The slow spinning of the sun is far from being unusual. Most 
stars that resemble the sun in size and temperature are also turning 
slowly on their axes. Some stars, it is true, spin very rapidly, but 
these are usually the massive stars of high temperature. Stars such 
as the sun rotate rapidly only when constrained to do so by being 
* The photosphere, or “sphere of light,” is the glowing surface of the sun; the 
reversing layer is the atmosphere of absorbing atoms that lies above it. Temperatures, here and later, are given on the centigrade scale.


THE PLAYERS 
members of twin systems; they raise huge tides in each other and 
always stay face to face. Any star that spins rapidly is distorted into 
a spheroid; even the solid or semisolid planets like the earth, Jupiter, 
and Saturn are more or less flattened at the poles by rotation. Jupiter 
looks like an orange, even in a small telescope. But the sun is so 
nearly spherical that no polar flattening has ever been detected.

Slowly as the sun rotates, it still does so in a remarkable manner: 
it spins faster at the equator than at the poles, so that its surface 
must be in a state of shear — that is, some parts of the surface must 
continually be slipping past others. Possibly the differential rotation 
plays some part in producing sunspot vortexes. And if even the 
slowly turning sun spins faster at the equator than at the poles, what 
of the stars that turn on themselves in a few hours, and are highly 
distorted? What, too, of the internal rotation of the sunP We can see 
the surface only; and a different internal rate of rotation is not only 
possible but likely. A star that turns very slowly will probably not 
churn up its interior and mix its constituents; but one that is spinning fast may be much better mixed. The degree of mixing of the 
materials within a star may well be a crucial factor in its history.

The Sun’s Interior. — Which brings us to the problem of the sun’s 
interior. So far we have spoken only of the parts of the sun that can 
be seen, a mere skin. Conditions within are very different. Without 
going beyond the elementary laws of physics, it can be shown that 
the sun, and all other stars, are gaseous not only at the surface, but 
all the way through. Moreover, both temperature and pressure must 
necessarily rise toward the center.

In fact, it is well known that the central temperature of a star 
must depend essentially on its size and mass, and is proportional to 
the average mass of the individual particles of which it consists.

This average mass of the particles, the so-called “mean molecular 
weight,” would be least for a star that was all made of hydrogen, 
and would increase somewhat — but not very much — with larger 
proportions of heavier elements. The reason for this rather surprising statement is that the interiors of the stars are so hot that atoms 
are stripped of nearly all their electrons. Each electron counts as one 
particle in the average mass of the individual particles, and the 
masses of electrons are negligible, even in comparison with those 

STARS 
of the nuclei * of hydrogen, lightest of elements. In units of the 
hydrogen nucleus, a star all of hydrogen would have a “mean molecular weight” of 44; if the star were all helium, whose nucleus weighs 
four times as much as hydrogen, and which can part with two electrons, the average molecular weight would be 4%, or 1.83; even if 
the stars were all uranium (92 electrons, atomic weight 238 times 
hydrogen), the mean molecular weight would only be 2°93, or 2.55.

As most stars consist mainly of hydrogen, the mean molecular weight 
will usually be between % and 114; and the central temperature, for 
stars of the same mass and size but different composition, will therefore not differ by a factor of more than 2 or 3.

If, in addition to size and mass, the total energy output (luminosity) of a star is known, the same elementary theory permits the 
calculation of the mean molecular weight, which can be fitted by a 
certain number of different combinations of hydrogen, helium, and 
heavier elements.

The sun is found to have a central temperature near to 18 million 
degrees; and the temperature almost certainly increases steadily 
from the surface inward. Thus we have the odd paradox that the 
sun is actually coolest at the surface, or even a little below it, in the 
cores of the sunspots, and the temperature goes up again as we pass 
outward through the chromosphere to the corona.

High temperature and enormous pressure prevail within the sun.

The high temperature is responsible for the fact that the sun’s substance behaves like an ideal gas, even at the center; it strips the 
atoms of their attendant electrons, resolves them into fragments far 
smaller than at the surface, and permits them to pack more closely 
without violating the laws that govern the behavior of gases.

The Sun's Source of Energy. — The hot interior of the sun is the 
source of its light and heat. At 18 million degrees the atoms are able 
to interact, to convert some of their substance into energy. No other 
source is adequate to have produced the tremendous outpouring, 
steady over millions of years. The source of the sun’s energy was 
* Atoms, so named because they were once thought to be indivisible, are complex 
bodies, Most of their mass resides in the central core, or nucleus, around which hovers 
a haze of electrons. These electrons give the atom its chemical properties, and most of its physical properties also.


THE PLAYERS 
long a puzzle. Combustion, chemical reaction, gravitational contraction, the drawing of energy from the environment, all were 
shown to be hopelessly inadequate. Nuclear energy seemed the only 
avenue of salvation, long before the details of the actual process 
were understood. “Does energy issue freely from matter,” speculated 
Eddington a quarter of a century ago, “at 40 million degrees as steam 
issues from water at 100 degrees?” 
Modern nuclear physics provides an affirmative answer. The 
actual processes have been observed in the laboratory. The interior 
of the sun liberates energy by a catalytic action similar to those of 
atomic chemistry; but the reactants are the naked nuclei, not atoms 
clad in their haze of electrons. Hans Bethe and C. F. von Weisziacker 
discovered independently, nearly at the same time, that hydrogen 
cores combine, by a chain of reactions set off by carbon nuclei; four 
hydrogens interlock to produce a helium core. The helium is lighter 
than the sum of the hydrogens by about 0.7 percent, and this deficiency of mass is turned into energy, which passes from the interior 
to the surface in a steady flow. Only at temperatures between 15 
and 20 million degrees can the reaction produce enough energy to 
supply the sun. The rate of production varies as about the eighteenth 
power of the temperature, and most of the sun’s energy accordingly 
issues from its substance in the central region where the temperature 
is highest. At 15 million degrees the “light” given out resembles 
x-rays (even more “violet” than ultraviolet light); it flows outward, 
passed from hand to hand, so to speak, by the electrons and atoms 
of the overlying layers, and is steadily “reddened” in the process so 
that when it reaches the surface the observable color is primarily 
yellow-green. * 
The sun shines by feeding on its own substance, and its diet is 
exceedingly simple. So far as we know, our luminary subsists entirely 
upon hydrogen. The same food sustains the other stars; stellar infants may possibly have a somewhat different diet, but their infancy is brief, if only because foods other than hydrogen are in short 
* Actually the sun’s surface gives out a surprising amount of radiation of very 
short wavelength, far more than would be expected if its light were distributed accord- ing to the elementary laws of radiation by a so-called “black body” (a technical term, 
which sounds rather paradoxical, and denotes a surface that absorbs and radiates ideally according to certain laws that are deducible from quantum theory.) 

STARS 
supply. Digestive processes may differ somewhat from one kind of 
star to another. If the temperature is well below 15 million degrees, 
the cycle catalyzed by carbon may be replaced by others, such as 
the direct combination of protons (hydrogen nuclei) to form helium 
— the “proton-proton” reaction. The food remains the same; hydrogen is consumed and helium is left behind.

Although the sun has been steadily digesting its own interior for 
tens, and even for thousands, of millions of years, it still consists 
almost entirely of hydrogen, enough to keep things going at the 
present rate for at least an equal interval. Most other stars are equally 
rich in the vital substance, and have an equally bright future. In 
fact, paradoxically enough, the future of stars that are consuming 
hydrogen is even brighter than their past. For the brightness of a 
star of given size and mass depends primarily on the mean molecular 
weight of its substance. As the hydrogen supply slowly falls, the 
mean molecular weight gradually increases, and the star grows a 
little brighter, so long as it does not drastically alter its internal 
arrangements.

The great astronomer Eddington showed, even before the actual 
process of stellar nutrition was identified, that the more massive a 
star is, the more energy does it pour out. The energy output of a 
star of given composition is, in fact, proportional to something between the cube and the fourth power of its mass. The greater majority of the stars whose masses are known conform to this rule (the 
“mass-luminosity law”) fairly closely. Most of the differences are 
within the limits that would be expected from the possible range of 
mean molecular weight with composition — a range that was shown 
earlier to involve a factor not greater than two or three. But some 
stars, as we shall see later, are nonconformists, and they are important finger posts for theories of stellar evolution.

If a star’s luminosity (which can be expressed in terms of tons 
of radiation per second for all stars, just as for the sun) were simply 
proportional to its mass, all stars of similar composition would have 
the same life expectancy. But a star much more massive than the 
sun is consuming itself much faster. A star of twice the mass is twelve 
times as prolific; at ten times the mass the factor is over a thousand, 
and at a hundred times the mass of the sun a star would be well over 

THE PLAYERS 
a million times as prodigal, and its life expectancy a million times 
shorter. The total life of a star like the sun (in the style to which we 
are accustomed) is about 5000 million years; if there were stars a 
hundred times as massive, their active lives would be reckoned in 
thousands rather than in millions of years, and they must become 
effectively bankrupt during an interval over which the sun can radiate with virtually unchanging brightness.

Such bankrupt stars actually exist. They can be recognized by 
the fact that their brightness is far lower than we should expect 
from the mass-luminosity law. Their light is feeble; they have exhausted their internal nuclear resources, have spent all their available hydrogen, and exist only on their very limited gravitational 
capital.* Such a destiny probably awaits all stars, but for most of 
them it lies in the far future. Even for the sun we see it as inevitable.

The sun, indeed, holds a mirror to the cosmos. Like all other 
stars it is a globe of glowing gas, hotter and denser within. Its surface 
is a seething, surging sea of atoms. Plumes of gas float above it; 
glowing filaments surge upward; shining fountains cascade downward. Giant tornadoes swirl through the surface. Spicules rise and 
dissipate like darting flames. Dazzling flares blaze up and vanish.

A brilliant chromosphere rings it; and around it gleams the aura of 
the corona. Powerful magnetic forces play across the surface; atoms 
and electrons spray into space. As it spins on its axis the equator 
pulls steadily ahead; and across its face proceeds the slow rhythm of 
the sunspot cycle, waxing and waning every eleven years. The spectacle is impressive in itself. As the mirror of the cosmos it is stupendous. Other stars are doing the same things, and these stellar habits 
are the clue to their history.

The sun is made of hydrogen, “with a smell of other substances,” + 
and so are most other stars. The steady consumption of hydrogen 
keeps it shining; most stars are sustained in no other way. Wherever 
we look in the cosmos we see the play of the same forces, the march 
of the same phenomena — but often on a scale that makes the sun 
seem puny. Let us turn to the stars, and compare the other members 
of the caste with the player whom we brought first upon the stage.

* A star can convert gravitational energy into light and heat by contracting in size.

t Rosseland.


STARS 
Orion and the Dog Stars. — The constellations come down to us 
from remote antiquity. The very names by which we call Orion, the 
mighty hunter, and the Dog Star, Sirius, are the ones by which 
Homer knew them. They shine in the winter sky, beside the Milky 
Way, Orion resplendent with belt and sword, the Great Dog at his 
side, the Lesser Dog behind.

Sirius, the Dog Star, is by far the brightest in the night sky. Its 
brilliance is deceptive, a consequence of its being one of the nearest 
stars to us, but it is nevertheless among the brighter stars, about 
forty times as bright as the sun.* It is about twice as large, weighs 
about twice as much, and is nearly twice as hot at the surface. Stars 
like Sirius are fairly common (though less so than stars like the 
sun); Vega, for example, has about the same size, brightness, weight, 
and temperature.

Sirius has, however, a distinction that Vega lacks; it is attended 
by another much fainter star, sometimes irreverently called “the 
Pup” (Fig. 1). The two move around one another in elliptical orbits 
under their mutual gravitational pull. The “Pup” is about as massive 
as the sun and rather hotter at the surface, but it is a little more than 
3 percent of the size, and only about 2 percent as bright. Here is a 
flagrant exception to the rule that the luminosity of a star depends 
on its mass; if the “Pup” conformed to the mass-luminosity law it 
would be over fifty times as bright as it is. The “Pup,” in fact, is a 
stellar bankrupt that has consumed all the available hydrogen fuel, 
and seems to be shining only by dint of slowly shrinking, and thus 
converting gravitational energy into light. Although it weighs nearly 
as much as the sun, it has only about one twenty-five-thousandth of 
the volume, and its substance is so closely packed that @ cubic inch 
of it would weigh a ton. Amazingly enough, it is nonetheless gaseous 
throughout — composed of matter in the so-called degenerate state, 
incapable of yielding energy except by contraction. This star, more 
formally named the “companion of Sirius,” was the first stellar 
* Sirius does not, of course, look forty times as bright as the sun to us, because it 
is so much farther away. If it were placed where the sun is, its light would seem to us forty times as brilliant as the sun’s. In comparing the brightness, or luminosity, of 
stars, an astronomer lines them up, in imagination, all at the same distance, and states 
how their luminosities would compare. The brightness at a standard distance is known 
as the absolute luminosity or the absolute magnitude.


THE PLAYERS 
bankrupt to be discovered, and is one of the nearest and best observed of this group of stars, which are known as the “white dwarfs.” 
Amazing as its character is, the companion of Sirius is far from 
unique. Among the twenty-five stars nearest to the sun (and hence 
to us) there are three white dwarfs, and only one star like Sirius. Almost two hundred white dwarfs are known, largely through the work 
of Luyten. If we make due allowance for the fact that white dwarfs 
Fig. 1, Sitius and its companion, drawn to scale. The shaded circle represents the sun on the same scale. In this and the other figures, shading ts used to denote temperature: the more heavily 
shaded is the star, the lower its temperature.

are faint, inconspicuous, and hard to find, we realize that they may 
well be five or even ten times as common as stars like Sirius. They 
may even be commoner in our part of the cosmos than stars like the 
sun. Sirius is actually a more exceptional star than its faint attendant, 
even though its properties may seem to us less fantastic. In attempting to put together the story of stellar development, the white 
dwarfs, amazing as their properties are, must be assigned essential 
parts in the drama.

Procyon, the Little Dog Star, is intermediate between the sun 
and Sirius in size, mass, brightness, and temperature, somewhat 

STARS 
closer to the sun in all these characters. It, too, has a white-dwarf 
companion, even smaller and fainter than the “Pup” — so faint, indeed, that we cannot portray it in nearly as much detail. A third 
nearby white dwarf, called “van Maanen’s star” after its discoverer, 
is apparently a single star; it also is smaller and fainter than the 
companion of Sirius, with one seven-thousandth of the diameter of 
the sun, one ten-thousandth of its brightness. The smallest white 
dwarf known is about as large as the planet Mercury; most of them 
are between the earth and the planet Uranus in size. We shall meet 
the white dwarfs again in describing “still pictures” of stellar situations.

Stellar bankruptcies are so common that the circumstances leading to them must be of a very usual kind; we must inquire whether 
there is any way out from stellar insolvency. That, however, is part 
of the drama; in the present chapter we are but introducing the 
characters.

Sirius looks bright because it is fairly near to us, but most of the 
naked-eye stars in Orion are far brighter. Alnitam, “the Chain of 
Pearls,” the central star of the giant’s belt (Plates 10 and 11), is at 
least six hundred times as bright as the sun,* four times as hot at the 
surface, ten times as large, and perhaps twenty times as massive.

Alnitam is typical of the blue stars in Orion; a number of these are 
twin systems. Even hotter are some of the little knot of stars that 
form the central star of Orion’s sword, the famous “Trapezium,” of 
which eight stars are visible, and some at least of these are themselves twin systems. The stars of the Trapezium are so hot that they 
excite a glow in the surrounding clouds of gas, the “Great Nebula in 
Orion” (Plate 23).

Still hotter and more brilliant are the members of a mighty pair 
of stellar twins in Canis Major, the Great Dog—UW Canis 
Majoris,+ one of the brightest naked-eye eclipsing stars (Fig. 4).

Perhaps five times the sun’s temperature, thirty times its size, over 
twenty times as massive, and more than ten thousand times as 
* Here, and elsewhere, I refer to the true or absolute juminosity of the star — the 
brightness it would appear to have if it were at the same distance from us as the sun.

+ Like many thousands of other stars, this one varies in brightness. Such stars need distinctive names, which are assigned by attaching one or more letters to the Latin 
name of the constellation in which they tie.


THE PLAYERS 
bright, these are conspicuous actors in the drama of stellar development. But though they obtrude themselves upon us by their brilliance, such stars are very uncommon; for every one of them we find 
a thousand Siriuses, a hundred thousand suns.

Supergiant Stars. — Equally brilliant is the blue star Rigel at the 
giant’s heel (Plates 10 and 11). It is about 20,000 times as bright as 
the sun, somewhat hotter than Sirius, and a great deal larger — 
perhaps fifteen times the size of the Dog Star. Here we have a star 
with an immense chromosphere, fitfully lighted up by something 
akin to prominences, and prominences so brilliant that the light of 
their hydrogen atoms shows up even against the background of the 
brilliant stellar surface. The delicate detail of the atomic lines shows 
that the atmosphere of Rigel is far more tenuous than the sun’s. The 
mass of Rigel is unknown to us, but it can scarcely be less than forty 
times the sun’s. And as Rigel is 20,000 times as luminous as the sun, 
and pours out about 80,000 million tons of light a second, it is 
wasting its substance 500 times as fast, and has a life expectancy 
proportionally smaller. If the sun’s probable lifetime is 5000 million 
years, that of Rigel is only 10 million. In other words, if it had been 
shining for 10 million years, it would be bankrupt now. Rigel is very 
far from bankrupt; it is one of the more conspicuous stellar prodigals.

We can but conclude that it is less than 10 million years of age.

Across the constellation from Rigel, the brilliant Betelgeuse 
flickers with a ruddy light (Plates 10 and 11). Halfway between 
Vega and Rigel in brightness, it is far cooler than either, with a 
surface temperature about one-half the sun’s. It is one of the largest 
stars, about three hundred times the sun’s size, less than a millionth 
of the sun’s density. The light of Betelgeuse is inconstant; probably 
this tenuous star is vibrating, half-rhythmically, changing in size, 
possibly even in shape, as it does so. But despite its tenuity, Betelgeuse is a star, condensed at the center, cohering under gravity. Perhaps it has the body of a star comparable to Alnitam, surrounded by 
an enormously distended cool chromosphere. Churning motions can 
be detected in the envelope of Betelgeuse, and the light of calcium 
prominences appears in its spectrum. We may picture the solar 
prominences on a greatly expanded scale, interlacing to obscure 
completely the true surface of the star within.


STARS 
Stars like Rigel and Betelgeuse are extraordinarily infrequent, so 
much so that we might be justified in leaving them out altogether 
in an attempt to delineate the normal stellar life history. They differ 
from most stars in prodigality of output; they are above the average 
in mass, they must be below the average in age. Superficially they 
differ enormously, but both seem to have exaggerated chromospheres — a feature often shown by stellar prodigals. They do not 
differ from the general run of stars in kind ~ only in degree.

Variable Stars. — Above the giant’s shoulder is an inconspicuous 
star, U Orionis, one of the numerous group known as long-period 
variables. It is nearly as large as Betelgeuse, and rather cooler at the 
surface. Its brightness does not flicker irregularly, but appears to the 
eye to fluctuate rhythmically. About once a year it brightens by a 
factor of over a hundred.® At its brightest U Orionis is about onetenth as bright as Betelgeuse, which makes it still a hundred times 
as bright as the sun. Almost certainly it performs a rhythmic vibration, or pulsation, as it fades and brightens. Details of its spectrum 
show that it is surrounded by a tenuous envelope of cool gases, 
such as we pictured for Betelgeuse; but the envelope is not so 
opaque as to conceal brilliant radiations of hydrogen and other 
atoms, which are most clearly seen as the star is brightening, and 
suggest a sort of inner chromosphere at a much higher temperature.

We have more than a suspicion that the rhythm of the star’s variation 
is accompanied by intermittent spurts and streams of atoms into 
the surrounding space, something like what happens on the sun, 
but on a far more gigantic scale. Like the sun, U Orionis displays 
a wider range of conditions than might be expected at the surface of 
one star. The spectrum gives evidence of chemical compounds, such 
as the oxides of titanium and zirconium (only possible at quite low 
temperatures), and of bright lines of hydrogen (expected at 
temperatures three times as high). When the star is faint, it is seen 
to be surrounded by a sort of nebula of iron atoms — iron under conditions of extreme diffuseness, probably a cloud of iron vapor that 
* The change of brightness is real, but as seen by the eye it is illusory; the star grows cooler as it grows fainter and the maximum of light passes toward the infrared, out of the visible range. The real change of brightness in all colors together is by a factor of about two.


THE PLAYERS 
drifts off into space. Similar radiations are observed in the neighborhood of exploding stars, and cannot (so far as we know) appear save 
at considerable distances from the stellar surface.

Long-period variables are something of an enigma: but it is an 
enigma to which the sun provides a clue. A distended sun, rhythmically pulsating, with exaggerated chromosphere and enormous 
prominence activity, might add up to something that looked very 
like U Orionis.

In another constellation lies a star that carries the same enigma 
even further — the variable star Z Andromedae. Here again is a star 
that varies in brightness with fair regularity. Sometimes it brightens 
only slightly, at other times enormously, and with explosive violence, 
but always with a regular rhythm of about three years. Here again 
we find spectra of chemical compounds, clues to low temperature; 
here again we see an amazing variable bright-line spectrum, indicative of very high temperature indeed. The color of the star becomes 
bluer as it brightens, which it sometimes does with spectacular 
suddenness and range. The various spectra indicate a span of conditions from something like the surface of Betelgeuse, with a 
temperature near 3000°, to a state comparable to that of the solar 
corona, with a temperature of a million degrees.

The stars like Z Andromedae (for it represents a sizeable group) 
have conventionally been considered to be double—a cool star 
mated with a hot, explosive one. But almost all the ingredients are 
present in the sun. Intermittent, brilliant flares, and a very bright 
chromosphere and corona, could conspire to add up to just such a 
picture. A few features, not present in the sun, might be attributed 
to the far more tenuous stellar envelope. Some of the stars of this 
peculiar “symbiotic” group, if regarded as doubles, would be influencing each other’s changes in a manner hard to picture; a single 
star with a great span of physical conditions presents fewer difficulties: and we actually know of such a star — the sun itself.

Other pulsating stars lie within the confines of Orion. They seem 
faint, for they are very distant, but the faintest of them is nearly a 
hundred times as bright as the sun. Some (the so-called RR Lyrae 
stars) vibrate rapidly, growing bright and dim with a regular rhythm 
of less than a day. Others vibrate once in a few days; pulsing variable 

STARS 
stars are indeed found with periods all the way from a couple of 
hours to several years.

Some stars that vary in brightness do so because of periodic 
eclipses; but we are not now concerned with these. The vibrating 
stars are single, and possess a regular rhythm that is governed by 
their condition. The more luminous, the more diffuse is a star, the 
slower is its rhythm (or the longer its period). The rate is known to 
be closely associated with the star's density.

The rapidly varying pulsating stars (RR Lyrae stars, with periods 
less than a day) are little larger than the sun, though twice as hot 
and nearly a hundred times as bright. Stars that pulsate in periods 
between a day and fifty days (Cepheids) are from ten to a hundred 
times the size of the sun, from a hundred to ten thousand times as 
bright. Even more slowly than the Cepheids pulsate the long-period 
variables like U Orionis.

Variable stars seem less inhibited than the sun; they vibrate 
freely, and seem to spray atoms around them as they do so. The sun, 
if it executes vibrations of the sort, does so on such a modest scale 
that it has gone undetected. Or possibly the solar counterpart of 
stellar variability has merely gone unrecognized, and is represented 
by the intermittent flares, or even by the sunspot cycle. We do not 
know the causes of stellar vibration or of the sunspot cycle. No 
connection is apparent; but we cannot be certain that none exists.

The Wolf-Rayet Stars. —One of the most spectacular stars in 
the sky lies in the constellation of the Great Dog (0? Canis Majoris).

It is perhaps as luminous as Alnitam, but may well have twice the 
surface temperature. Its spectrum gives evidence of a huge and 
brilliant chromosphere, for bright-line radiations outweigh all 
other atomic lines. The spectroscope gives evidence of violent 
motion, with showers of atoms spurting rapidly at speeds of several 
thousand miles a second. Matter is pouring either inward or outward in tremendous quantities and at immense velocity. Some of the 
atoms, which lie between us and the star, are certainly spurting 
upward from the surface. But when we recall the motions of solar 
prominences, we recognize the possibility that atoms may be cascading downward as well as upward. This star (a representative of 

THE PLAYERS 
a small and fascinating group, the so-called Wolf-Rayet stars *) 
is evidently in a state of crisis. Even a star like Rigel, with its limited 
future, is likely to last longer without drastic change.

Dwarf Stars. — All the bright stars in Orion and the Dogs are 
far brighter than the sun, but these brilliant performers that have 
their names in lights are a small minority. The whole face of the 
constellation is covered with myriads of inconspicuous stars, the 
mainstay of the stellar population. Stars like Procyon are commoner 
than stars like Sirius; sunlike stars are commoner than stars like 
Procyon, but the great bulk of the stars are even further down the 
scale: smaller, fainter, cooler, and less massive than the sun ( Fig. 2).

These “main-sequence stars” have few spectacular traits, but, 
mutatis mutandis, they are very like the sun — they, too, are no 
doubt intermittently spotted, and possess chromospheres and coronas 
too faint to be seen in contrast to their total light. The only “solar” 
phenomenon that can sometimes be seen for the fainter ones is 
flare activity; a burst of light similar to a solar flare, on the surface of 
a star ten thousand times fainter, can more than double the star’s 
total light. Such flares have recently been found on several very 
faint cool stars, and show that even here the same forces are at work.

The smallest, faintest stars known (exclusive of the white 
dwarfs) have about one tenth of the sun’s size, one fifth of its mass, 
rather less than half its surface temperature, and less than one tenthousandth of its brightness. If (as we believe) these stars conform 
to the mass-luminosity relation, and subsist on their internal 
hydrogen, their life expectancy very greatly exceeds that of the sun.

They constitute the enormous bulk of the stellar population in our 
neighborhood, and in the story of stellar development their testimony 
carries the greatest weight. Their existence seems monotonous; save 
for occasional superficial flares, they do not vary in brightness.

Except as members of pairs they may seem uninteresting. But in 
stellar evolution their role is more important than that of the rare 
and brilliant stars that obtrude themselves on our attention.

The slowly spinning sun is not noticeably distorted by its rotation.

The bright stars of Orion present a different picture. Many of them, 
probably most of them, are spinning rapidly. The bright, high- 
* Named after two astronomers who first studied them.


STARS 
temperature 7° Orionis, for example, is spinning so fast that it is 
distorted from spherical form, not merely into an oblate spheroid, 
like the planet Jupiter, but into an ellipsoid with three axes that 
10000F 
100}- 
0.01 
Fic. 2. Typical stars, arranged so that the brightest are at the top of the figure, the 
coolest at the right. The various groups of stars that are mentioned in the text are illustrated 
by a few typical examples. The relative sizes of the stars are shown on a conventional scale; 
the largest stars shown are over a hundred thousand times as large as the smallest, but the circles give an idea of the distribution of size with brightness and temperature. The numbers 
on the left show the brightness of stars on the horizontal line, in terms of the brightness of the sun, 
differ. As it spins, it presents successively its larger and smaller 
profiles to us, and varies rhythmically in brightness — not by pulsations as the Cepheids do, but because it turns different sides successively toward us.


THE PLAYERS 
Most of the bright, high-temperature stars are spinning rapidly, 
and it is probably no coincidence that they are commonly found in 
pairs — twin stars that circle one another as they turn. Spinning 
and twinning are so often found together that they seem likely to be 
cause and effect, important factors in stellar development.

Stars like the sun, on the other hand, rarely spin fast; the only 
ones that do so, in fact, are members of twin systems. Moreover, 
there is no steady gradation of rotational speed from stars like 
Alnitam to stars like the sun. All the hotter stars tend to spin fast, 
and there is a sudden break in the average speed of rotation between 
stars like Sirius and stars like Procyon.

The sun, it will be remembered, is even further down the series 
than Procyon (Fig. 2). Stars still further down the series — the small 
red-dwarf stars — spin slowly too. If they did not, the rapid rotation 
would blur their spectrum lines, but these lines are sharp. We 
recall the puzzle presented by the solar system: the sun has only a 
small percentage of the total rotational energy of the whole.

Theories of the development of the solar system must imagine a 
way in which the sun can have unloaded the rotational energy that 
must have been present in the primeval solar system. The fact that 
the smaller, cooler stars also spin slowly shows that the problem is 
not peculiar to the sun; if they started out as brighter, hotter, swiftly 
rotating stars, they too must have shed their energy of spin. Perhaps 
the loss of spin energy takes place for all such stars, whether or not 
they develop with systems of planets.

The Variables in the Great Nebula. —Innumerable stars that 
fall below the sun in sequence, the stars that make up the bulk of 
the stellar population, are scattered over the face of Orion. In the 
very heart of the constellation is a dense group of stars that are 
almost all as faint as the sun or fainter. They lie within the Great 
Nebula (Plate 23), and are a great deal more numerous than such 
stars usually are in a comparable volume. Under careful scrutiny 
they emerge as something very different from the sun.

The first thing that strikes us is that these stars are all varying 
in brightness; they flicker and flare in a quite irregular way, very 
different from the rhythmic fluctuations of the Cepheids and the 
long-period variables. The spectra of these stars, which have been 

STARS 
studied by Greenstein and by Struve, are very peculiar, with the 
earmarks of glowing gases around them, especially near the fainter 
ones. Most of them are basically as cool as the sun, or cooler; but 
the glowing gases suggest far higher temperatures. The hotter stars 
in the region (which are also the brighter ones), seem to lack these 
glowing auras. And yet a few of the faint stars, surrounded by glowing clouds, have the colors of hot stars.

Superficially, these variable stars, within the Great Nebula, 
hardly resemble the sun. But perhaps a sun with a vastly exaggerated 
chromosphere might resemble the fainter ones; perhaps a sun with a 
greatly enhanced flare activity might look like the faint anomalous 
hot ones. The hot, bright stars in the district are probably so hot 
that their surface radiations actually blow away the enmeshing 
gases from their surfaces, and therefore they lack the glowing 
auras.

The fact that the peculiar variable stars within the Orion Nebula 
are perhaps ten times as common as would be expected in an average 
region suggests that the presence of the nebula is in some way 
responsible for their very existence. Perhaps they are actually being 
formed within it from the loose dust and gas of which it consists, 
and the glowing clouds that surround them are the atoms that are 
condensing to form them. Or possibly they are preéxisting stars that 
have sailed into this dense region of dust and gas, and are drawing 
the loose particles into themselves, growing brighter and more 
massive as they do so. In other words, perhaps in the Orion Nebula 
we are actually witnessing the birth of stars; or perhaps stars are 
being rejuvenated before our eyes.

The little group in Orion is not unique. A very similar region, 
studied by A. H. Joy, lies in the neighboring constellation Taurus; 
and here there are two or three times as many stars within a dark 
nebula as are found on the average in an equal volume. Other 
similar groups have been studied by Struve and his collaborators 
in the dark clouds of Scorpio and Ophiuchus, in Corona Austrina, 
and elsewhere, and are very likely to be found in all dense regions 
of loose dust and gas. The Russian astronomer Ambartsumian surmises that our stellar system contains several thousand of them.

Whether they represent the actual birth of stars, or the rapid 

THE PLAYERS 
growth of stars in the presence of abundant nourishment, they show 
without doubt an important stage in stellar development.

The Variety of Stars. — The constellations of Orion and the Dogs 
reveal a bewildering variety of stars. We have looked only at their 
faces, spoken of their size, weight, and temperature. They range 
from the giant Betelgeuse to the tiny companion of Sirius, from the 
hot stars of the Trapezium to the cool of the long-period variables.

Great as is the variety of stars, they are to some extent standardized. Most of those that we know run in a continuous series from 
bright to faint, from hot to cool, from massive to light, from larger 
to smaller. This series is usually called the main sequence (Fig. 2).

The brightest main-sequence stars are about ten thousand times as 
bright as the sun; the faintest, perhaps a millionth as bright. Their 
sizes range from perhaps twenty times to perhaps one tenth of the 
sun’s, their temperatures from half a million to a couple of thousand 
degrees, and their weights from forty times to about one tenth the 
sun’s. The great majority of all our neighbors belong to the main 
sequence: Alnitam and Sirius, Procyon and the sun, and innumerable fainter stars that we have not called by name.

There is another group of stars, somewhat parallel to the main 
sequence, but (temperature for temperature) fainter, smaller, and 
probably less massive — the subdwarfs. Yet another, the subgiants, 
contains stars, at the same temperatures, rather larger and less dense 
than those of the main sequence. The giant stars, about a hundred 
times as bright as the sun, are coolish or cool stars like Arcturus and 
Aldebaran, probably much more massive than the sun, and proportionately less dense. The supergiants, like Rigel and Betelgeuse, are 
still more brilliant. Finally, the white dwarfs, the stellar bankrupts, 
of small size, moderate mass, and extraordinarily high density, form 
a very numerous group, cut off from the other stars by difference of 
construction, and — even more significant ~ of nutrition. All these 
kinds of stars have parts to play in the drama of the stellar communities that people the cosmic scene. Hitherto we have given 
portraits of the individuals; in a later chapter we shall consider the 
situations in which they are found, their relation to one another, and 
the roles in which they are cast.

The brilliant stars, both hot and cool, are stealing the scene.


STARS 
But they are the exception, negligible in numbers compared with 
the rank and file. Their brilliance strikes the eye, even from afar, at 
a distance where a star like the sun would pass unnoticed. If the 
stars of our neighborhood are herded together for a collective portrait, we realize not only that the fainter ones are far more numerous, 
but also that they give out the greater part of the light. Stars like 
Rigel are ten thousand times as bright as the sun. But stars like the 
sun are at least ten thousand times as numerous as stars like Rigel.

Most of the light that fills interstellar space comes from the faint, 
inconspicuous stars, not from the brilliant ones that dominate the 
scene, An even greater portion of the mass of all the stars is contained in the faint ones. And, as we shall see in the next chapter, 
a large fraction of the matter in the cosmos ~ at least in our part of 
it — is not part of stars at all, but is spread between them in clouds 
of dust and atoms.


2 Dust and Atoms 
The sun is moving rapidly through space. The stars, 
greater and lesser suns, have their motions too. We are carried along 
as passengers in a great stream of stellar traffic. Most of the stars 
near to us are taking the same road round a great circular track 
within the Milky Way. The sun moves a little faster round the track 
than the average stellar traveler, and gains about 12 miles a second 
on the general stream of traffic. The actual rate of travel is very much 
larger than this; the average speed in our part of the cosmic highway 
is about 125 miles a second, over seven thousand times as fast as a 
car that is going at a mile a minute.

Not all stars keep to the circular track. Our system is, so to speak, 
full of stellar jaywalkers that are crossing our path at all angles.

In fact, in remote parts of our stellar system such stars are more 
numerous than stars that move in circles, and the two groups differ 
in character as well as in the paths they travel. The cosmic traffic 
laws are of great significance in our study of stellar histories, as we 
shall see later.

At first sight our own part of the cosmic highway seems to be 
exceptionally crowded. But this is an illusion. Actually we can see 
only the travelers that are comparatively near to us in our own 
system of stars; the far side of the track is completely out of sight.

And yet other stellar systems, separated from our own Milky Way 
by vast tracts of empty space, are easily observed at much greater 
distances than the far side of our own. The reason is that we move 

DUST AND ATOMS 
in a haze of interstellar dust and smoke, which lies thick in our 
traffic lane, and thins out rapidly overhead. We can see some of our 
fellow travelers on the circular track through the fog, but only those 
that are fairly near to us. Stars that move above or below the track 
(for cosmic highways have three dimensions) are more easily seen, 
even at much greater distances.

The system of stars in which our sun moves is but one of billions 
that are dispersed through space. Its shape is that of a gigantic pancake; or perhaps a very thin layer cake, with a central filling, thick 
with dust and smoke, within which the circular traffic stream moves.

The stars lie thickest near the central plane, and thin out rapidly 
above and below it. The filling probably does not extend through 
the center of the cake, but is very likely spilling out at the edges.

The other stellar systems that populate space have various forms.

Some are quite devoid of filling; some have much. Through some the 
central layer is unevenly spread; many are beautifully symmetrical, 
some are broken and distorted. We shall find that the presence of a 
central filling is closely related to the shapes of stellar systems and 
to the nature of the stars that populate them. Interstellar dust and 
gas are a potent factor in stellar development.

Interstellar Dust. — As we look toward the edges of our flattened 
stellar system we see the hazy band of light that we call the Milky 
Way — light from myriads of faint and distant stars that stretch away 
to the confines of the galaxy (Plates 12 and 13). But the Milky Way 
is not an unbroken band of brightness, It is crossed by gigantic rifts, 
fretted with obscuring clouds, wreathed with streaks of dark 
material, evidences of the dense and patchy interstellar fog that lies 
between the stars. Nearby patches of dark material are easily seen.

The Coal Sack (Plates 13 and 15), under the shoulder of the 
Southern Cross, is one of the most striking. The whole neighborhood 
is covered with interstellar fog wreaths. Similar streaks of dark are 
found everywhere along the Milky Way, where the stellar traffic 
is heaviest. They cannot be lanes in which there are no stars. When 
the stellar system was thought to be fairly small, such lanes were 
a possibility; but now that its great extent is realized, empty lanes are 
seen to involve immense, straight tunnels devoid of stars, and all 
pointing directly toward our position — a fantastically improbable 

THE PLAYERS 
arrangement. Today we picture a layer full of patchy haze that 
extends throughout the Milky Way. The large, nearby pockets of 
dust can be seen, and so can innumerable knots of dark material 
that happen to lie in front of a bright surface, such as a nebula close 
to us (Plate 35). The distant scene must be dimmed by the cumulative effect of such hazy regions, large and small. Without doubt there 
are many patches so tiny as to be individually invisible, even at 
close range; indeed, they are probably more numerous than the 
large ones.

The interstellar dust clouds seemed at first to have only a 
nuisance value. They interfered with attempts to make a census of 
the stars, because they compelled us to peer through a dense and 
patchy fog. To make allowance for the fog in surveying our stellar 
neighbors is a very difficult task. A star that lies behind a dense 
cloud is dimmed, and looks farther away than it really is. The 
cumulative effect of the innumerable small patches of cloud makes 
the stars seem to thin out rapidly in all directions, especially toward 
the edges of our flattened system, where the clouds lie thickest.

Thus it comes about that our own neighborhood seems exceptionally 
crowded. Actually the stellar traffic is considerably denser in some 
other parts of the central layer, but the fact was realized only after 
a laborious allowance had been made for the distribution of the 
dust and haze.

At first the interstellar dust was studied with the purpose of 
removing its effects from our picture of our own system of stars, but 
before long its own individuality attracted attention. There is a surprising amount of it. The interstellar material in our own district 
weighs about as much as the stars! Haze and stars form a greater 
system, and their interplay governs the development of the system.

The stars may do the dancing, but, as we shall see, the haze calls 
the tune.

Stars are known by the light they radiate; but interstellar dust 
can be studied only by what it conceals. We might well expect that 
its character would elude analysis; and yet we know a surprising 
number of things about it: the size of the particles, what they are 
made of, how they are distributed, even how they are oriented| 
When the stars seen through haze were carefully examined, a 

DUST AND ATOMS 
striking fact emerged: their light is not only dimmed, but also 
reddened, like that of the sun as it sets in a murky sky. A star of a 
given temperature has a given color, and we have already seen that 
the sun, brightest in yellow light, has a temperature of about 6000°.

But there is another way to tell a star’s temperature: the atomic lines 
in its spectrum reveal the conditions at the surface, and from these 
again the sun’s temperature is found to be about 6000°. If we can 
study a star’s spectrum, its temperature can be determined, and in 
this way we find that stars seen through dark clouds are redder than 
we should expect from the information given by the atoms in their 
atmospheres. The colors of stars seen through haze always correspond to a temperature lower than would be expected from their 
spectra. For some stars the difference is amazing: a star that must 
(from its spectrum) have a surface temperature of 30,000° may have 
the color of a star at 4000°.

The piecing together of the information on obscuration and 
reddening has been the work of many years, and has called for 
measurements of the greatest precision. Even today it is far from 
complete. Two results have emerged from it: the amount of reddening is proportional to the amount of absorption; and the relation 
is the same almost everywhere. The first result provides the most 
powerful method available for allowing for the dimming of distant 
stars by interstellar material, and finding their true distances. The 
second allows us to conclude that the absorption and reddening are 
nearly everywhere produced by essentially similar processes.

The light of distant stars is reddened by the intervening haze 
because it is scattered, and the bluer the light, the greater is the 
scattering effect. In other words, the redder the light, the less it is 
scattered and therefore the more of it can get through the haze.

For this reason the sun, as it sets in a hazy atmosphere, seems 
reddened — the light passes through thicker and thicker layers as 
the sun sinks toward the horizon.

Yellow light penetrates haze more freely than blue light, red 
light than yellow light. Light beyond the red limit of eye sensitivity 
gets through more readily still. So it comes about that distant stars 
are more easily detected by infrared light than by the blue light of 
an ordinary photograph. Photographic plates sensitized for the infra- 

THE PLAYERS 
red, and instruments for the direct detection of infrared rays, can 
survey our murky “filling” better than the ordinary plate or the eye.

Microwaves (radio waves) come through with even greater ease, 
and the central regions of our stellar system, completely cut off from 
ordinary photography, can easily be studied by microwaves —a 
branch of astronomy that is only now opening up almost unbounded 
vistas, 
An ounce of matter, placed before a star in a solid chunk, would 
be quite invisible. A similar mass, if pulverized, might absorb a great 
deal of light. The stopping power depends partly on what the 
material is made of (whether metallic or nonmetallic) but principally 
on the sizes of the particles. For example, a mass of material that 
consists of nonmetallic grains 0.0000014 cm in radius absorbs ten 
thousand times as much light as the same mass distributed in grains 
0.44 cm in radius, and spread over the same area. Nonmetallic grains 
of 0.0000044-cm radius are four times as efficient still under the 
same circumstances. If the grains are metallic, the greatest efficiency 
is about one third that of the nonmetallic grains, and is attained at 
even smaller size, 0.00000044 em.* If the subdivision is carried even 
further, and the mass is resolved into atoms, it becomes almost completely transparent.

The interstellar haze is unlikely to consist of particles of just one 
size; all sizes must be present, from large chunks down to molecules 
and atoms. The most efficient ones, however, are the ones that are 
responsible for the greatest amount of scattering and the absorption; 
all are acting on the light, but (to use a mixed metaphor) we hear 
those that shout the loudest.

That the particles are all purely metallic, or purely nonmetallic, 
is also unlikely. Metals, such as iron, are less common in the stars 
than hydrogen, carbon, oxygen, nitrogen, and so on; and large proportions of these elements are probable in the interstellar haze.

Absorption is related to color of light in a way that suggests that the 
particles are metallic (though a similar relation would be given 
by nonmetallic particles of a certain size). Another fact that points 
to iron (or some other metal with magnetic properties) as a con- 
* These calculations, made by Greenstein, apply to spherical grains; the grains in 
interstellar space are not necessarily — in fact probably not — spherical.


DUST AND ATOMS 
stituent of the interstellar grains is the polarization * of the scattered 
light, in a way that shows that the particles are aligned in space.

If, as seems most likely, magnetic fields are responsible for the alignment, some at least of the particles must have magnetic properties, 
and nonmetals are only slightly magnetic. But the interstellar 
particles reflect light more brilliantly than snow, and only nonmetallic particles could do so. Perhaps the grains are primarily nonmetallic, with small metallic particles embedded in them. The subject 
is in a state of lively and interesting controversy at the present time.

Atoms in Interstellar Space. — The interstellar material is of many 
sizes — grains, powder, dust, and particles even smaller. Round the 
solid matter hovers a haze of molecules, atoms, and electrons. We 
have seen that atoms and molecules do not block off much light.

In fact, a cloud of them between the stars would be almost completely transparent.

Atoms do, however, cut off light in a special way. As we learned 
in examining the light of the sun, every atom can take up a limited 
array of colors, sharply bounded and peculiar to that atom. The 
atoms that lie between the stars are no exception. They rob the 
starlight of their own particular colors.

We see our own sun through a cloud of atoms — the constituents 
of the earth’s atmosphere — and they leave their mark on sunlight 
(Plate 18). Molecules of ozone, the triple oxygen molecule, cut off 
practically all the sun’s ultraviolet light by their characteristic 
absorptions — and it is lucky for us that they do, for the ultraviolet 
rays of the sun could give us a severe sunburn! The oxygen molecule — two atoms of oxygen knit together by the interlacing of their 
hazes of electrons — cuts an intricate pattern out of red and infrared 
sunlight, and so do the molecules of water vapor, carbon dioxide, and 
other chemical compounds that populate the air. When the sun is 
overhead, and seen vertically through the atmosphere, the absorptions are weaker than when it lies nearer the horizon and we view it 
through a thicker layer of air. The more atoms lie in a line between 
us and the sun, the more deeply is the pattern etched on sunlight.

We see distant stars through clouds of atoms, too — the atoms 
* Ordinary light may be pictured as vibrating in all planes in space; polarized light vibrates in a restricted plane.


THE PLAYERS 
that are scattered throughout space. Spectrum lines that come from 
atoms in space can be distinguished from the lines of atoms in the 
stars’ own atmosphere in several ways. They may be narrow, whereas 
the lines of the star are broad. They always come from atoms in 
states of low energy, for interstellar material is relatively cool, as 
compared to the material in stellar envelopes. Most important of all, 
they can be distinguished by the speed of the atoms that produce 
them.

Light that comes from atoms that are approaching us is rendered 
bluer — the light waves are crowded together in space, the wavelength grows smaller, and the light more blue. If the atoms are 
moving away, the light waves are spaced more widely, the wavelength grows larger, and the light is reddened. The change of color 
and wavelength of light from a moving source is exactly similar to 
the change of pitch of a bell or whistle on a moving train: as the 
train passes the observer the pitch of the sound seems to drop. As 
the source approaches, the sound waves are crowded together by its 
motion and the pitch of the note is raised; as it recedes, the sound 
waves are spread apart and the pitch falls. The effect of the moving 
source on the color and wavelength of light is known as the spectroscopic Doppler effect. It should not be confused with the quite 
different reddening effect of the interstellar dust, which reddens by 
removing the blue light from the continuous band of colors given 
out by the surface of the star. The Doppler effect changes the wavelengths of absorption lines in the spectrum, and does not noticeably 
affect the color of the star as a whole.

The exact wavelength of the light in spectrum lines is measured 
with a spectroscope. And from the comparison with the wavelengths 
of lines of the same atom (obtained in the laboratory) that are not 
moving toward us or away, the speeds of distant atoms, in space or 
in the stars, can be measured. Suppose we see, from the wavelengths 
of lines in a star's atmosphere, that it is approaching us at a speed 
of 50 miles a second; then if one or two lines that cross the spectrum 
tell of atoms that are receding from us at 30 miles a second, we can 
surmise that the aberrant lines are not part of the light of the star, 
and can guess (especially if they are low-energy lines) that they 

DUST AND ATOMS 
come from atoms that are scattered in space between us and the 
star.

An especially neat proof comes from the pairs of stars that are 
going round each other in orbits. In the next chapter we shall have 
much to say about such stars. As they circle round (and if the plane 
of the orbit lies in the right direction) these stars alternately come 
toward us and recede from us, and their light is alternately reddened 
and blued by the Doppler effect (Plate 19). But the light from the 
interstellar atoms suffers no such periodic change of wavelength, 
and can be identified with certainty. Calcium, sodium, iron, titanium 
can actually be seen in the spaces between the stars, and even some 
simple chemical compounds have been detected. A few of the interstellar lines are still a mystery —we do not know what atoms or 
molecules produce them.

The interstellar lines tend to cut most strongly into the spectra 
of very distant stars, especially those that lie in the central dust layer 
of our stellar system. Their strength, in fact, has been used as a means 
of guessing stellar distances. But it is an uncertain means of doing 
so, for the interstellar atoms, like the dust and haze, are distributed 
in patches.

The spectra of some distant stars show not only one but several 
representatives of the light absorbed by certain interstellar atoms 
(such as calcium atoms that have lost one of their electrons). There 
can be no doubt that all these lines come from similar atoms, and 
they tell of several groups of atoms that are moving at different 
rates. Evidently these stars are seen through several different clouds 
of atoms, that are moving with relative speeds of 10 or 20 miles a 
second, as was shown by Adams. Here we have evidence of large 
clouds of atoms, that are swirling and churning about in space.

The vast regions between the stars are neither empty nor quiescent.

They contain moving clouds of atoms, and patches of dust and haze 
that are probably riding the atomic winds, just as the clouds of our 
own atmosphere are borne along by invisible air masses.

Bright Nebulae. — The dust, smoke, and interstellar atoms are 
not analyzed only by their blocking-off power. Some of them can be 
directly observed in the form of bright nebulae (Plates 20 and 23), 
the gleaming clouds that variegate the Milky Way.


THE PLAYERS 
A familiar sight in the winter sky is the constellation Taurus, the 
Bult that fronts Orion and the Dogs. Everybody knows the Pleiades 
(Plate 21), the compact cluster of bright stars: 
Many a night I saw the Pleiads, rising thro’ the mellow shade, 
Glitter like a swarm of fire-flies tangled in a silver braid.

The eye sees the fireflies; the photographic plate reveals the silver 
braid — a gleaming haze that surrounds the bright cluster. The stars 
are meshed in a network of shining strands, which stretch far from 
them into the surrounding space.

The shining haze is a cloud of small particles that reflect the 
light of the Pleiades as brightly as a snowfield. It sends back the 
pattern of light unchanged — the nebula that surrounds the Pleiades 
really shines by reflection. Its intricate network of clouds, so fine 
in detail that it eludes our most powerful telescopes, shows how 
streaky and patchy is the distribution of interstellar particles. Many 
of the bright nebulae that adorn the Milky Way are very similar.

But many of the other interstellar clouds do not shine merely 
by reflection. The Great Nebula of Orion (Plate 23), for instance, 
swirling around the Trapezium, glows with a light quite different 
from that of the hot stars within it.

The bright nebulae glow with many colors. Far stronger than the 
hydrogen glow in the Orion nebula is the light of the so-called 
“nebular lines,” red, green, blue, and ultraviolet. These spectral 
colors, never produced in the laboratory, were long supposed to 
emanate from a substance unknown on earth, which received the 
name “nebulium.” Other such hypothetical substances have occurred 
in the history of astrophysics, but they have not stood the test of 
time. The first was the source of the yellow light observed in the 
solar prominences at the eclipse of 1874. Norman Lockyer dubbed 
it “helium,” the sun-element. Today helium is well known on earth, 
and it is actually the second commonest kind of atom in the cosmos.

“Coronium,” the supposed source of the bright lines in the sun’s 
corona, is now known to consist of well-known metallic atoms, such 
as iron, nickel, and calcium. “Nebulium” is of equally prosaic origin: 
it is of common material, such as oxygen, nitrogen, and neon, but 
under conditions far from prosaic.


DUST AND ATOMS 
Each atom, as we have seen, possesses its own array of colors, 
can shine with them, or can rob light of them. An atom that has 
taken up its own peculiar color is then loaded with energy, which 
it has a natural tendency to fire off again. A given atom can emit 
only the colors that make up its natural array (or spectrum); and it 
gives off some colors far more readily than others. Indeed, we can 
often calculate the readiness of a given atom to fire off its various 
possible colors. Some are radiated so readily that the atom waits 
only a million-millionth of a second before emitting them; for others 
the interval is longer, and the corresponding color (given out by 
fewer atoms in a given interval) shines less brightly.

Each atomic species possesses not one, but a vast number of 
discrete colors. For each atomic species has its own particular complement of electrons, which are distributed in a sort of intricate fog 
about the nucleus. When an atom radiates light, some of the energy 
of the electron fog is lost to it, and passes out in a pulse of radiation.

When an atom absorbs light, the radiant energy is taken up by the 
electron fog, and the fog accommodates itself to the acquisition by 
assuming a new distribution of energy.

The core of our understanding of spectra is the fact that the 
energies of the circumambient electrons are quantized —they can 
have only discrete values, and they can change only by discrete 
amounts. The rules that govern the possible changes have fascinating 
intricacy, and the analysis of all the resulting colors is a crossword 
puzzle on the cosmic scale.

Thus it comes about that the array of possible colors that an 
atom can emit depends not only upon how many electrons are 
present in the fog, but also upon the way their energy is distributed.

If the electron fog of an atom is heavily loaded with energy we say 
that the atom is excited; if it has received more energy than it can 
sustain, and one or more electrons have been detached, and have 
carried away the excess energy, the atom is said to be ionized.

An excited atom will readjust its haze of electrons, and unload 
its energy, in an array of colors different from those given out by 
an unexcited atom, and an ionized atom, so far as its spectrum is 
concerned, is a new kind of atom altogether. So the colors that an 

THE PLAYERS 
atom radiates depend not only on how many electrons the atom 
possesses, but also on how the energy is distributed among them.

The lines in the spectra of nebulae that were first ascribed to the 
hypothetical “nebulium” were shown by Bowen, only a couple of 
decades ago, to originate principally in atoms of oxygen and nitrogen 
that had lost one or two of their full complement of electrons. The 
remaining electron haze is only very slightly excited, and is in a 
so-called “metastable state,” that is, a state from which the likelihood of unloading the energy of excitation is very small. None the 
less, energy is ejected after the appropriate interval, and the nebula 
shines with the characteristic colors.

How is it that these colors had not been seen on earth, or recorded 
in the spectra of stars? The answer is that both terrestrial and stellar 
atoms undergo the same transitions; but only a very tiny fraction 
of them do so, because the likelihood of the change is extremely 
small. These spectrum lines have accordingly received the rather 
unfortunate name of “forbidden” lines. But the transitions are not 
forbidden, they are only very rare, and it is quite incorrect to suppose 
that physical processes that are possible in nebulae are not permitted 
elsewhere. We see the light that comes from “forbidden” lines in 
nebulae because such an enormous volume of atoms is involved, and 
even though any one atom performs the change only at long intervals, the cumulative effect of millions of millions of atoms is great 
enough to be recorded.

The atoms in a bright nebula are thought to be forced into the 
metastable states by collisions with electrons that are fying through 
space. The conditions within a bright nebula are almost beyond 
imagination. Each cubic centimeter contains no more than a 
thousand atoms — a ten-thousand-millionth of the density in a laboratory discharge tube. Once in every ten years, on the average, an 
electron is ripped off an atom, and becomes available for exciting 
another atom to a metastable state. The electrons move among the 
atoms at perhaps 60 miles a second; they hit an atom once in a 
decade; once in a million years they may hit a solid grain. Only 
because of the enormous volume of a nebula are its radiations visible 
to us. The Orion Nebula is so enormous that we see a million million 
atoms for every square centimeter of area, and enough of them are 

DUST AND ATOMS 
executing the rare “forbidden” transitions at any moment to give out 
appreciable light.

Details of the light even enable us to deduce the density of 
electrons. When electrons are very sparse, green light will predominate in the nebula; when they are more frequent, blue radiations 
will be more intense. Almost all nebulae shine most brightly in green 
light — the Orion Nebula looks slightly green to the eye — and we 
conclude that the density of electrons is low. But in a few —a very 
few — the blue radiations predominate, and there the electrons 
must be denser.

The Orion Nebula and many of the other great nebulae in our 
system are irregular in form, and close analysis shows that they 
are bunched and shredded, and resemble clouds of various kinds.

Like the dark matter and the reflecting nebulae, the shining atoms 
are distributed in patchy fashion, torn and swirled by forces not 
fully understood.

Some of the bright nebulae are much more compact and symmetrical than the one in Orion. Such is the celebrated “Ring 
Nebula in Lyra” (Plate 24), a star surrounded by a gaseous ring 
that shines with the characteristic nebular radiations. The “rings” of 
the so-called planetary nebulae * are observed to be blowing off 
from the central stars, always found to be at very high temperature; 
the ring is almost certainly the result of an explosive ejection from 
the star’s surface. Some planetaries have two concentric rings, as 
though two explosions have taken place, a million or more years 
apart. Many are unsymmetrical rather than ringlike.

Stellar Explosions. — The explosive ejection of a star’s surface can 
be watched on a grand scale in the outburst of a nova, or “new star.” 
There is nothing new about a nova except the explosion; in fact, “new 
stars” are probably very old stars that are taking a drastic way out 
from an intolerable state, when they can no longer support themselves in the style to which they have been accustomed.

Some such stars blow off more or less regularly every few weeks; 
others, more violent, suffer an upheaval every few years; the bright 
novae explode infrequently — perhaps every few thousand, or even 
* They have, of course, nothing to do with planets. They received the name because many show appreciable disks.


THE PLAYERS 
every million years. The most spectacular of all, the supernovae, 
seem to blow up once for all, the greatest explosion that man can 
witness. All of them, in their degree, blow off part of their own 
substance into space.

The adventures of the stuff that a nova blows off from its surface 
can be traced in detail from the characteristic radiations. In the first 
few hours the star simply swells up with great rapidity. Some have 
blown up at about 2500 miles a second! The surface grows larger 
and larger, the star becomes brighter and brighter, and it seems as 
though the skin is stretching and stretching, like that of a balloon.

Quite suddenly the brightness reaches its peak, the skin appears to 
burst, and great surges of glowing material pour out from within.

The star behaves like a gigantic Roman candle: glowing globes of 
gas may shoot out on opposite sides, the surface may vibrate 
violently, wave after wave surges up to the surface, and atoms spray 
outward in all directions (Plate 26). This picture is no flight of the 
imagination; every detail can be pieced together from a study of 
the spectrum.

At first the ejected material shows evidence of fairly high density: 
after the surface bursts, the light of glowing atoms, a gigantic 
chromosphere, is seen against the body of the star. But soon a change 
takes place: the chromosphere continues to expand at fantastic 
speed; the atoms thin out, the density falls, and the “forbidden” lines 
appear. First come those that go with high density of electrons; the 
envelope glows like an aurora. Then, as the gases grow more 
tenuous, the expanding mass glows like a nebula. At last the spray 
of atoms ceases, the gases thin out into space, the bright radiations 
die away, and the nova fades to its former brightness. Novae are 
spectacular, but with most of them it is “all cry and little wool” — 
the mass that is blown off in the explosion is a tiny fraction of the 
whole, and the cataclysm, whatever its cause, leaves the star essentially unchanged. Only for the supernovae is the cataclysm really a 
catastrophe: the greater part of the star is blown off into space, only 
a fragment is left behind — a tiny star in place of the giant that was 
rent asunder.

The interesting thing about an exploding nova, from our present 
standpoint, is that after it has expanded far enough, its spectrum is 

DUST AND ATOMS 
very like that of a planetary nebula, just as the spectrum of a planetary nebula is very like that of the Nebula in Orion. In a nova we 
actually witness a star in explosion; in a planetary nebula we believe that the glowing envelope is the relic of such an explosion.

But (unless we are greatly mistaken) the gases that glow in the 
Orion Nebula were never part of a star. All the matter spewed out 
by novae, by planetary nebulae, or by the stars (mentioned in the 
last chapter) that are gradually losing their chromospheres would 
not add up to as much loose material as we can observe lying thick 
in the stellar traffic ways. Nebulae like the one in Orion must represent the primitive prestellar material. It is a most important discovery that matter that has “gone through the mill” as part of a star has 
just the same properties and composition as matter that has never 
been stellar.

The conclusion can even be made quantitative. By a knowledge 
of the relative tendencies of atoms to absorb and emit their different 
characteristic colors, the atoms in stellar envelopes, exploding novae, 
and planetary nebulae can actually be counted. The diffuse nebulae 
are harder to treat, but the general result is the same. The verdict 
seems to be “no difference,” either in the kinds or the relative numbers of atoms present. The interstellar gas offers a typical sample of 
the atomic composition of the fundamental material out of which 
the stars were built.

The supernovae tell a different story (Plate 27). Their spectra 
are an enigma, different from those of anything else ever observed.

But though it is hard to say what they are made of, we can assert 
with some confidence what they are not made of: they seem to contain very little hydrogen, the substance par excellence of which 
nearly all stars, and all galactic nebulae, are made. We have learned 
that stars subsist on hydrogen; what could be more suggestive than 
the observation that the supernovae, the only stars that are observed 
to undergo radical change under our eyes, seem to be short of this 
commodity? It is not too fantastic to regard them as stellar bankrupts 
in liquidation.

The expanding envelopes of novae, the planetary nebulae, the 
bright nebulae of the galaxy, do not exhaust our knowledge of interstellar nebulosity. The whole of our part of the galaxy is pervaded 

THE PLAYERS 
by a tenuous haze of glowing atoms. They are too far apart, too 
diffuse, to appear as individual bright nebulae, but their light can 
be photographed with specially designed equipment. The scattered 
gas is incredibly diffuse — about one atom per cubic centimeter, less 
than one thousandth of the density of the Orion Nebula. Sparse as it 
is, this interstellar gas is spread through such an enormous volume 
that its average density is not far from that of all stars in the same 
region. There is about as much nonstellar as stellar material in our 
district, the central traffic lane of the stellar system. A little of this 
interstellar material may have been ejected by stars, but most of it is 
probably primitive; it has never been stellar in the past. Its effect on 
stars, and its own probable future, are major themes in the drama of 
evolution.

Atoms in the Cosmos. —In the first chapter we examined the 
many-sided character of the sun —its capacity for producing an 
enormous range of spectra under a huge variety of conditions. We 
reflected on the possibility that the other stars may display a different interplay of the same conditions.

The present chapter has surveyed the many-sided character of 
the atoms. The same atoms can be responsible, in different conditions, for a vast range of appearances. Oxygen, for example, runs the 
gamut of its possible behavior between earth and nebula. In our own 
air we find the oxygen molecule, two atoms bound together by 
electron interaction. The twin oxygen molecule cuts an intricate 
pattern out of the spectrum of sunlight. Thirty miles up in the 
atmosphere, the ozone molecule (three oxygen atoms bound together) obscures the ultraviolet light of the sun. Still higher in the 
atmosphere the single atom of oxygen, complete with its full complement of eight electrons, is excited to “forbidden” transitions at 
low density, and gives characteristic color to the aurora. Far away, 
in the atmosphere of the sun and stars, we see the normal colors 
typical of various oxygen atoms (some with one or more electrons 
stripped away) cut out from the starlight. And in the almost complete vacuum of interstellar space we trace the “forbidden” lines of 
atoms of oxygen that have lost one or two of their outermost electrons.

Hydrogen, too, runs the gamut of cosmic conditions. Sunlight is 

DUST AND ATOMS 
scored by the spectrum lines of water vapor — hydrogen and oxygen 
combined. Lines of hydrogen in our own atmosphere tell of hydrogen atoms showering on us from the sun. Hydrogen cuts out characteristic colors from the spectra of sun and stars. Hydrogen is responsible, too, for the lack of transparency of the lower layers of 
stellar atmospheres. We see the glowing atoms of hydrogen in the 
bright nebulae, such as that in Orion, and the fainter light of the 
hydrogen atoms that extend in a diffuse haze throughout the central 
layer of the stellar system. The interstellar hydrogen even appears 
in the radio waves that are given out from its thinly scattered atoms 
when the electrons that accompany them suddenly change their 
orientation.

And we have not exhausted the roles played by the hydrogen 
atom in the cosmos. All the behavior just enumerated is very superficial — the work of the electron that accompanies the hydrogen 
nucleus. We must look beneath the electronic trappings for the 
heart of the drama. The nucleus of a hydrogen atom — the particle 
that is well named the proton — is the core of stellar life. We cannot 
observe it directly, but by its effects we see the universe of stars.


| PART TWO 
+ 
THE SCENE 
3 Pairs of Stars 
The stream of traffic races around its immense track 
within the stellar system. As we peer through the haze at the nearer 
travelers we notice a remarkable thing. Few stars are making the 
journey alone. They travel in pairs, often in even larger groups. The 
greater and lesser Dog Stars, each accompanied by a tiny “pup,” are 
not the exception, but the rule.

Even though pairs of stars are seen only from a distance, they 
reveal a great deal: each one is a “still picture” of an intimate stellar 
situation. In the first place, they cannot be fortuitous; when we see 
two stars moving very close together we are not witnessing a cosmic 
traffic accident. Large as the stars are, the traffic lane is so broad 
that the risk of collisions is actually nil; cosmic travel is almost 
completely safe.

Perhaps it may seem contradictory to say in one breath that stars 
travel in close pairs and that the traffic is spaced so widely that 
collisions are impossible. A careful look at the members of a pair 
dispels the contradiction. There is an intimate relation, a close bond, 
between them. They are waltzing round the track under strict rules 
— held together by powerful attraction, but kept apart by the rapid 
turns of the dance. In more technical terms, they describe orbits 
round each other under their mutual gravitational attraction.

The orbital motion of pairs of stars was discovered by accident.

Late in the eighteenth century, William Herschel looked for a way 
of detecting the parallax of the stars — the periodic shift of nearby 
objects against the distant stellar landscape as the earth makes the 

THE SCENE 
yearly circuit of its orbit. He chose a number of pairs of stars close 
together in the sky, in the belief that one of the pair would prove to 
be more distant than the other. He hoped that the nearer star would 
seem to shift back and forth against the far-off one at six-month 
intervals, when it was seen from opposite sides of the earth’s orbit.

Observation falsified Herschel’s expectations. He did not find a 
back-and-forth shift every six months. He saw instead that the members of his chosen pairs were moving round each other, and that they 
took much more than six months to make the circuit. He snatched 
victory from defeat, for he realized that he had discovered two 
tremendous facts: the pairs of stars are true pairs, close together in 
space; and they move in orbits round each other under the pull of 
gravitation. Until that time, the operations of gravitation had been 
recognized only within the planetary system; Herschel’s discovery 
showed that they also govern the system of the stars.

Herschel realized at once the great significance of these double 
stars, and began to make a list of them. The list has grown so rapidly 
that, in less than two centuries, tens of thousands of stellar pairs 
have been discovered. Today we suspect that the great majority of 
the stars that follow the circular traffic lane are double.

Close together as the members of a double star may be (and 
some pairs are practically touching), they are safe from collision 
with each other. Their orbital motion keeps them apart, just as the 
orbital motion of the planets keeps them from falling into the sun, 
and the path swept out by the moon prevents it from falling onto 
the earth. And the stellar traffic is so widely spaced that individual 
pairs are as unlikely to collide with each other as two couples, one 
waltzing in New York, the other in California.

From the enormous distances between stellar pairs we can conclude that stellar unions are practically indissoluble. Only the attraction of other stars can draw a pair apart. In the thinly spaced traffic 
of our part of the stellar system, an approach of a star close enough 
to separate the partners is practically out of the question; more distant encounters have a very slight effect. As time goes on, the influence of innumerable remote stars seems to relax the closeness of the 
embrace; the members of the pair continue to waltz, but with time 
they draw a little further apart.


PAIRS OF STARS 
If this conclusion is correct, another follows. The couples have 
been even closer in the past. We can say even more: in the widely 
scattered traffic stream they can scarcely have come together by 
accident; they have been together from the first.

Here is the enormous significance of double stars: they are pairs 
that have always been pairs. They were born together as a result of 
one process; they are of the same age; they have gone through the 
same experiences. The series of “still pictures” of stellar pairs tells 
not only of a current situation, a momentary intimate association; 
it shows the development of two characters that started from the 
same environment, have passed through similar external circumstances. They are twins that have been brought up together.

Speculation without the facts might lead us to suspect that such 
twins would always be identical — that stars born together, associated from the beginning, must always remain similar. But the 
facts are otherwise. Some identical twins there are, but they are the 
minority; in spite of similar origin and history, many pairs of stars 
are extraordinarily unlike. Here is one of the cornerstones of our 
study of stellar evolution: we must explain how a pair of twins can 
have developed such different characters. Let us look at a few intimate stellar situations, and form a picture of the variety of stellar 
matings, the closeness of the embrace, the pace of the dance.

Herschel saw pairs that move round each other in orbits. Some 
move in ellipses, some in circles. For those double stars whose motions can be seen, elliptical orbits (some very much elongated) are 
the rule, circular orbits the exception. Consider for a moment the 
necessary conditions for discovering such pairs. The two stars must 
appear far enough apart to be seen separately. If their distance from 
each other is extremely great, their gravitational attraction on each 
other (which, as Newton showed, falls off as the square of the distance between them) will be too small to constrain them to move 
round each other. The nearest star to the sun is the faint companion 
of Alpha Centauri, four light-years away. At so great a distance 
apart, the general influence of all the stars would outweigh the 
mutual attraction of two stars; the stars of such a pair would affect 
each other slightly, but they would not describe the closed orbit of a 
double star. Therefore a pair of stars that are moving round each 

THE SCENE 
other must be fairly close together, as compared with the average 
spacing in the traffic stream. And if we are to see such a pair, it must 
also be fairly close to us. We can expect to see double stars only 
among our moderately near neighbors.

Furthermore, a double star is difficult to recognize if the two 
members differ very much in brightness. Pairs that are nearly of the 
same brightness are easiest to find, and pairs that differ enormously 
become progressively more difficult, if only because the fainter 
member may be very faint indeed, too faint to be seen.

It may happen that the orbital motion of a double star is detected even though only one of the pair is bright enough to see.

This actually occurred in the case of Sirius. The Dog Star happens to 
be one of the nearest stars. It and the sun are moving with the great 
stream of stellar traffic, but at slightly different speeds; as it overtakes us we see its position shift steadily against the background 
of the more distant stars; the effect is large because we are not very 
far apart. In fact, Sirius is so close to us that its path, against the 
stellar background, can be mapped very accurately indeed. Even a 
hundred years ago the Dog Star was seen to be traveling, not in a 
straight line, but in a path that looked wavy. Actually the path is a 
corkscrew motion seen in projection. , 
All our knowledge of the motions of heavenly bodies assures us 
that their paths must be straight lines unless something is disturbing 
them. The regular corkscrew motion pointed inevitably to some 
regular disturbance, and orbital motion round some invisible companion exactly filled the bill. One turn of the screw took almost 
exactly fifty years; the two stars —bright Sirius and its invisible 
mate — were therefore making one circuit in fifty years. The absolute 
correctness of this interpretation was demonstrated in 1862, when 
the companion, the famous “Pup,” was actually seen for the first 
time by Alvan Clark. The pair has been watched since then through 
almost two complete circuits, and observations show conclusively 
that the corkscrew path is a combination of orbital motion and motion through space. The “Pup” moves in a corkscrew too, twice as 
wide as that described by Sirius. In other words, the companion has 
an orbit twice as large as that of the Dog Star round a mutual center, 
which moves through space in a straight line.


PAIRS OF STARS 
This brings us to another fact that makes double stars of great 
significance in the study of the properties of stars in general. They 
are the only stars that can be weighed. When we weigh something in 
everyday life, we commonly balance it against something else whose 
weight we know. It is the same in dealing with stars. They can be 
weighed by balancing them against other stars. The orbits of a pair 
of stars supply the equivalent of a balance, and the center of 
gravity of the system corresponds to the fulcrum. The laws of motion, worked out and verified within the planetary system, show that 
the relative sizes of orbits about the center of gravity are determined 
by the masses of the components. The larger the mass, the smaller 
the orbit. As the orbit of the “Pup” is nearly twice the size of the 
orbit of Sirius, the mass of Sirius is nearly twice the mass of the 
“Pup.” 
This does not tell us the masses themselves, but only the ratio of 
the masses to one another. The actual sizes of the two orbits, and the 
time taken to execute them, are needed if we are to determine the 
whole mass of the system, Sirius and the “Pup” together — again 
from the laws of motion that have been verified within the planetary 
system. And when we know the sum of the masses, the individual 
masses follow from a very simple calculation.

I have mentioned these rather technical details because I want 
to explain how stars can actually be weighed, and to make the point 
that the only stars that can be weighed are double stars. The matter 
is worth stressing, because probably the mass of a star is its most 
important property. In the first chapter I mentioned that the total 
output of stellar energy, luminosity, seems to depend almost exclusively on the star’s weight (the “mass-luminosity law”). It is important to remember that this conclusion is backed up by evidence 
only from stars that can be, and have been, weighed — the double 
stars. We have no method whatever for weighing stars that are 
traveling alone.

Sirius is about a hundred times as bright as the sun, and the 
“Pup, less than one hundredth as bright as the sun. In other words, 
Sirius is over ten thousand times as bright as its companion. But it 
weighs only twice as much. The “Pup” is one of the most flagrant 
exceptions to the rule that the mass of a star determines its energy 

THE SCENE 
output, the “mass-luminosity law.” If it complied with the rule, it 
would be about as bright as the sun, over a hundred times as bright 
as it actually is.

The system of Sirius represents a pair of stellar twins (Fig. 1), 
stars that (so we must believe) originated together and have spent 
their lives in company. Let us compare them. Sirius is a little hotter 
Fic. 8. Components of four double or multiple stars, drawn to scale, with the sun for comparison. Close pairs are joined by solid lines; wide companions, by broken lines. Top row: the components of Castor. Second row: left, Gamma Virginis; right, the sun. Third row: the components of Alpha Centauri. Fourth row: the components of o* Eridani.

at the surface, about twice as massive, about sixty times as large, 
about ten thousand times as bright. The companion has about sixty 
thousand times the density of Sirius. Anything less like a pair of 
identical twins can hardly be imagined. Even in their internal econ- 

PAIRS OF STARS 
omy they differ radically. Sirius is consuming its internal hydrogen 
steadily by means of the “carbon cycle”; the companion is a stellar 
bankrupt, incapable of releasing nuclear energy in its interior, probably sustained by gravitational contraction that is slowly converting 
energy of position into light. The Sirius system displays a remarkable contrast in character development, a contrast that tells of conflicting forces that underlie the drama of stellar evolution.

All stellar twins, however, are not dissimilar. One of the bright 
naked-eye stars in Virgo is revealed with even a small telescope to 
consist of two stars, equal in brightness and similar in color. They 
lie between the sun and Sirius in size, brightness, and mass; and they 
seem as like as peas. They are going round each other, once in about 
200 years, in a very elongated orbit.

Another naked-eye star, Epsilon in the constellation Lyra, can 
just be detected as a double by the unaided eye: two points of light, 
the same in brightness and color. They are very far apart, and probably spend hundreds of thousands of years in one circuit of each 
other. In fact, each of them is itself a twin system, two similar stars 
that circulate round each other once in several centuries. All four 
are alike: a little smaller, cooler, and fainter than Sirius — identical 
quadruplets.

An even more fascinating group is Castor, the brighter of the 
“Heavenly Twins” in the constellation Gemini. With the telescope, 
Castor is seen to be triple, but the three stars are not identical; two 
resemble Sirius in brightness and color, and the third is very faint, 
very red, far cooler than the sun. Analysis of the spectra reveals that 
each of the three is a pair of identical twins. Here we have stellar 
sextuplets: four are stars very like Sirius, and two others are smaller, 
fainter, lighter, cooler than the sun. The faint red twins go round 
each other in about 19 hours; one of the pairs of bright twins circulates in three days, and the other in nine. In addition, the two bright 
pairs swing round each other in about 300 years; the faint red twins 
circle the system of bright quadruplets in perhaps millions of years.

The six stars form a true physical system, bound together by, and 
intricately moving under, their mutual attractions. They are of the same age and origin, and have shared the same history, but their characters have developed differently.


THE SCENE 
The nearest of all stars to the sun consists of triplets. It lies in 
the Southern Hemisphere, in the constellation of the Centaur, and 
we know it as Alpha Centauri — oddly enough, though it is a bright 
naked-eye star, it has no familiar name. The triplets are not identical.

The brightest is very nearly the sun’s twin, in size, brightness, temperature, and mass. The second is a little larger,* but fainter, cooler, 
and Jess massive. The third is one of the smallest, coolest stars known, 
only 6 percent the size of the sun. It lies on the tail end of the main 
sequence, and is not a white dwarf, although it is a good deal fainter 
than the companion of Sirius. The two bright stars in the group that 
makes up Alpha Centauri circulate round their orbit in about 80 
years. The tiny companion (known as “Proxima,” the nearest, because it is our closest stellar neighbor) has an orbit that is so large 
that we do not know its time of revolution, and therefore we have 
not been able to weigh it. But we are certain that it really belongs 
to Alpha Centauri, because the three are moving through space 
together at precisely the same rate.

Another well-known set of stellar triplets, the system of o? 
Eridani, has something in common with Alpha Centauri, but is 
amazingly different too. The brightest is rather like the sun —a little 
smaller, cooler, and fainter. The second is rather like Proxima —a 
very cool main-sequence star, one fifth as massive as the sun, and 
about one fifth the size. The third star of the group is the surprise — 
it is a white dwarf, about half as massive as the sun, yet only 2 percent of the sun’s size, hence 64,000 times as dense! The red mainsequence star and the white dwarf circulate round each other in 
about 250 years, and the pair moves about the brightest triplet in a 
very large orbit.

The double stars that can be watched as they go round each 
other (visual binaries) make their circuit slowly. Comparatively few 
have been observed while they made even one complete turn. Visual 
pairs that circulate in less than a decade are rare; the vast majority 
require hundreds or even thousands of years. This is partly an accident of discovery: only if the stars take a long time to a circuit — if, 
as we say, their periods are long ~ are their orbits large; and, as we 
* In other words, it lies a little above the main sequence; it is a subgiant rather 
than a main-sequence star.


PAIRS OF STARS 
have seen, we shall not see them as individuals unless their orbits 
are large. But there is one trend shown by these “visual double 
stars” that cannot be fortuitous: most of them travel in elongated 
orbits rather than circles; and the longer the period, the more 
elongated the orbit.

A survey of the partnerships revealed by visual double stars 
exposes considerable variety: we have seen identical twins, from 
stars resembling Sirius down to faint, small, cool stars. All these 
identical twins fall near the main sequence described in the first 
chapter. We have seen dissimilar stars, such as the components of 
Alpha Centauri and Castor, which differ enormously among themselves, but all lie near the main sequence. And finally, in Sirius, 
Procyon, and o? Eridani we have met with main-sequence stars in 
company with white dwarfs, which differ from them fundamentally 
as well as superficially. A great many white dwarfs are members of 
twin systems, but some seem to be traveling alone.

None of the visual doubles that we have mentioned has been 
brighter or hotter than Sirius; although such stars are very rare in 
space they are bright and conspicuous, and their absence from our 
list of double stars calls for comment. It would be erroneous to conclude that the very bright, massive, hot stars do not form double 
systems. In point of fact, there is a greater proportion of doubles 
among these luminous stars than are to be found further down the 
main sequence. Why then do we not see motion in their orbits? 
There are two main reasons. These hot, luminous twins are rare in 
space, and even the nearest of them is farther away than most of 
those that we have been discussing. Also, the members of hot, bright 
pairs are always closer together than the components of visual 
doubles, so their periods, instead of being reckoned in decades, are 
only to be counted in days, or even hours; in consequence their 
orbits are far smaller. Such double systems must be detected by 
quite different methods.

Close binary systems are found and measured by means of the 
spectroscope, which (by evaluating the change in color of light that 
comes from objects approaching or receding from us) can give a 
direct measure of the speed of a star in our direction. If we know the 
speed of a star in its orbit, and the time taken to describe the orbit, 

THE SCENE 
it is an easy matter to calculate the size of the orbit. In this way the 
orbit of a star can be mapped out just as certainly as if we were able 
to see the motion in space. The size of the orbit makes no difference; 
in fact, for stars of a given mass, the smaller the orbit the faster is the 
SUN 
ee CO 
OO 
Fic. 4. Relative sizes and separations of a number of high-luminosity twin stars, with the sun for comparison. The one on the upper left is UW Canis Majoris. Notice that the close pairs are tidally distorted by their proximity and rapid rotation, but the distant pairs are not.

motion, and the easier is the double star to detect. Double stars 
found in this way from the (Doppler) velocity effect on their light 
are called spectroscopic binaries. Many hundreds are known; they 
are closer together, and their orbits more nearly circular, than for 
visual binaries.

One property of the orbit is important — the degree to which it 
is tilted toward the observer. An orbit that is presented exactly 

PAIRS OF STARS 
face-on will give no observable to-and-fro motion, so a binary that 
faces its orbit in our direction cannot be detected. If the orbit is 
more nearly edge-on, it can be detected, but (regrettably) we cannot tell exactly how much it is tipped, so that its size eludes us. If, 
however, the orbit is presented exactly edge-on, the two stars will 
pass one in front of the other regularly in every circuit, and produce 
an eclipse. If we see an eclipse (or periodic fadeout ) for a star that 
is also a spectroscopic binary, we have everything: the size of the 
orbit, its tilt, the sizes and masses of the two stars, are all determined.

\OS 
SUN 
Fic. 5. Relative sizes and separations of several twin systems as faint as, or fainter than, the sun.

(Based on a study by S. Gapeschkin.) 
The calculations, it is true, are most complicated, but in principle 
the problem can be solved. And the spectroscopic binaries that are 
also eclipsing stars are the cornerstone of all our knowledge of stellar 
dimensions. Thousands of eclipsing stars are known — stars that are 
going round in orbits that are presented to us exactly, or almost 
exactly, edge-on.

The great majority of the hotter, brighter stars are spectroscopic 
binaries; in other words, most of the stars at the top of the main 
sequence are double. There is another feature that is shared by most 

THE SCENE 
of the hot, bright stars: they tend to be spinning rapidly. As we approach the cooler, fainter stars, the proportion of binaries falls off, 
and so does the average speed of spinning. Spinning and twinning, 
as I said in the first chapter, tend to go together. And the hot, mainSUN 
Fic. 6. A group of dissimilar pairs of stars, with the sun for comparison. The system shown 
in the lower left in Algol. (Based on a study by S. Gaposchkin.) 
sequence stars, when they form twins, nearly always form identical 
twins. When we examine the bright end of the main sequence for 
dissimilar twins, almost the highest star we find, a little above Sirius, 
is the “Demon Star,” Algol.


PAIRS OF STARS 
The second brightest star in the constellation Perseus, Algol 
perhaps got its name from the fact that it gives a ghostly wink at 
intervals of rather less than three days. More careful study shows 
that it gives another, far less conspicuous, wink halfway between 
the main ones. To put the matter in more technical form: two stars 
are moving round each other with a period just under three days, and 
in a circular orbit that is presented to us almost edge-on. As one star 
passes between us and the other, it cuts off some light, and an eclipse 
takes place. One of the two stars is much fainter than the other, and 
when that one is in front, much light is cut off and a conspicuous 
eclipse occurs; when the brighter star is in front, less light is lost 
and a less marked eclipse is observed.

The brighter member of the eclipsing pair is a main-sequence 
star, a little brighter, hotter, and more massive than Sirius. The 
fainter one is a star of a kind that we have not met before; it is a 
little larger than its companion, but only one thirteenth as bright, 
of about one quarter the density, and considerably cooler at the 
surface. It is too faint to be a giant star, too bright to be on the main 
sequence; it is a typical specimen of that interesting group of stars 
known as subgiants.

Algol has some peculiarities all its own (for instance, it is a triple 
system, with one hitherto unseen component, possibly more), but 
the possession of a subgiant eclipsing companion makes it typical of 
a large group of double stars. An immense number of “Algol stars” 
are known, and all of them consist of a brighter main-sequence star 
(not very far from Sirius in dimensions) and a fainter, less dense, 
cooler subgiant star. There was a time when all the known subgiants were members of eclipsing pairs, but today we recognize that 
subgiants can exist independently as well.

Somewhere among stars similar to Sirius we find a division of 
the double stars with a main-sequence component (discovered as 
eclipsing stars and spectroscopic binaries) into two groups. One 
group contains the identical twins; the other consists of dissimilar 
twins, one of them a subgiant. The identical twins are found as 
eclipsing pairs, all the way down the main sequence. There are 
uncommon pairs that look like twins of our sun, spherical and 
slowly rotating. There are far commoner pairs, the same size, but 

THE SCENE 
much closer together, that are spinning rapidly, distorted out of the 
spherical shape by their speed of rotation. The third pair of twins in 
Castor is an eclipsing system of slow rotation, far down the main 
Fic. 7, Four giant pairs of stars; the sun is so small in comparison that if cannot be shown in the figure. The four pairs are, respectively: W Crucis, VV Gephei, Epsilon Aurigae, and Zeta 
Aurigae. The two last may be seen on the picture of the constellation Auriga, Plate 30. (Based on a 
study by S. Gaposchkin.) 
sequence. Other stars of the same size are close together, almost 
touching, and rotate and revolve with immense speed. Identical 
twins span the entire main sequence. Most of them are close to- 

PAIRS OF STARS 
gether, many almost in contact, and almost all have perfectly circular orbits.

The dissimilar twins set in for stars a little brighter than Sirius, 
and run down the main sequence from there. How far down it they 
extend is difficult to tell, When one component of a pair is a small, 
faint dwarf, the pair will manifestly be difficult to detect, for the 
eclipses will be very short and very shallow.

The most spectacular of all double stars have yet to be mentioned. These are the giant eclipsing systems — pairs that contain 
huge, distended stars that resemble Canopus, Betelgeuse, and 
Antares. Among the visual doubles we did not mention any giant 
stars, though Capella almost qualifies as a visual binary. But in 
order to see Capella as a binary we have to equip ourselves with 
artificial eyes many feet apart (the optical device known as the 
interferometer). Capella turns out to be a pair of twin giants, 
rather similar in size, brightness, weight, and color. They take about 
three months to go round each other. Stars like the components of 
Capella are very rare indeed; in fact, Capella is in some ways unique, 
with no known counterpart among the stars.

The constellation of Auriga, the Charioteer (Plate 30), contains 
other remarkable stars than Capella. When you glance at it you look 
at some of the most stupendous of known stellar twins. The system 
Zeta Aurigae is an amazing dissimilar pair of stars. These two stars 
are about equally bright. One is a very hot blue star, a hundred 
times as bright as the sun, nine times as massive, three and a half 
times the size. The other is an enormous, cool star, a supergiant. It 
weighs about sixteen times as much as the sun, but is about 245 
times the size — larger than the earth’s orbit. By a lucky accident, 
the orbit of Zeta Aurigae is presented to us almost on edge, and we 
observe an eclipse as the large, cool star passes in front of its neighbor. They take about three years to go round each other. As the 
eclipse approaches, the blue star is slightly dimmed, even before the 
red star comes in front of it. Evidently the large star has an enormous 
atmosphere, at least twice its own size. We can picture a huge network of prominences that hover above the surface, dense enough 
to cut off the light of the companion before the edge of the larger 
star reaches it. As the envelope of the cool star sweeps into line with 

THE SCENE 
the bright star in the rear, it cuts an intricate pattern across the 
spectrum of its companion, just as the earth’s atmosphere cuts a 
pattern in the sunlight that passes through it.

An even more stupendous system is that of the neighboring star 
Epsilon Aurigae. Here are two stars that make a turn round each 
other every 27 years. The brighter star is like the sun in color and 
temperature, but about 200 times as large — one of the largest and 
most luminous supergiants. The detail of its spectrum tells of an 
atmosphere of extreme tenuity. But the companion, which eclipses 
the brighter star at regular intervals of 27 years, is unlike any other 
star known. It is so cool that we have never actually seen it, and yet 
we can tell what it is like by the eclipse that it performs. It has over 
two thousand times the sun’s diameter, less than one millionth of the 
sun’s density] 
Our survey of double stars has revealed the extraordinary disparity of stellar matings. All down the main sequence we find identical twins, from the hot, luminous stars that weigh thirty or forty 
times as much as the sun, down to tiny, cool stars, perhaps a fifth of 
the sun’s weight. Most of these identical twins (though not quite 
all) are revolving very close together, almost in contact with each 
other, so that their forms are distorted out of the spherical by tidal 
attraction. There are a few—a very few — identical twins among 
the giant and supergiant stars; there is something odd about all of 
these; they have few counterparts, if any, among single stars. But we 
have also seen main-sequence stars that are mated with very different stars: unions of stars from very different parts of the sequence; 
bodies like Algol with a cool, diffuse companion that is a subgiant; 
systems like that of Sirius that contain a main-sequence star and a 
white dwarf; systems like Zeta Aurigae that consist of a bright mainsequence star and a diffuse supergiant.

We have seen white dwarfs united with main-sequence stars, 
most often faint, red ones, more rarely bluer stars like Procyon and 
Sirius. A few cases are known of white dwarf mated with white 
dwarf; and such unions may really be quite common, though they 
are difficult to observe. The unions between giant stars show even 
greater variety, and even less constant pattern — witness Capella, 
W Crucis, and Epsilon Aurigae.


PAIRS OF STARS 
If, as we believe, the members of twin systems were born together and have spent their lives in company, the complex of strange 
bedfellows, where almost any type of union seems possible, poses a 
real problem. The development of stellar character cannot depend 
on age alone, or history alone; for pairs of similar age and similar 
history have ended up in almost infinite variety.

Each of our series of intimate stellar scenes shows the present 
character and current relationship of a pair of twins. It tells little of 
the differences in history between different pairs. Something we can 
say: the give-and-take of the pull of remote stars gradually relaxes 
the closeness of the pair, and also, it seems, renders circular orbits 
elliptical. So we can see in the eclipsing and spectroscopic binaries, 
revolving close together in orbits nearly circular, pairs with a shorter 
history than the widely spaced visual double stars. Happily for us, 
the differences can be studied also on a broader scale. In the next 
chapter we shall pass from the stellar twins to the great families of 
stars, which are associated as closely as the pairs. The common traits 
of stellar families throw a flood of light on the scattered situations 
that the double stars have revealed.


4 Clusters of Stars 
The constellation Taurus, the Bull, glitters in the 
winter sky (Plate 31). His name comes down from the dawn of 
history, for he is one of the creatures that mark the path of the sun 
among the stars — the Zodiac, the Circle of the Beasts. The Babylonians called him the “Bull-in-Front,” whose encounter with the 
sun ushered in the spring. That fact serves to date him: today the 
sun passes through Pisces, the Fishes, at the vernal equinox, and 
the change speaks of the slow swinging of the axis of the earth, the 
precession of the equinoxes that changes the pole star from age to 
age. When Taurus was named, the pole star was not our familiar 
Polaris, but the star Alpha Draconis.

To the modern astronomer, Taurus has another interest than as 
part of the background for the annual motion of the sun. It contains 
groups of stars with individualities of their own, some of the most 
significant in the heavens. Taurus lies athwart the Milky Way, where 
the stellar traffic lies thickest, and here we shall find significant 
groups of travelers.

The Pleiades.— Everyone knows the Pleiades, the cluster of 
naked-eye stars that gleam in Taurus “like a swarm of golden bees” 
(Plate 21). A keen eye can see six (and early legend tells of seven, 
one of whom was lost as these daughters of Atlas fled from Orion, 
and were changed into a flock of celestial doves). The telescope 
reveals several hundred stars in a loose cluster, with the bright, 
naked-eye members bunched at the center.

The little knot of stars is no accident. They are all at the same 

CLUSTERS OF STARS 
distance from us, and careful measures show that they are all moving together through space — a party of stars traveling in company 
around the great galactic track.

If a pair of stellar twins has not come together by chance, but 
has always been a pair, how much more certainly must the Pleiades 
always have been traveling in company! The probability that they 
happen by accident to be clustered and to be moving along together 
is nil. Their clustering and their common motion alone are enough 
to assure us of their common origin.

A mere look at the Pleiades shows us that they differ very much 
in brightness. The brightest of them is a hundred thousand times 
as bright as the faintest that has been observed. If we could bring 
all the members of the cluster to the same distance as the sun, the 
brightest stars in it would be a thousand times as bright as the sun, 
the faintest would have but one hundredth of the sun’s brightness.

In imagination, the astronomer does that very thing. He lines 
up the stars of the cluster for a sort of family portrait. By careful 
measurement of brightness and color * he is able to find the temperatures, and calculate the sizes, of every member of the cluster.

The family portrait of the Pleiades embraces a large variety, not 
only of brightness, but of temperature and size as well. It is a variety 
coupled with regularity. The Pleiades form a beautifully graded 
series of stars. The brightest are also the largest and the hottest 
(bluest), and the rest run downward, from bright to faint, from 
large to small, from hot to cool. The middle stars of the sequence are 
very like the sun in size, brightness, and color. The largest are about 
nine times the sun’s size, perhaps five times its temperature at the 
surface; the smallest observed are about half the sun’s size, rather 
more than half its temperature. We cannot speak about the actual 
smallest and faintest, because probably there may be many too faint 
for us to observe.

The family portrait of the Pleiades, indeed, follows rather closely 
the backbone of the main sequence that we have already met. We 
could pick pairs of stars from the group that are related just as the 
components of Gamma Virginis, or of Castor, are related. The 
* These measurements are made by means of the accurate light-measuring device, the photoelectric photometer.


THE SCENE 
Pleiades show, on a far grander scale than any individual pair of 
double stars, the range of stellar character that can develop from a 
single beginning.

The Pleiades are close enough to us to reveal many fascinating 
details. Most of the brighter ones are spinning rapidly, and we know 
from their spectra that they are spraying atoms into the space 
around them as they spin. One of them is especially interesting: 
Pleione has blown several great chromospheric bubbles into space 
during the past fifty years, and probably has a long history of such 
events. Perhaps it was brighter in the remote past, and gave birth 
to the legend of the “Lost Pleiad”; even today it fluctuates slightly in 
brilliance.

The cluster is meshed in interstellar clouds, which scatter its 
light. The clouds are not uniform; among the stars they run in great 
streaks and striations, of such fine detail that no telescope has yet 
analyzed them down to the finest shred. Perhaps the whirling stars 
have spun some of this material out into space; it does not consist 
principally of atoms, but is in the form of solid chunks, which scatter 
light as brilliantly as snow, and probably the main part of it has 
always been floating between the stars.

The Pleiades are the brightest and nearest of such clusters, but 
they are not unique. Dozens of similar groups sprinkle the Milky 
Way, such as the beautiful little Kappa Crucis, which lies beside 
the Southern Cross near the Coal Sack and is known to southern 
observers as “The Jewel Box” (Plate 34). Probably our stellar system 
contains many hundreds. They are all groups traveling the stellar 
traffic lane; they have similar family portraits, and perhaps most of 
them are meshed in nebulosity. Because they populate the Milky 
Way, groups like the Pleiades are known as galactic clusters.* 
The Hyades. — Not all galactic clusters, however, resemble the 
Pleiades. In Taurus we see the Hyades (Plate 31), an even more 
conspicuous cluster of stars, which, with the bright star Aldebaran, 
make up the nose of the celestial Bull. Here again is a party of stars, 
close together in space, traveling in company. Aldebaran is not of 
* Sometimes they are known as open clusters, to distinguish them from the more 
compact globular clusters, which, as we shall see, are also members of our stellar 
system, but do not travel the lanes of the Milky Way, or galaxy.


CLUSTERS OF STARS 
the party; he happens to be in direct line between us and them, so 
that we see him among them, but his motion is not the same.

The Hyades, like the Pleiades, comprise a couple of hundred 
stars. If we could line them up beside the sun, we should notice two 
striking differences from the Pleiades. The brightest members are 
not more than a hundred times as bright as the sun, and not nearly 
as hot as the brightest Pleiades, and the family portraits of the two 
clusters are not identical. There are, it is true, a large number of 
stars in the Hyades — the great majority, in fact — that toe the line 
of the main sequence. But there are some that fall very far from it.

The Hyades contain several red-giant stars (indeed they are its 
brightest members), far larger than the sun, or than the brightest 
blue stars in the cluster. The red giants are not numerous ~ mainsequence stars are still the rule — but there is no doubt about their 
presence. We begin to detect a variety, in this group of stars of 
similar age and history, that recalls the variety shown by the double 
stars, main-sequence stars teamed up not only with main-sequence 
stars, but also with stars of greater size and lower density.

Some of the Hyades are actually twin systems ~ double stars 
within a star cluster. When we look for bright nebulosity such as 
enmeshes the Pleiades, we look in vain. The Hyades are not tangled 
in any visible silver braid. None the less, there is some evidence of 
dark material scattered among the stars. Only hot stars can send back 
the light of dark nebulosity and show a bright cloud: none of the 
Hyades is hot enough to do so. But there is little doubt that they, 
too, move in a cloud of dust.

Hyades and Pleiades show the typical family portraits of all the 
galactic clusters. Always we find a backbone of main-sequence stars 
that runs from hot, large, bright stars to cool, small, and faint ones.

Combined with this backbone we find varying proportions of cool 
giants — sometimes a few, as with the Hyades, sometimes more, 
sometimes, as with the Pleiades, apparently none at all.

The Double Cluster in Perseus. — Among the most beautiful of 
galactic clusters is the twin cluster in the constellation Perseus 
(Plate 32). This pair of clusters is so remote that its distance is hard 
to measure, and even today we are not sure exactly how far away it 
is. We do know that its brightest stars are among the most luminous 

THE SCENE 
known, between ten thousand and a hundred thousand times as 
bright as the sun. The backbone of its main sequence runs up to 
stars as bright as this, and at temperatures far higher than those of 
the brightest Pleiades. So remote are these two clusters that we have 
not yet observed stars in them that are of the sun’s brightness, 
though we have no reason to doubt that such stars are there. But the 
most amazing feature of the family portrait of the twin clusters in 
Perseus is the great group of red supergiants that it contains —a 
couple of dozen stars as large and as luminous as the great red 
components of the giant eclipsing stars like Zeta Aurigae and VV 
Cephei (Fig. 7). The bright, hot stars form compact twin nuclei in a 
larger system that surrounds the two clusters with a great aura of 
red stars.

The double cluster in Perseus is deep in nebulosity; one of the 
problems of measuring its distance is to circumvent the obscuring 
effect of the clouds that enfold it. And its brightest stars glow with 
the light that tells of enormous chromospheres or prominences; perhaps they are spilling matter into space; perhaps, too, they are drawing into themselves the clouds in which they lie.

We know of several hundred galactic clusters. All lie in the 
great traflic way of the Milky Way, all are parties of stars that are 
moving in company. Each is a true family, of common origin and 
similar history. Because they move in the central lane, where dust 
and fog lie thick, we see only those nearest to us — perhaps 10 percent of the whole. We may picture several thousand such clusters 
moving around the Milky Way, hundreds of thousands of members 
of these stellar groups, all with family portraits that are similar in 
general outline, but different in the proportion of stars of various 
brightnesses, sizes, and colors. The main sequences of galactic 
clusters extend down to stars that are small, faint, and red; but the 
numbers do not increase rapidly as we pass down the sequence. In 
other words, the population of a galactic cluster is like that of the 
unattached stars of our neighborhood in the kinds of stars represented, but not in their relative numbers.

Clusters like the Pleiades and Hyades strike our eye because 
they are more densely packed with stars than the regions in which 
they lie. There are some that are so widely scattered that we recog- 

CLUSTERS OF STARS 
nize them only because all their members are at about the same 
distance from us, and move through space in the same direction and 
at the same speed. Most of the stars of the Big Dipper form a real 
cluster, and only because we are almost within it do we fail to see 
that Sirius belongs to the party also. This group, which is known as 
the Ursa Major cluster, has the family portrait typical of a galactic 
cluster.

Even more widely spaced are the groups of stars that have been 
called “stellar associations” by the Russian astronomer Ambartsumian. They seem to form loose groups that are scattered among a much 
larger number of noncluster stars. Most of the hot, highly luminous 
stars, which are spraying material around them into space, seem to 
belong to these “associations.” The members seem to be distributed 
in a vast volume around one or more compact galactic clusters. In 
fact, Ambartsumian sees an association in the great aura of supergiants that enfolds the double cluster in Perseus.

If these associations of hot, bright stars are real physical groups, 
as the evidence strongly suggests, they are families of stars of similar 
origin and history, just as the galactic clusters are. They seem to 
represent only the brightest section of the family portrait, and the 
lower part of the main sequence is represented only in the compact 
clusters on which they center. They must represent a different history, or a different epoch of life, from clusters like the Pleiades.

Numerous as they are, the well-defined galactic clusters comprise but a small fraction of all the stellar travelers. Perhaps one in a 
thousand of the stars on the circular track belongs to a recognizable 
galactic cluster; even fewer are members of associations. Very likely 
there are many smaller clusters that do not strike the eye. We should 
perhaps not draw a hard-and-fast line between the compact Trapezium and the system of Castor with its six stars grouped in three 
close pairs, or between the system of Castor and those of Alpha 
Centauri, Gamma Virginis, and Sirius. The division between visual, 
spectroscopic, and eclipsing stars is an artificial one based on method 
of discovery, not on the nature of the thing discovered. In fact, 
associated systems of stars probably run all the way from the richest 
galactic clusters down to the close pairs of eclipsing stars.

Weight is given to this view by putting together all the family 

THE SCENE 
portraits of galactic clusters into one master portrait, and comparing 
it with the composite family portrait made from all known double 
and multiple stars. The general outlines have an extraordinary similarity. Double stars include every type of known star. True, the 
ce r O i.

© =) ©, | 
O O O | 
ss @ 
e 
er 
Fie. 8. Family portraits for three galactic clusters: top left, the twin Perseus clusters; top right, the Pleaides; bottom left, the Hyades. At the bottom, right, is shown a typical selection of nearby non-cluster stars. The sizes of the stars are on a conventional scale. No attempt has been made to show all the stars in any one cluster, but the whole observed range is represented, Numbers on the right show the brightness in terms of the sun. Shading indicates temperature, 
as in the other figures.

portraits of galactic clusters seem short on white dwarfs, and even 
on faint main-sequence stars — but this is more than likely to be an 
accident of position: few galactic clusters are near enough to us to 
reveal such members, even if they were present; a few white dwarfs 
are known members of galactic clusters, such as the Hyades and 
the Perseus clusters.


CLUSTERS OF STARS 
The same process can even be carried a little further. We possess 
a great deal of information about the individual stars that lie near 
to us in space. For these, too, we can compile a general family portrait, and when we do so, a striking fact emerges: the picture of our 
fellow travelers in the galactic traffic stream is very like those that 
were put together from the members of galactic clusters and double 
stars (Fig. 8). The rich variety of stellar individuals is all represented in the picture posed for us by double stars, multiple stars, 
and galactic clusters.

The vast concourse of stars — tens or hundreds of millions — that 
are moving around the galactic track forms a great family, and we 
are gradually piecing together the family portrait. We can go a step 
further. We can count the numbers of stars that occupy different 
parts of the portrait, find which are frequent, which are uncommon.

When we have made allowance for the effects of distance (which 
causes us to overestimate the numbers of bright stars at first glance) 
we find that among our near neighbors most of the stars in the 
portrait are fainter, smaller, cooler than the sun. Brighter stars become progressively rarer; giants are infrequent (especially yellow 
giants such as Capella) and supergiants so exceptional that they 
are practically negligible in the total count. We should note again 
that in galactic clusters the faint, cool stars do not seem to be 
nearly so numerous as they are in the general star field.

So common are the noncluster stars fainter than the sun that 
most of the light from the nearby family of stars comes from them.

The individual supergiants radiate a great deal; but they are so 
scarce that their total contribution is only a small fraction of the 
whole. We are inside our own system of stars, and are apt to miss 
the significance of this fact; but when we scan a very distant stellar 
system of similar make-up to our own (and, as we shall see, there 
are millions of such systems) it is important to keep in mind that 
most of its light probably comes from stars too faint to be seen.

The group of stars whose portrait we have just drawn, the group 
that moves mainly in the great circular track of the Milky Way, is 
only one family of stars. There are other stars, the stellar jaywalkers, 
that have very different motions, different distribution, and different 
properties. In order to make a broad general distinction between 

THE SCENE 
the two groups, they are often called “Population I” and “Population II.” Population I is the group that we have studied; we have 
seen its typical family portrait, have described its regular motion 
around the galactic track in the stellar traffic lane that is thick with 
lic. Se. Relations between members of visual double stars. The single stors with white-dwert 
companions are Sirius and Procyon; the three stars joined are the components of o* Eridani. The 
giant pair is Capella. The sizes are on a conventional scale.

dust and smoke. The stars that cross the great rotary in all directions 
are known as “Population II.” * Our next task will be to sketch the 
* The names “Population I and II” were originally given by Baade to the two 
groups of stars. As we shall see, they probably represent extremes rather than an 
absolute distinction, 
74 
CLUSTERS OF STARS 
family portrait of this second group of stars, and to see whether the 
remarkable differences between the two populations can be related 
to any differences in birth, history, or age.

Globular Clusters. —In the constellation Centaurus, the CenFic. 9b. Relations betteeen members of eclipsing pairs. Associated stars are joined by straight lines. The sizes are on a conventional scale; shading indicates temperature. (Based on a study by 
5S. Gaposchkin. } 
taur, is a dim, hazy naked-eye object that was named as a star — 
Omega Centauri (Plates 37 and 38). Under the telescope it appears 
as one of the most magnificent objects in the sky. It is evidently a 
gigantic ball of stars (very slightly flattened, perhaps rotating), and 
its numbers are beyond estimate — certainly hundreds of thousands, 
possibly millions. Numerous as are the stars that can be counted, far 
more are below the limit of observation. The cluster shines with the 

THE SCENE 
brightness of nearly a million suns; and if, as in our neighborhood, 
stars fainter than our sun are in the majority, the population must 
indeed exceed a million.

Omega Centauri is a typical globular cluster, over the average in 
size, perhaps, and unusually close to us. About a hundred globular 
clusters are known in our stellar system — possibly as many more 
have escaped observation because of distance or dimming. But 
globular clusters are not so generally hidden from us as galactic 
clusters, for they do not cling to the central dust layer of the Milky 
Way. Instead of being confined to a flat layer, they are arranged in a 
nearly spherical group that outlines our system of stars. Many of 
them are, so to speak, seen overhead, rather than through the thick 
layer of dust that blankets our flat traffic way.

The globular clusters lie far above and below the central layer, 
and their paths intersect it at all angles. They are huge, crowded 
parties of stars that move athwart the circular paths of Population I.

Our own rapid circular motion makes us seem to approach them — 
or them to approach us — from one direction. As a group they seem 
to be going the opposite way. But that is an illusion. Just as an 
object seen from a moving train seems to be flying backward, so the 
group of globular clusters as a whole seems to be moving backward 
at great speed. When we make allowance for our own motion round 
the galactic rotary, the system of globular clusters (as a whole) is 
seen to have little rotation — little motion round the traffic circle.* 
Even though the globular clusters, considered as a group, seem 
to have little rotational motion round the Milky Way, the individuals 
are all moving very fast — with speeds, indeed, comparable to our 
own speed around the track — but in all possible directions. They 
cut across our path at all angles, and their almost spherical distribution is the result. We shall find that other individual stars that do 
not follow our traffic Jane are distributed in similar ways; the less 
they obey the rule of the rotary, the more are they distributed in a 
thick system that approaches the spherical, instead of in the thin 
layer that lies within the central filling of dust.

* Whether the globular clusters, as a group, possess any total rotational motion is 
a difficult question to answer; their distribution, among other things, suggests that at 
least they have rather little.


CLUSTERS OF STARS 
Let us line up the members of a globular cluster for a family 
portrait. Omega Centauri, unfortunately, has never posed, but several of the northern globular clusters, such as the Great Cluster in 
Hercules, have been carefully portrayed. The composite picture is 
very unlike that of a galactic cluster (Fig. 10). The brightest stars 
are less than a thousand times as bright as the sun, much inferior to 
the bright members of galactic clusters. And — more striking still — 
10000 
Fic. 10, Typical family portrait for a globular cluster. Broken circles are somewhat con- jectural. The great majority of the bright stars in the cluster follow the line that runs 
diagonally from the top right to the lower left; only a few are shown. The sizes are on a conventional scale. Brightness, in terms of the sun, is indicated on the right.

the brightest stars are the reddest, coolest, and largest, not the bluest 
and hottest, as in the Pleiades. A few globular clusters do contain 
some blue stars, but they are most exceptional — more so than the 
red giants in galactic clusters. The contrast between the family 
portraits of globular and galactic clusters is unmistakable. There are 
differences of detail, too, on which we need not for the moment 
dwell — differences that show that surface conditions of the stars, as 
well as gross appearance, differ between the two populations.

Very recent studies of globular clusters, by Arp, Baum, and 
Sandage, have contained a most significant suggestion. The brighter 

THE SCENE 
stars lie on a sequence that runs from bright, large, red toward 
fainter, smaller, cooler stars, as Shapley showed many years since.

In fact it seems to run in a direction almost opposite to that of the 
main sequence that forms the backbone of the family portrait for a 
galactic cluster. The new results show that it draws near to the 
main sequence for stars a little fainter than the sun, and below this 
point the two portraits seem to run together.

The behavior of the stars in the globular and galactic clusters 
shows a contrast too. Many globular clusters are rich in certain 
kinds of variable stars — the rapidly pulsing “RR Lyrae stars,” with 
periods less than a day, and the more slowly pulsing “RV Tauri” 
and “W Virginis” stars that have peculiar light curves and spectra.

Variable stars are practically unknown in galactic clusters. Population I does, indeed, include some variable stars, such as the Cepheids 
mentioned in the first chapter; but the kinds of variables common in 
globular clusters are quite foreign to Population I.

The variable stars that inhabit globular clusters differ from one 
system to another. Some clusters contain over a hundred RR Lyrae 
stars, others few or none; and the distribution of the vibration 
periods also differs from cluster to cluster. The Mount Wilson study 
of family portraits strongly suggests that different variable-star 
peculiarities are linked with differences in the precise course of the 
red-to-blue, bright-to-faint branches of the family portraits. Here we 
have a fascinating clue, as yet unexploited, to differences of age 
and history between globular clusters.

Even Omega Centauri, one of the nearest of all globular clusters, 
is so far away that stars as bright as the sun are difficult to observe 
there, and stars much fainter are quite inaccessible. We have no 
reason to doubt that such stars are commonest in the globular 
clusters, just as in our own district. But at present our knowledge of 
their numbers and properties is most exiguous. My own belief is that 
the family portraits of globular and galactic clusters, so unlike for 
the brighter stars, will be found to merge for the faint ones; that the 
two types of cluster, and the populations that they typify, rest, so to 
speak, on the same base, and fan out differently only higher up. And 
I will anticipate the conclusion of a later chapter, and hazard that 
the difference in the manner of fanning out is a matter of age: the 

CLUSTERS OF STARS 
globular clusters (Population II) show the portrait of a much older 
family of stars than the galactic clusters (Population I). Bright stars 
do not wear as well as faint ones. Very luminous stars, the stellar 
prodigals, exhaust themselves early; faint stars, less luminous than 
the sun, husband their resources so that they continue to shine with 
little alteration from age to age. The basis for this conclusion must 
be left for a later chapter.

We saw that the family portrait of the galactic clusters is reproduced by the composite picture of all the stars that are moving round 
the galactic rotary. There is another group of stars that give a composite picture very like that of the globular clusters — the individual 
stars that are moving across the galactic track, the “high-velocity 
stars.” 
Most stars in our neighborhood move nearly in the same way as 
the sun, circling the galaxy within the central sandwich of dust and 
haze. But some stars, like the globular clusters, cut across our path 
at all angles. They, too, seem all to be moving in one direction, 
because we see in them the reflection of our own motion round the 
circle. Actually they are threading the stellar system in all directions 
and at all angles. We call them the “high-velocity stars,” though 
actually their speeds are no higher than the sun’s. But we are moving with the main stream of traffic, and their motions, athwart our 
own, loom large because they are in a different direction.

These high-velocity stars include many sorts. When we piece 
them together into a composite portrait, we get something much 
more like the picture of the globular cluster than that of the galactic 
cluster. The variable stars of the kinds common in the globular 
clusters, when found by themselves, all prove to be high-velocity 
stars. Because they cut across the central Jayer at all sorts of angles, 
they are seen at a variety of heights above it. There is no doubt that 
they constitute a great globular haze of stars all round the central 
dust layer, and little doubt that they really make up the bulk of the 
population of our stellar system. This latter fact is far from obvious 
to us, for the traffic round the rotary is fairly dense in our vicinity — 
denser than the haze of jaywalkers. But in some parts of our stellar 
system the high-velocity stars are far more densely crowded, and 
the rotary traffic all but nonexistent. We might, in fact, scarcely 

THE SCENE 
suspect this to be the case if we had observed stars within our 
system only. But when we look across the emptiness of space at other 
systems that are very like our own, we see the two populations in 
their true proportions — rotary traffic limited to restricted lanes, and 
a gigantic globe of Population II stars that surrounds and pervades 
everything. These distant views of other stellar systems, and the 
comparison with our own, will be the theme of the next chapter.

The galactic clusters, it will be remembered, move in the layer 
of dust and atoms, and often illuminate or irradiate the interstellar 
clouds. No such environment seems to pervade the globular clusters.

They show no sign of dark, obscuring material, and no nebular atoms 
glow within them. Probably these great clusters of stars are nearly, 
or quite, free of interstellar material. As we shall learn in a later 
chapter, this difference of environment has probably been a potent 
factor in their development.


5 Systems of Stars 
W. have met the individual members of the cast of 
our cosmic drama: stars, dust, and gas. We have studied intimate 
situations: double stars, multiple stars, clusters of stars. Let us look 
at some panoramas of the whole stage, arrested in a moment of 
action.

Almost all the players that we have hitherto met are members 
of our own stellar system. Our system of stars is one among 
millions, by no means all alike. What would it look like if we could 
survey it from a point outside it? 
Our stellar system is very difficult to survey, and in the second 
chapter we have already seen the reason for the difficulty. The sun 
moves in the main traflicway, which is thick with a ground fog of 
dust, haze, and interstellar smoke. Comparatively nearby stars in the 
central layer are obscured by the fog, and the more distant parts 
are hidden altogether. The problem of surveying our own stellar 
system is as hard as that of making a map of a large and smoky city 
from one point in the thick of the traffic.

A beginning can be made by counting the stars of different 
brightnesses that are seen in different directions. Many millions of 
stars are accessible with modern telescopes, and to count all of 
them would be impossible and unnecessary; one chooses a number 
of sample regions for the census. But the census is only the first step; 
if we are to find out from our sample counts how many stars the 
whole system contains, we must make allowance for the number 
obscured or cut off by the fog.

Even this is not so easy as it sounds. Faint stars seen in any 

THE SCENE 
direction may be faint for several reasons. Perhaps they really shine 
very feebly, like Proxima Centauri, which we see only because it is 
extremely near to us. Perhaps they are very bright, but extremely 
distant from us. Or perhaps they are behind one or more patches 
of fog, and therefore nearer to us than they seem. This is actually 
the case for all very luminous, distant stars, and allowance must be 
made for it in mapping our stellar system, the galaxy.

The distances of a very few stars can be measured geometrically, 
if they are close enough to show an appreciable displacement 
(parallax), which reflects the earth’s annual motion round the sun.

These stars are most useful, for they furnish the yardstick for more 
distant ones. If we line up all the stars whose distances can be 
measured, so that they are seen in their true relation to one another, 
certain regularities appear. These mass pictures are very like the 
family portraits of star clusters that we met in the last chapter. Many 
of the regularities make it possible to tell how bright a star is, for 
example, if its color (temperature or spectrum) can be ascertained, 
and if we know to what kind of family it belongs. Both galacticcluster (Population I) and globular-cluster (Population II) families 
have their own regularities, and if a star can be assigned to one of 
them, its properties are usually fixed, its brightness and distance 
are known, and it can be placed in the map.

The whole difficulty lies in assigning the star to the right population; and here the star’s motion may be called in to settle the 
question. Population I stars are going round the circular track.

Members of Population IT tend to be high-velocity stars, which are 
crossing the track at all angles. The motion separates the stars only 
roughly, for a few stars of Population II may happen to be moving 
with the stream, but for a vast number of stars whose distances cannot otherwise be determined, it enables us to place them in the mass 
portrait, to determine what they are like and therefore where 
they are.

The laborious patching together of information on the properties and motions of stars within our stellar system gives a fairly 
clear picture of the whole. The great complex of stars within which 
the sun moves has a comparatively thin central layer — the dusty, 
smoky filling of the cake (to use the simile of the second chapter).


SYSTEMS OF STARS 
The filling is probably circular, and about a hundred thousand 
light-years across from edge to edge. Its thickness is very small in 
comparison — between two and three thousand light-years, little 
more than 2 percent of its width. The sun is at a great distance from 
the center —nearly thirty thousand light-years—and less than 
twenty thousand light-years from the edge.

The rotary stream of stellar traffic moves within the thin circular 
layer of filling. The sun takes about two hundred million years to 
travel once round the track. Stars farther from the center than the 
sun take even longer; stars nearer the center, which move rather 
faster, make the circuit in a shorter time, These differences in speed 
round the rotary, small as they are, constitute our evidence for the 
motions within the stream of stellar traffic.

The layer of filling, and the stars that move in it, mark the course 
of the Milky Way — the hazy band of light that runs round the sky 
and is resolved by the telescope into myriads of stars, variegated 
by patches of dust and by luminous nebulae that scatter or transform the starlight.

If there were no dust or haze in the layer that marks the Milky 
Way, the direction toward the center of the system (in the constellations Sagittarius and Ophiuchus) would shine with a blaze of 
light as compared with the direction toward the edge nearest to us 
(in Taurus and Canis Major). The dust lies particularly thick in the 
direction of the center itself, and hides the nucleus of our stellar 
system from eye and photograph; but redder light comes through 
more easily (it is scattered less), and with radio waves, or even 
infrared light, the central regions begin to give a hint of their true 
brilliance.

Even though we cannot see the great bulk of stars toward the 
center of our system, there are plenty of clues (when we know where 
to look for them) that show that we are really nearer the edge.

Stars with the earmarks of high luminosity are observed at distances 
of thirty thousand light-years, and more, in the direction of the 
center — but no such luminous distant stars are to be seen in the 
opposite direction.

The traffic density is not the same in all parts of the great rotary.

On the whole the stars grow denser as we look toward the hub of the 

THE SCENE 
system, the nucleus about which the galaxy turns. But the star density 
has definite ups and downs in both directions. It was the Dutch 
astronomer Oort and the Swedish astronomer Lindblad who first 
recognized the rotary motion in our system for what it is; and it 
was Oort who also noticed that the circular stream of traffic has its 
densely crowded lanes, with more sparsely traveled zones between 
them. We seem to be on the inner edge of one thickly traveled zone, 
and another, even more populous, runs nearer the nucleus of our 
galaxy.

Other galaxies, as we shall see, display similar variations of the 
traffic density, which are disposed in graceful spiral coils about their 
nuclei. Most astronomers believe that even in our own system there 
is evidence of spiral arms, that lie coiled in the central filling and 
move within it. Actual spiral structure within the galaxy is difficult 
to trace by mapping the distribution of stars; we can see the details 
only in small segments of the circle, and even these are broken up 
by the patches of nearby obscuring matter. But most of the patchwork map that we have been able to construct fits into the spiral 
attern if we are careful to choose the right stars in making it.

The travelers par excellence around the central track are the stars 
of Population I, which we met in the last chapter. The rotational 
motion in the galaxy is shown best of all by the hot, luminous stars 
that occupy the upper part of the main sequence — such stars as the 
brightest Pleiades, and the high-temperature members of the great 
Double Cluster of Perseus. Our most reliable information about the 
rotation of the galaxy was obtained from this group of stars by the 
Canadian astronomers J. S. Plaskett and Joseph Pearce.

The highly luminous, hot stars are a natural choice for such a 
study, because they are visible at immense distances, and the details 
of their spectra make possible (with the necessary precautions) the 
measurement of these distances, which are essential ingredients of 
the picture. The principal precaution that must be taken is the allowance for dimming by obscuring material, a serious factor for 
just this group of stars, because they lie, almost without exception, 
within the central layer of dust and fog. The dimming can be 
measured, in the manner described in Chapter 2, by the amount 
of reddening that it produces. The delicate precision of the photo- 

SYSTEMS OF STARS 
electric cell has been applied to these measures by Stebbins and 
his associates, with the result that we know the true distances of 
over a thousand of the hot, luminous stars — a better showing than 
for a comparable sample of stars of any other kind.

But we did not choose the hot, luminous stars to survey the spiral 
structure of our galaxy only because they are readily singled out.

They actually follow the spiral structure more closely than stars of 
any other kind. If our observations were confined to our own galaxy 
we might not have realized this extremely important fact; but it is 
forced upon us by the study of other galaxies that are near enough 
for us to recognize similar stars there. The arms of the great galaxy 
in Andromeda are traced out, as we shall see, by the bright, hightemperature stars. Here we have one of the cardinal facts of stellar 
evolution, and we shall explore some of its consequences later.

These hot supergiant stars have effects on their environment.

The great Nebula of Orion is but one of innumerable gas clouds that 
are illuminated and stimulated to a brilliant glow by hot stars that 
lie within them. The omnipresent gas that drifts within the central 
layer of the galaxy will betray its presence if a high-temperature 
supergiant is near enough to call forth the nebular spectrum from 
its atoms.

When the spiral structure of our galaxy was surveyed in the 
light of the nebulae that wreathe the hot supergiants, it began to 
stand out for the first time in clear and spectacular fashion. Quite 
recently W. W. Morgan and his associates at the Yerkes Observatory, 
by an ingenious and beautiful technique, have actually photographed 
the course of the spiral arms of our galaxy in nebular light. For the 
first time the arms stand out clearly; Morgan has delineated two for a 
distance of some six thousand light-years, and located a probable 
third. A picture that was only vaguely sketched before begins to 
take definite outlines.

The bright nebulae shine because hot stars are near them, and 
no doubt great tracts of interstellar gas remain unseen because they 
lack a stimulating star. But the affiliation is no mere accident. For 
what we know of the motions of the bright nebulae tells us that they, 
too, are coursing round the circular track with speed similar to that 
of the stars. There is a connection between hot supergiants and 

THE SCENE 
nebulae scarcely less intimate than that between groups of stars that 
are moving in company. Of the probable cause and possible effects 
of the relation we shall speak in a later chapter.

The hot, bright stars display the galactic rotation more clearly 
than any other group. But there are other luminous stars, which 
are restricted to the central layer of the galaxy, and share the 
rotational motion. Such are the Cepheid variables, the pulsing stars 
that we met in the first chapter. They are certainly members of 
Population I. They lie in the central layer, and Joy, at Mount Wilson, 
has shown definitely that they move around the circular track.

Cepheid variables, however, are not such dyed-in-the-wool 
members of Population I as the high-temperature supergiants. We 
look for them in vain in the galactic clusters and in the stellar 
associations of Ambartsumian. It is true that Cepheid variables are 
scarce in the galaxy; perhaps there is one Cepheid to half a million 
stars of Population J. But the hot supergiants are at least as scarce, 
and they are well represented in the galactic clusters.

The five hundred Cepheids that are known at present can be 
spotted on the map of the galaxy, but not, it is true, as accurately as 
the hot stars. We know their true brightness from the periodluminosity relation, but when we try to correct their distances for 
obscurations we run into a more difficult problem, or at least a bigger 
one. Much work must be done before we know their true colors, and 
can measure how much they are reddened, for their changing 
brightness multiplies enormously the labor of determining both 
these things. Here again we must depend on the delicate methods of 
photoelectric photometry.

The map that shows the probable positions of the Cepheids within 
the galaxy does not show the clear-cut spiral structure that is 
revealed by the bright nebulae and by the hot supergiants. It is as 
if the Cepheids are spread out into a sheet while the supergiants are 
distributed in definite lanes, The sheet is a thin one, for the Cepheids 
hug the plane of the galaxy; but for them the clear-cut spiral structure 
seems blurred.

Stars of Population I are not confined to the luminous stars, 
either the hot supergiants or the Cepheids. They comprise the fainter 
associated stars that people the main sequence in enormous numbers 

SYSTEMS OF STARS 
as far as the very cool dwarfs. Most stars in our neighborhood belong 
to this family, and move round the circular track. Perhaps a thousand 
million galactic stars inhabit, and move in, the central filling of the 
galaxy. But none seem to show the structural pattern as clearly as 
those that inhabit the upper end of the main sequence.

But the stars in the central layer are not the only — indeed 
perhaps not the most important — part of our galactic system. The 
high-velocity stars represent Population II —the typical globularcluster family. Here are no spendthrift stars; the brightest have little 
more than a hundred times the sun’s luminosity. Here are no bright, 
hot stars, no-Wolf-Rayet stars, no Cepheid variables. But the population teems with RR Lyrae stars, which pulsate in hours rather than 
days. It contains subgiants, it contains subdwarfs, and apparently 
its fainter members are indistinguishable (save by position and 
motion ) from the fainter stars of Population I. Above all, it contains 
the globular clusters.

By position and speed we distinguish Population IY. The reflection of our rotary motion makes them all seem to be traveling one 
way, but actually they move almost indiscriminately, crossing the 
central layer at all angles, and therefore reaching to great distances 
above it and below it. If Population I is a thin central slice, Population IT is a spherical or spheroidal haze that encloses the whole. We 
know of RR Lyrae stars thirty thousand light-years above the galactic 
plane.

The greatest and most spherical system of all is that of the 
globular clusters, a hundred or more dense globes of stars arranged 
nearly in a sphere about the galactic system.

To the globular clusters we owe our realization of the immense 
size of the galactic system, and of our position within it. Only a 
few decades ago the sun was thought to be at or near the center 
of a system of stars, a few hundred light-years across. It was Shapley 
who realized that the globular clusters are grouped about the center 
of the galaxy; that the system must therefore be tens of thousands 
of light-years across; and that we must lie far from its center — 
nearer, indeed, to one of the edges. The broadening of our horizon 
that resulted from this revelation marked the beginnings of a 
totally new conception of the universe. Today we talk of, and 

THE SCENE 
measure, hundreds of millions of light-years, instead of mere 
hundreds. The radius of the astronomer’s domain has been multiplied 
by a million in the past half-century; its volume by a million million 
million.

The globular or spheroidal system of stars that makes up Population IT is probably much denser toward the center of our galaxy than 
in our own neighborhood. We lie near its outer fringes, where its 
stars are sparsely distributed, and from a glance at our own environs 
we grossly underestimate their numbers. They probably constitute 
at least 90 percent of all the inhabitants of the galaxy.

We may think of Population IE as a sort of gigantic globular 
cluster that encircles and includes the whole system, with smaller 
globular clusters embedded in it. Other galaxies show an enormous 
increase of star density toward their centers, and there is every 
reason to think that our own is similar.

In the past few years, surveys have actually been made of 
regions comparatively close to the nucleus of our galaxy, and they 
show a very great increase in the density of the typical Population 
II stars such as the RR Lyrae variables. The planetary nebulae and 
novae (also probably characteristic of Population II), are found to 
be greatly concentrated toward the galactic nucleus; and this concentration is doubtless a characteristic of the population as a whole.

The globular haze is really the main body of our stellar system.

It is probably without any structure; it does not partake of the condensations that suggest spiral arms. It extends throughout the whole 
galaxy in a continuous haze of stars. Very likely it comprises ten to 
a hundred times as many stars as the Population I stars that move 
within the central layer, perhaps a hundred thousand million. It is 
the real, permanent population of the galaxy; the stars of the dust 
lane are few by comparison, perhaps a mere thousand million — 
and many of them, as we shall see, are (cosmically speaking) 
ephemeral.

We do not know how close to the center the layer of dust filling 
extends. We are almost certain that it does not pass right through the 
center — it is not so much a layer as a sort of doughnut of dust.

The center is probably a great, dense globe of Population II stars, 
essentially free of dust or haze. From observations of our own galaxy 

SYSTEMS OF STARS 
we could scarcely make this statement; but comparison with other, 
similar systems, makes it fairly certain.

The Andromeda Galaxy. — Far from the confines of our galaxy, 
seen through the stars of Andromeda, lies another great stellar 
system, about 750,000 light-years away (Plate 39). It was noted 
more than a hundred years ago by the French astronomer Messier, 
who was hunting for comets. Messier found that he was bedeviled 
in his search by a number of hazy-looking objects, which disappointed him by remaining stationary among the stars, as no comet 
would do. He made a list of objects that should be disregarded by 
comet seekers; the galaxy in Andromeda was No. 31 of his list of 104 
objects. While looking for the smallest and most inconsiderable 
members of the cosmic population, he calmly set aside about a 
hundred great systems of stars. His list contains the brightest globular 
clusters, and also a number of galaxies, many over a million lightyears away. They are often identified by the number that he gave 
them: thus the Andromeda galaxy is frequently known as “Messier 
31.” In fact, Messier is remembered today for his list of “disappointing objects,” rather than for his study of comets.

The galaxy in Andromeda is about as bright as our own, contains nearly as many stars, and is almost as large. Most galaxies are 
smaller. The progress of astronomy has successively shown that the 
earth is a small planet, not at the center of the solar system; that the 
sun is a small star, not at the center of the galaxy; and that our 
galaxy is only one among billions. We retain but one distinction.

We believe that our own stellar system is one of the biggest. Will 
this proud claim, too, be disallowed by advancing knowledge? 
Apart from the small difference in size, the Andromeda galaxy 
looks from here very much as the galactic system would look from 
there. It is presented to us nearly on edge. Actually it must be 
circular, and the fact that we see it in elliptical projection shows 
that its central layer is tilted toward us at about 75°. An observer 
there would see our own galaxy more nearly face-on, tipped at about 
70°.

The first feature that strikes the eye in the Andromeda galaxy is 
the coiled spiral arms that wind round the bright center (Plate 40).

These are the counterparts of the traffic lanes of our own stellar 

THE SCENE 
system. Like them, the spiral arms are moving in a layer of dust 
and gas, and are studded with bright nebulae. Very luminous blue 
stars lie in the arms, just as in our own system. Messier 31 is so far 
away that no star less than a hundred times as bright as the sun 
can be seen there as an individual. A star as bright as Sirius would 
be of about the twenty-first magnitude, barely visible on photographs taken with the most powerful telescope. Sunlike stars there 
are beyond our ken, and probably will be so for a long time to come.

All the bright stars in the arms (chiefly hot blue stars like Rigel or 
Alnitam, or groups of such stars, like the Perseus clusters and the 
Pleiades), are typical of Population I, and so are the bright nebulae.

We see evidence of the central dust sandwich in the streaks of dark 
material that lie against the bright star groups in the arms. The dust 
—and the Population I stars — cease abruptly at a point near the 
bright nucleus, and evidently the central portion, which is by far 
the most brilliant, is clean of haze and dust.

The spiral arms of the Andromeda galaxy can be rather vaguely 
made out on an ordinary photograph; but a photograph in hydrogen 
light, which picks out the bright nebulae, is a revelation. The outer 
arms, photographed by Baade at Mount Wilson, are marked out 
clearly, narrow bands studded with the glowing gas near the bright, 
hot stars, just as the arms of our own galaxy were first definitely 
outlined in nebular light.

Many bright Cepheids are known in Messier 31. We first 
realized that this system is a great spiral, hundreds of thousands of 
light years away, when Hubble discovered these Cepheids and 
inferred their true brightness from the period-luminosity curve.

Up to that time, less than thirty years ago, opinion was divided as to 
whether the spiral galaxies were small, nearby objects, perhaps even 
inside our own system, or “island universes” at immense distances.

Hubble’s discovery opened up a new world of distant systems, which 
today we count by billions.

The Cepheids discovered by Hubble are among the bright stars 
of the Andromeda galaxy, and stand out clearly on the structure of 
the system. We can probably assume that, like the Cepheids of our 
own galaxy, they lie in a fairly thin central layer. In our own system 
the Cepheids seem to be spread in a thin sheet, rather than con- 

SYSTEMS OF STARS 
centrated in the arms, like the hot supergiants, and in Messier 31 
also they seem to be distributed between the spiral arms. Only since 
Baade made his spectacular photographs of the delicate narrow coils, 
studded with bright nebulae, has this been apparent; and it confirms the vaguer impression given by the Cepheid map of our own 
system.

The bright center of Messier 31 long remained “unresolved”; 
it had not been seen as consisting of discernible stars (Plate 41).

There was no doubt that it actually consisted of stars, not of bright 
nebulosity; the spectrum was that of stars, and showed none of the 
bright radiations typical of gaseous nebulae. Evidently the stars 
were simply too faint to be seen as individuals, fainter than the 
bright stars of the arms.

The resolution of the central regions of the Andromeda galaxy 
was one of the great observational feats of the last decade. It was 
achieved by Baade, at Mount Wilson Observatory. Baade reasoned 
that if the stars in the nucleus are reddish, they should affect redsensitive plates more than blue plates; and by a careful choice of 
plates and exposures, and great dexterity in guiding the telescope, 
he succeeded in photographing the individual stars of the nucleus, 
near the limit of the red plates.

The picture of the nucleus shows an unbelievable number of 
stars, crowded into a structureless mass. “It looks,” as one of the 
first to see it remarked, “like a heap of pepper.” The brightest of its 
stars was nearly at the limit of the 100-inch telescope —a little 
brighter than Sirius. The fact that they show better in red light than 
in blue shows that they are reddish. In fact, they are exactly like 
the brightest stars in the globular clusters, and the whole nucleus of 
the Andromeda galaxy resembles a globular cluster on an enormous 
scale, greatly condensed in the center, and distributed about it in 
a structureless mass that is probably almost spherical.

The nucleus of Messier 31 has other things in common with a 
globular cluster besides the colors and brightness of its brightest stars.

It seems completely free of dust and gas; the absence of gas is seen 
when the spectrum is examined, and the absence of dust, when the 
nuclear regions are seen actually to be transparent! *° Of course, 
* T am indebted to Dr. Baade for this information.

9]
THE SCENE 
there are no individual stars to be seen behind the Andromeda 
galaxy, which is far beyond the confines of our stellar system. But 
myriads of other stellar systems are even more remote. In the region 
of the arms such systems are not to be seen because of the obscuring 
power of the dust in the central layer — but they are seen through 
the nucleus, and they are also seen between the arms.

How large is the nucleus of the Andromeda galaxy? It extends 
out to the point where the spiral arms begin; and it is seen again 
in the spaces between the arms. In fact, it is actually an enormous 
spheroid of stars that enfolds the whole system, arms and all. The 
peppering of stars (less dense than in the central regions) pervades 
the whole system. We are reminded of the great haze of Population 
II stars that underlies the entire structure of our galaxy, and we 
cannot doubt that the great mass of stars that underlies the structure 
of Messier 31 is of exactly the same nature. They have all the properties of Population II: the brightest stars are also the reddest, and 
they are not accompanied by interstellar dust or gas.

A careful study of the brightness of the arms of the Andromeda 
galaxy, as compared with the brightness of the Population II substratum, shows without question that the Population IT stars form 
the immense majority. The arms show up because they contain 
individual bright stars and nebulae; but the bulk of the stars, very 
likely 99 percent of them (mostly invisible to us as individuals), 
belongs to the underlying substratum, which extends in a structureless haze throughout the entire system.

Comparison of the transparency of the arms and the regions 
that lie between them contributes another fact that we should 
hardly have discovered from a study of our own stellar system.

There is no obscuration between the arms; the densely peppered 
intermediate regions are quite transparent, and distant galaxies 
show through them undimmed. Very likely our own system has 
similar structure; dust and smoke and interstellar gas are really 
confined to the stellar traffic ways, which are separated by clean 
regions. The point that Population I stars like the hot supergiants 
are invariably associated with dust and gas, and that they do not 
occur in dustless regions, is made with convincing force.

If the underlying substratum of the galaxy in Andromeda con- 

SYSTEMS OF STARS 
sists of Population II stars, we should expect it to be rich in the 
objects that are most typical of that population in the galaxy — the 
globular clusters and the rapidly pulsing RR Lyrae stars. Globular 
clusters are bright — from ten thousand times to a million times as 
bright as our sun — and easily seen at the distance of Messier 31.

About two hundred of them have been found in the system, and 
distant though they be, they can be seen to have the slightly fuzzy 
outlines that show them to be star clusters. They have the same 
color as our own globular clusters, and about the same brightness,° 
and without doubt they are arranged, like our own, in an almost 
spherical system about the great spiral.

The RR Lyrae stars are more difficult to detect, as they are about 
at the limit of detectability with the means by which the nucleus 
was first resolved. Very recent information, however, obtained with 
the greater resources of the 200-inch telescope, reveals vast numbers 
of variable stars within the nucleus, and although these have not 
yet received detailed analysis, there is a possibility that the RR Lyrae 
stars of the substratum have been reached.+ 
Our present knowledge of the Andromeda galaxy is not confined 
to analysis of its structure. Luckily for us, it is tipped toward us in 
such a way that its rotation can be measured. The form suggests a 
pinwheel, and the spectroscope shows that Messier 31 is indeed 
spinning rapidly, and in a rather complex way. The rotation is not 
like that of a wheel, in which the whole structure turns like a solid 
body and maintains its shape. The motion of the central portion is 
indeed wheellike; but the outer portions show differentia] motions 
that are faster as we recede from the center, and fall off again at the 
extreme edge. Clearly the system cannot maintain its shape, and the 
arms must be gradually twisting into new forms as time goes on.

How will the unequal rotation change the shape of Messier 31? 
Curiously enough, although the reality and size of the rotational 
* There is actually rather a puzzling difference of about a magnitude in the average brightness; but this may be a result of slight uncertainty in our determination of the distances either of the galactic globular clusters or of those in Messier 31, which have necessarily been made hitherto by rather different methods.

t If this proves to be true, the distance of Messier 81 will be determined without 
uncertainty, and the problem of the brightness of its globular clusters, as compared to 
those of the galaxy, will be resolved at once.


THE SCENE 
motions is admitted by everybody, there is a great difference of 
opinion as to how the structure is actually changing. The reason is 
that we cannot tell from mere inspection which edge of the system 
is nearer to us. If the edge that shows the darkest lanes is nearer, the 
outer arms are trailing behind, and the system is winding its spiral 
arms more closely with time. But if the other edge is the nearer, the 
spirals are unwinding and the outer arms are going ahead.

Most astronomers, I believe (and I am of their number), think 
that the dark lanes that run across the edge of the nucleus are on the 
near side; but there is also weighty opinion to the contrary. Some 
additional evidence is furnished by the globular clusters: if we take 
them to form a spherical system, those that lie behind the obscuration of the arms, as seen from our position, should be fainter, on the 
whole, than those that lie on this side of the central dust layer. The 
evidence of the globular clusters agrees with that given by the 
central obscurations that seem to be projected against the nucleus, 
and indicate that the spiral is winding itself up, with the outer 
arms trailing. The question, as we shall see in a later chapter, is 
fundamental to an understanding of the development of spiral 
galaxies, and therefore of the stars of which they are made.

No account of Messier 31 is complete without mention of the 
novae, or new stars, that have appeared in it. One supernova was 
observed in 1885 — the closest supernova of modern times. These 
colossal explosions, in which a giant star seems to be almost completely demolished, are one of the great puzzles of astronomy, and 
we have made too little progress in solving it, chiefly because recent 
supernovae have been far off and faint, so that the crucial studies 
of their spectra were hard to make. The supernova in Messier 31 was 
of the sixth magnitude, and if it appeared today it would probably 
lead to a complete solution of the mystery. It is an ironic thought 
that if this spiral were only 0.1 percent farther from us than it is, 
the light of the supernova would have spent longer on its travels, and 
would not have arrived until we had the resources of modern 
spectroscopy at our command! 
Besides the supernova, about a hundred “ordinary” novae have 
been found in the system during the past quarter of a century, 
largely through the work of Hubble, as many as have been 

SYSTEMS OF STARS 
recorded in the whole history of our own galaxy. If we make allowance for the fact that some novae in our own system have been 
missed, it seems that new stars are about equally common in the 
two systems. In our own galaxy the novae seem to belong to Population II (though this is still open to some debate), and in Messier 31 
they seem to be distributed more or less like the Population II 
objects; for example, the majority have appeared in the nuclear 
regions, where no Cepheid variables, typical of Population I, have 
occurred. It seems, however, that the novae, both in our galaxy and 
in the Andromeda galaxy, are distributed in a system more flattened 
and less spherical than that of the globular clusters.

On the whole, our own galaxy and Messier 31 seem to be very 
similar in structure and in population. They seem to be about 
equally bright; our own system is apparently rather larger (though 
Messier 31 can be seen, with special means, to extend far beyond 
the confines that appear on an ordinary photograph), and rather 
more massive. In our own system, there is a mass of perhaps one or 
two hundred thousand million suns; in Messier 31, perhaps half as 
much; but this conclusion is necessarily very tentative.

The Companions of the Andromeda Galaxy. — The Andromeda 
galaxy is not an isolated system; it has two (probably four) faint 
companion galaxies, of which the two brightest are conspicuous on 
all photographs of the system itself. All four are much smaller and 
much less luminous; but the difference does not end there.

The companions to the Andromeda galaxy are quite structureless 
(Plates 44 and 50). They have no spiral arms, they contain practically no dust or gas, and they are of beautifully symmetrical form.

Such systems, which are very common in space, are called, from 
their appearance, elliptical galaxies. For a long time they remained 
unresolved into stars; but from their spectra there was no doubt that 
they were purely stellar.

The feat of resolving the companions to Messier 31 was achieved 
by Baade at the same time as the resolution of its own nucleus, and 
their population proved to be exactly similar. They consist of 
Population II stars only, and (save for dimensions and brightness) 
they resemble gigantic globular clusters.

This statement must be slightly qualified. A few isolated patches 

THE SCENE 
of obscuration are seen; within them, and there only, blue stars 
typical of Population I are found.

The association of Messier 31 with several systems so different 
in size, brightness, and structure reminds us inevitably of the strange 
bedfellows among the stars. There is a real analogy. The huge, bright 
galaxies like Messier 31 are conspicuous, but the small, structureless 
ones that are found teamed up with them are probably the immense 
majority, just as stars fainter than the sun outnumber stars like 
Rigel, or even like Sirius, in the galactic population. The problem 
posed for galactic evolution is exactly parallel to that for stellar 
development; and I have no doubt that when the one is solved, the 
solution of the other will inevitably follow.

Irregular Galaxies. -The Andromeda galaxy is not unique in 
possessing companions that contrast sharply with it. Our own 
galaxy has two companions of a very different kind — the so-called 
Magellanic Clouds, visible (alas) only from the southern hemisphere. No greater contrast with the companions of Messier 31 could 
be imagined.

The Magellanic Clouds are irregular galaxies (Plates 45, 46, and 
47). They have none of the symmetry of the elliptical galaxies, and 
they can hardly be called structureless, though they show no beautiful spiral coils. They are rich in clusters of stars, and their density 
varies from place to place, in a way quite different from that of 
Messier 31.

The Large Magellanic Cloud is an enormous system, above the 
average galaxy in size and brightness. It has a dense central region, 
and shows numerous bright stars and star clusters, some bedded in 
bright nebulosity (Plate 48). Moreover, Shapley has shown that it 
obscures the light of more distant galaxies, and there is no doubt 
that it is full of dust and gas. The Small Magellanic Cloud is more 
transparent, therefore less dusty, and shows less bright nebulosity, 
and it, too, is rich in bright stars.

The pride of the Magellanic Clouds is their population of 
Cepheid variables, far commoner, in proportion to total population, 
than in the arms of our own galaxy or of Messier 31. These Cepheid 
variables belong to history, for it was by means of them that the 

SYSTEMS OF STARS 
famous period-luminosity curve, the yardstick for more distant 
galaxies, was first discovered and put to use.

Equally striking is the richness of the Magellanic Clouds in blue 
supergiants — spendthrifts that leave most of our galactic supergiants in the shade. One of the brightest, S Doradus (perhaps a twin 
system ), is a million times as bright as the sun. Thousands of stars in 
the Clouds are true supergiants. With our present facilities, we can 
reach stars about half as bright as Sirius in the Magellanic Clouds.

All the members of the Magellanic population that we have 
mentioned are objects characteristic of Population I: bright, hot 
supergiants, Cepheid variables, nebulosity, dust. Indeed it looks 
as if we have here a pure specimen of that population, unmixed 
with any hint of Population II. The touchstone for Population II is 
the occurrence of globular clusters and of RR Lyrae stars. Do the 
Clouds give any evidence of their presence? 
The Large Cloud contains a number of beautiful, compact star 
clusters, many of which look like the globular clusters of our galaxy, 
and have indeed about the same total brightness. They do, in fact, 
suggest the presence of the second population. That, however, is 
not quite certain. Recent work, done by Thackeray at the Radcliffe 
Observatory in South Africa, shows definitely that though these 
clusters look like globular clusters, their stars show the family portrait characteristic of galactic clusters: the brightest stars are the 
bluest. In color and dimensions, therefore, the component stars are 
of Population I, though the compactness of the clusters suggests 
Population IT.

Concerning the RR Lyrae stars our information is more definite.

We can reach stars fainter than the RR Lyrae type in both Clouds, 
and yet not one member of this distinctive group has been discovered 
there among the thousands of variable stars that are known. We see 
vast numbers of Cepheids; we see eclipsing stars and red variables — but there are no RR Lyrae stars, Novae, too, are exceedingly uncommon, though a very few have been discovered; and novae, as we have seen, are very likely members of Population II. Our series of panoramas of the whole stage has necessarily been 
limited to a few. We have looked at the picture presented by the galaxy — stellar traffic lanes that are probably spiral arms, and an 

THE SCENE 
underlying haze of Population II stars. The great spiral in Andromeda 
presents a panorama, very much as our own galaxy would look from 
the outside — spiral arms of Population I, embedded in dust, pervaded by and enclosed in a spherical or spheroidal haze of Population II stars and globular clusters.

We have seen pure Population II systems, with populations like 
those of globular clusters, in the dwarf companions of Messier 31 — 
elliptical galaxies, And we have surveyed pure Population I systems, 
companions of our own galaxy — irregular galaxies.

The results of a census of galaxies show that these forms are 
typical; there are others of intermediate or anomalous character, 
but these provide a skeleton classification of galaxies. The elliptical 
systems, the faint dwarf galaxies, seem to be the vast majority. The 
spirals are a poor second in point of numbers, and the irregular 
galaxies apparently the rarest of all. Like the varieties of stars, the 
complex of galaxies is found in all types of physical association: 
spirals with ellipticals, spirals with irregulars, pairs of spirals, pairs 
of ellipticals . . . the variety is endless. Can the galaxies be fitted 
into a coherent scheme of development? Will that scheme place 
the component stars in a reasonable sequence? These will be the 
themes of a later chapter.


| PART THREE | x 
THE DRAMA 
6 The Ages of Things 
W. approach the reconstruction of the cosmic 
drama. We have met the players: stars, atoms, and dust. The associations between players have passed in review; we have seen intimate 
relations between pairs of stars, and within stellar families, great 
and small. We have surveyed the panoramas of the whole stage, 
witnessed the actors in a variety of groups.

Before we can reconstruct the course of the drama, we must set 
the stage. We need to know how things began. What was the 
original stage setting, and how has the plot developed from these 
beginnings? The question of how things began is wrapped up with 
the equally important question: when? How old are the actors? 
How long ago did they first take their places in the situations that 
we have surveyed? 
In thinking of cosmic ages, we shall find two ideas closely interwoven: those of age and of life expectancy. The two are evidently 
quite different, and yet they are closely connected. If we are speaking 
of creatures of any one kind, such as human beings, the greater the 
age, the smaller will be the life expectancy: the two add up to the 
average lifetime. But a human being two days old is a very young 
human being, and a mosquito two days old may be a very old 
mosquito. The lifetimes, ages, and life expectancies of living things 
may be expressed in days, or months, or years, but we cannot say 
whether a creature two days old is really “old” or “young” unless 
we know the kind of creature, and its normal life span. The same is 
true within the wider ambit of the cosmos. An atom ten million 
years old may be a very young atom; but ten million years may be 
the whole lifetime of a star.


THE DRAMA 
There is a fundamental way of deciding the ages, life expectancies 
and life spans of the actors in our drama: we must decide what 
causes them to age, and find some measure of the speed of the 
aging process. To put it crudely: how fast are they going to pieces? 
Stars, as we learned in the first chapter, are gradually consuming 
their substance. Double stars are drawn apart by the general attraction of the stellar system. Cluster stars are subject to the same 
disturbing forces, and to the differential motion of the galaxy in 
which they lie. Galaxies tear their substance to pieces as they spin.

Ages of Atoms. — We cannot think of the universe as we know it 
without thinking first of atoms, and all plausible ideas of cosmic 
evolution start out with atoms — atoms such as we know today, and 
in about the same proportions. One of the most amazing facts about 
the chemical composition of things is that the proportions of atoms 
of different kinds seem to be very nearly the same in all stars, in 
interstellar material that presumably has never been stellar, and in 
interstellar matter that has been thrown off by stars that have grown 
so old that they are approaching bankruptcy. In other words, stars 
have changed appreciably while the chemical composition of the 
universe has changed relatively little. All the stars are gradually 
using up their hydrogen and changing it into helium, by a process 
that seems to be inexorably one-way. And yet the vast majority of 
all cosmic atoms are still atoms of hydrogen. In terms of its life 
expectancy, the atomic population of the universe is still very young.

How old, in years, are the atoms that populate the universe? 
We can make an estimate by seeing how fast they are going to 
pieces. Like star clusters and stars, some atoms disintegrate, and the 
rate of the process can be accurately measured. I do not refer to the 
outer haze of electrons that is responsible for the chemical and 
physical properties of the atoms, and for the nature of the light 
absorbed or emitted. These are only the outer garments of the 
atom. The disintegration is more deep-seated. The cores, the nuclei 
of atoms, seem to be built up from still more fundamental entities, 
protons and neutrons. The properties of these basic ingredients of 
matter are starkly elusive, and the forces that bind them together are 
of a different sort from the interactions of stars and planets.


THE AGES OF THINGS 
Most nuclei are extremely stable: they are capable of enduring 
indefinitely without change. But some are inherently unstable, have 
a tendency to go to pieces under everyday conditions. If, in some 
way, one member of a cluster of basic particles acquires enough 
energy to overcome the attraction of the rest, it will fly off and be 
lost — and the atomic nucleus will have undergone disintegration.

The process has become familiar under the name of radioactivity.

Most of the very heavy atomic nuclei have this sort of instability, 
but the effect is not peculiar to heavy nuclei.

An atomic nucleus of a particular kind has a definite tendency 
to instability —a definite life expectancy. If a crowd of unstable 
atoms of one kind is watched for a given interval (say a year), the 
same fraction of them will always be seen to go to pieces. One can 
picture the process by a human analogy. Over the Labor Day weekend, for example, the authorities are able to predict with great 
accuracy how many people will perish in automobile accidents, 
though of course they cannot state which individuals will be killed.

A similar rule governs the prediction of nuclear fatalities. The same 
fraction will always occur within a given time to any one kind of 
unstable atom. To determine what that fraction is, it is only 
necessary, so to speak, to count the atomic corpses. That is exactly 
what the physicist does. Some atoms, like that of ordinary carbon, 
are practically accident-free; for some others, half the population 
perishes within a fraction of a second.

The tendency to this type of nuclear fatality is often expressed, 
in fact, by stating the time that must elapse before half the nuclei 
have perished — the half life. These half lives can clearly give us 
an idea of the age of the atomic population of the universe. For 
example, if an atom has a very short half life, we shall expect to 
find no survivors of this kind from the primitive population.

Such atoms have recently been in the public eye: plutonium and 
neptunium are examples of them. They were used (just because of 
their tendency to go to pieces, with results fatal to mankind) in the 
construction of “atomic” bombs. But we had to make them (by 
subjecting other atoms to certain conditions into which J shall not 
go); they are not found in nature.


THE DRAMA 
There are several kinds of plutonium. The least accident-prone 
variety has a half life of about twenty thousand years. We know 
that atoms of plutonium can be formed, for we have done it. There 
were probably atoms of plutonium in the primitive universe. But 
because there are none left in the atomic population today, we must 
suppose that they have virtually all perished. In other words, the 
atomic population is much more than twenty thousand years old.

The least accident-prone kind of neptunium has a half life of 20 
million years; as neptunium is not found in nature, we can conclude that the cosmic population of atoms is more than 20 million 
years old.

The universe, however, does contain natural uranium in small 
quantities. Uranium, too, disintegrates at a known, steady rate. Its 
nuclei undergo several successive fatalities, pass through a series of 
atomic reincarnations as forms of thorium, radium, and bismuth, 
and end up finally as stable nuclei, a form of lead. These atoms of 
lead are, so to speak, the corpses of the original atoms of uranium, 
and by counting them we can obtain a measure of how many atoms 
of uranium have perished. The proneness of the uranium to fatalities 
has been measured, and from the number of corpses it is easy to 
calculate how long the accidents have been going on. The result is 
about 4500 million years. Another corpse left by the way as uranium 
disintegrates is that of helium, and by measuring the helium that 
has been produced, we reach the figure of 5500 million years.

Two different kinds of uranium are found in nature, and they go 
to pieces at different rates. The one that is more accident-prone is, 
as we might expect, far less common than the other, in a ratio of 
less than 1 to 100. If we make the rough but plausible guess that in 
the beginning these two kinds of uranium were equally common, 
we can calculate how long a time must have elapsed to reduce the 
proportion of the less fortunate one to less than 1 percent of the 
other. It is found to be about 6000 million years.

These are tremendous intervals of time, but the three bases of 
calculation all give about the same result. The information from 
unstable atoms sets a sort of horizon for the cosmic time scale, of 
less than 10,000 million years. There was a day (not so very long 

THE AGES OF THINGS 
ago) when astronomers were willing to contemplate an even longer 
interval, about a thousand times as great. But there is a general 
feeling nowadays, as we shall see, that all our information about 
the ages of stars and stellar systems seems to fit within the shorter 
framework of a few thousand million years — the “short time scale” 
of a generation ago, but still long enough, in all conscience! 
Most conservative astronomers are unwilling to say more than 
that an interval of about 10,000 million years in the past has seen 
appreciable changes in the universe. To attempt to say what 
happened before that, what gave birth to the atoms themselves, is 
both difficult and dangerous.

One thing is certain: the conditions requisite for the building 
of atomic nuclei are very different from anything that we observe 
in interstellar space, or on the stars, or even from anything that we 
suppose to be happening within the stars today. This is one of the 
difficulties that face the proponents of the idea that atoms are being 
born into the universe continuously: the necessary conditions seem 
to be lacking.

Two ways of picturing the birth of atoms have been suggested.

One idea depicts their birth by the “cookery” of their ultimate 
constituents at fantastic temperatures, between a million million 
degrees and a hundred million million degrees, in a mass that later 
cooled to the relatively moderate temperatures (tens of millions of 
degrees at most) that prevail today. Even so, it seems necessary, in 
order to account for the observed numbers of atoms of different 
kinds, to suppose that the cookery took place in two stages; no one 
temperature will do the job.

Another idea imagines that all the material in the universe was 
once concentrated in a sort of vast superatom, which went to pieces 
(by a sort of nuclear fission, such as occurs on a very modest (1) 
scale in the “atomic” bomb) into the kinds of atoms that populate 
the present universe. This second idea, which sees the origin of the 
cosmos as we know it in a gigantic explosion, finds some support 
in the fact that the stellar systems that fill the observable scene do 
appear to be expanding, or exploding, in all directions away from us.

But this observed fact can also be looked at in another way, as we 
shall see.


THE DRAMA 
Most of us feel safest if we confine ourselves to two statements: 
the atoms are there; and they are probably older than the stars.

Only a small fraction of the hydrogen in the universe has at present 
been converted into helium. The life expectancy of the stars is tied 
up with the life expectancy of their hydrogen population. The other 
stable atoms have, indeed, an indefinite future, and the ultimate 
state of the atomic population will probably be an assemblage of 
atoms of helium, with a slight contamination of heavier elements.

But the time when this stage will be reached is far beyond our 
future horizon.

Age of the Earth. — Before we consider the evidence on the 
ages and life expectancies of stars, let us give a side glance at the 
age of the part of the universe that most concerns us — the earth 
on which we live. The problem of the age of the earth is in the 
province of geology. All methods of estimating it point to a very 
long interval. Mammals have existed on earth for perhaps 50 million 
years; reptiles go back perhaps twice as far; there is evidence for 
life of some kind 500 million years back; and the crust of the earth 
is estimated, by radioactive methods, to be about 3000 million years 
old. For contrast, we may remember that man goes back a hundred 
thousand years or so, recorded history about seven thousand years, 
and a civilization that lasts a couple of millenia is doing every well 
indeed.

These figures for the age of the earth reveal a remarkable thing.

The evidence of the atoms suggests an age of about 5000 million 
years; the earth seems to be nearly as old. This strikes at the root of 
the simple cosmogonic picture that imagined that the atoms came 
first, then the stars, and then the planets, born from the stars. There 
does not seem to be enough time Jeft for all this to happen. What do 
we know about the age of the sun itself? 
Age of the Sun. — The age of the sun was the vexed question of 
the last years of the nineteenth century. We can be fairly certain 
that the amount of light received by the earth from the sun has not 
changed very much since life existed on our planet. If the sun sent 
us only 10 percent less light and heat, the earth would be too cold 
for living things; if it sent us 10 percent more, water would boil at 
the surface of our planet, and life would be impossible. The con- 

THE AGES OF THINGS 
tinuous existence of life on earth, as revealed in the fossil record, 
shows that the sun has not only been there, but has been essentially 
the same as now, for at least 500 million years, a tenth of the interval since the time horizon! The sun lies near the middle of the 
orderly main sequence of stars. It is not likely to have changed 
rapidly or radically, even before this quiescent interval began.

The earth is not now thought to have been produced catastrophically by disruption of the sun. More probably, sun and earth originated as part of the same process: the earth was never part of the 
sun, and perhaps it was never even at a very high temperature, but 
came directly from solid material that condensed to form both sun 
and planets. The sun (as we know it) may indeed be younger than 
the earth, not older.

Ages of Stars. - The problem of the ages of the stars is closely 
interwoven with the problem of stellar nutrition. The stars must be 
subsisting on the nuclear energy of their own atoms; no other adequate source can be imagined for the energy they radiate. The two 
processes that probably feed the stars were described in an earlier 
chapter: the carbon cycle and the proton-proton reaction. The details 
are different, but the main feature is the same. Hydrogen nuclei are 
the food of the stars, and by one route or another they are converted 
into nuclei of helium.

A star can shine only so long as hydrogen is available, and it can 
last only so long as it husbands its supply. The vast majority of all 
atoms in the universe are atoms of hydrogen, and we may surmise 
that the same is true of the composition of stars at the beginning of 
their careers. Let us make a crude guess that a star sets out with 
about half hydrogen by weight; this will allow for the fact that 
hydrogen is the lightest of all atoms. Then its life expectancy will be 
in direct proportion to its total mass, and in inverse proportion to 
the rate at which it consumes its food.

We are not sure that a star is able to consume all its hydrogen; 
indeed most probably only about one tenth of all the hydrogen 
atoms are available as food, for rather recondite reasons that depend 
on the mysterious details of stellar structure. Let us then assume that 
only one twentieth of the total weight of a star can undergo the 
hydrogen to helium transformation that supplies its light.


THE DRAMA 
We can calculate exactly how much light the process will produce. The hydrogen is not annihilated; it is merely turned into 
helium by the fusion of four atoms of hydrogen. Now the helium 
atom weighs a little less (0.7 percent, in fact) than the four atoms 
of hydrogen that went to make it; the excess mass is turned into 
energy in accordance with the celebrated Einstein relation (p. 4), 
and ultimately appears as starlight. The stars shine only because of 
the slight loss of mass that accompanies the fusion of the four 
hydrogen nuclei. The Einstein equation allows us to calculate exactly how much light is produced by the consumption of a given 
amount of hydrogen; and if we know the total brightness of a star, 
we can determine precisely the cost in hydrogen atoms consumed.

The stellar balance sheet can be presented in a tabulation 
(Table 1). Most of the stars for which we can state the assets and 
liabilities are double stars, for these alone, as will be recalled, can 
be weighed. We first determine the assets: the star’s total mass, the 
mass that is available for nutrition (one twentieth of the total), and 
the total mass of the light that can be given out (seven thousandths 
of the available mass). On the other side we can line up the star’s 
liabilities: the mass equivalent of the light that it is expending per 
second, A very simple division will tell us the length of time that the 
star can survive at the present rate of expenditure.

Let us emphasize that the tabular entries have a fallacious precision, Many assumptions have gone into the calculations, Suppose, 
for example, that the interior of the star is kept well stirred (perhaps 
because the star is rotating); then it may have access to the whole 
of its available hydrogen, not just a tenth of it. Such a star would 
have ten times the life expectancy that is given in the table. A star 
that set out with over 50 percent of hydrogen by weight would likewise have a greater lease of life. The stellar balance sheet can be 
drawn up only approximately; the entires in the last two columns 
are known within a factor of ten.

The assets and liabilities of the stars are necessarily given in 
enormous units. The masses of stars and their available radiation 
are in units of 1 million million million million (or 107*) tons. Expenditure of light is given in millions of tons per second. The unit 
chosen for stellar life expectancies is 1 billion (10°) years.


THE AGES OF THINGS 
TABLE 1. Sre_uar BALANCE SHEET.

R 
Mass Equivalent Ben re Life Expectancy of Possible of Light (compared to 
Name of Mass adiation (108 tons® that of our Star (10 tons®) (10%! tons®) per second) (10° years) Sun) 
Main Sequence 
Kriiger 60A ae 535 0.19 0.02 398 76 
Kriiger 60B 357 0.12 0.006 658 125 
u Herculis A (1983) 0.69 13.7 1.6 0.3 
u Herculis B 990 0.35 0.12 9.1 1.7 
» Hereulis C 795 0.28 0.08 11.1 2.1 
1 Cassiopeiae A 1590 0.56 3.82 4.6 0.9 
» Cassiopeiae B 1190 0.42 0.14 97 18.5 
70 Ophiuchi A 1780 0.62 2.11 9.3 1.8 
70 Ophiuchi B 1590 0.56 0.93 19.0 3.6 
a Centauri A 9180 0.76 5.06 4.8 0.9 
« Centauri B 1870 0.65 2.91 71 1.8 
¢ Herculis A 2180 0.76 90.20 12 0.2 
¢ Herculis B 990 0.35 0.84 12.7 9.4 
Our Sun 1983 0.69 4,2] §.25 1.0 
g Coronae A 3370 1,18 8.02 4.6 0.9 
Borealis B 1590 0.56 3.50 5.0 1.0 
Procyon 2180 0.76 23.6 1.0 0.2 
Sirius 4850 1.70 916 0.24 0.04 
Giants 
Capella A 8350 8.02 5550 0.02 0.003 
Capella B 6550 2.29 3590 0.02 0.003 
Arcturus 23800 8.33 5300 0.05 0.01 
Aldebaran (7950) 2.78 14000 0,006 0.001 
B Pegasi (17800) 6.23 80600 0.006 0.001 
Supergiants 
Betelgeuse (29800) 10.43 402.00 0.008 0.002 
Antares (59600) 20.86 112000 0.006 0.001 
Rigel (65000) 23.75 86000 0.008 0.002 
UW Canis Majoris 71500 25.08 26700000 0.00003 0.000006 
* Metric tons are used; 1 metric ton = 2205 tb. Masses given in parentheses are estimates based on the mass-luminosity law.

*° In a double or multiple star, the components are distinguished by the letters 
A, B, ete.

The stellar masses given in parentheses are mere estimates, made 
on the assumption that the stars conform to the mass-luminosity law. But that is not certain for all stars. A large and important group, 
the subgiants, are overluminous, more luminous than the “law” 

THE DRAMA 
would suggest; they are more prodigal than main-sequence stars of 
similar mass, and their life expectancies are proportionately less.

The mass of Arcturus is not directly measured, for Arcturus is not 
a double star with a known orbit; its mass is inferred from its spectral 
peculiarities. Arcturus seems to have an abnormal mass for its 
brightness: it is underluminous (it radiates less light than we should 
expect for a star of its mass). The abnormality is probably real and 
significant, for Arcturus is one of the few high-velocity stars that are 
nearby and therefore can be scanned in detail. Perhaps Population II 
in general is marked by a similar parsimony of radiation, and its 
notorious lack of supergiant stars of high luminosity may thus receive an interpretation. Few masses are known for stars of Population II, because double stars, though not unknown there, are rarer 
than in Population I.

Though the precise values of life expectancy are unknown, the 
main tenor of the table is quite definite. The sun, and most of the 
main-sequence stars, have a life expectancy that is comparable to or 
greater than the 5000 million years that was set by the atoms for the 
distance to the time-horizon of the past. Only when we reach Sirius 
on the main sequence do we find life expectancies less than 1000 
million years.

With the giant stars it is another story altogether, from Capella 
with 20 million years ahead to 8 Pegasi with only 6 million; and the 
most luminous supergiant in the table, the great eclipsing system 
UW Canis Majoris, gives the amazing result of a mere three hundred 
thousand years. The life expectancy for the brightest known star, 
S Doradus in the Large Magellanic Cloud, is even smaller.

The results of this table are staggering; but it is difficult to gainsay them. They state that the duration of life on earth has been 
greater than the possible lifetimes of the most luminous stars. If 
Rigel was shining at the time (200 million years ago) when the coal 
measures were laid down, it would have used up its hydrogen by 
now. But Rigel is still shining; we can only conclude that it began to 
shine long since life walked our earth. If S Doradus were shining 
half a million years ago, it could not be there now — at least not in 
its present splendor. Rigel and S Doradus must be infant stars, in 
comparison to which the earth is an old-timer.


THE AGES OF THINGS 
The sun, on the other hand, has a possible lifetime not very 
different from, and perhaps as much as, ten times the interval since 
the time horizon set by the atoms. We can conclude that the solar 
energy is far from being exhausted; probably we can count on our 
luminary for a long time to come (though whether we can count on 
his remaining unchanged throughout his life is another question).

Precise calculations by Ledoux suggest that the sun has in fact consumed just about half its available hydrogen.

The table tells the total possible lifetime of the stars of various 
kinds. Their life expectancies, of course, depend on how long they 
have been shining already. If their total life is over 5000 million 
years, we cannot tell for how much of this interval they have lived.

There is a possible way of estimating even this, though it is beset 
with pitfalls. If we can make an estimate of how large a fraction of 
its hydrogen a star has consumed, we can guess how far it has gone 
on its way. Counts of hydrogen atoms in the atmospheres of stars are 
rather treacherous; but there is a suggestion that the Population IT 
stars do have less than the Population I stars of similar brightness.

If we read this clue aright, it means that the Population IT stars have 
been going longer — they are older in years than the superficially 
similar Population I stars.

The conception of age is highlighted by the table. In the same 
number of years that would carry Rigel from youth to decrepitude, 
from prodigality to bankruptcy, a star like the sun would scarcely 
age at all. We saw a similar difference among atoms; an assemblage 
of atoms of neptunium perishes in an interval that sees less change 
in a group of uranium atoms, and no change at all in a group of ordinary atoms of, say, carbon. We shall see it again among star clusters 
and galaxies; their aging process cannot be measured in years alone.

One fundamental assumption made in calculating the possible 
stellar lifetimes should be especially emphasized. The figures were 
obtained on the assumption that the stars in question have always 
radiated at the same rate. In other words, they imply that a star of a 
given mass always has the same luminosity — the mass-luminosity 
relation. Even if a star were made entirely of hydrogen, and converted it all into helium, the loss of mass would only be 0.7 percent 
of the whole —a quite negligible quantity. Therefore, if the total 

THE DRAMA 
masses of stars are altered only by loss from radiation, stars maintain essentially the same mass all their lives. Therefore, if the massluminosity law is valid throughout the stellar lifetime, our assumption is a justifiable one.

There are, however, large deviations from the mass-luminosity 
law. Struve has pointed out that the components of eclipsing stars, 
notably the “Algol stars,” are the most flagrant examples: the fainter, 
larger companion tends to be overluminous. The same, as Struve has 
also shown, is true to a lesser extent for one of the components of the 
dwarf twin systems (twins in brightness, but not in mass!) that are 
very close together, short in period, and tidally distorted — the socalled W Ursae Majoris stars. On the other hand, as we have seen, 
the stars of Population II may possibly be underluminous. The overluminous stars will have shorter lifetimes than would be predicted 
from adherence to the mass-luminosity law; the underluminous stars 
can protract their existence. Some of the consequences of these 
possibilities will concern us in the last chapter.

The most underluminous stars of all are the white dwarfs, which 
radiate a hundred or even a thousand times less than the massluminosity law would lead us to expect. These stellar bankrupts, as 
we have seen, have probably exhausted virtually all their hydrogen 
capital. Are we to infer enormous ages for them? If the sun goes 
back to the time horizon, what of Sirius B, the “Pup,” of almost 
equal mass? Is it much older than the sun? How then does it happen 
to be teamed up with a comparatively youthful star? This question 
will be discussed, if not answered, in the final chapter.

Ages of Double Stars. -In the third chapter we surveyed the 
double stars; the stellar twins that were born together and have lived 
their lives in company. Stellar unions, I said, are virtually indissoluble; but with the passage of time the pair tends to draw gradually apart under the attraction of the other stars.

The rate at which external influences will separate close stellar 
companions can be calculated. On the average, as was shown by 
Ambartsumian, it will take about 10,000 million years to draw a pair 
apart to the distance of ten thousand times the distance of the earth 
from the sun. Many visual binaries are within this limit; and, as we 
have seen, the great majority of all stars (probably more than half) 

THE AGES OF THINGS 
are members of binary sytems. The inference is that the disturbing 
influence of the stellar system has been acting for not longer than 
10,000 million years. The interval is suspiciously near the one that 
we derived from atomic fatalities for the past age of the atomic 
population.

Ages of Star Clusters. — Clusters of stars are not merely examples 
of huge stellar families built up on the same pattern as the whole 
complex family of double stars. They, too, will give us an idea of 
their ages from the study of how fast they are going to pieces. The 
attraction of the whole stellar system tends to pull stars out of the 
cluster, and the attraction of the whole cluster tends to keep them 
in it. We need not go into technicalities to convince ourselves that 
the heavier, denser clusters will hold together better than the loose 
ones that contain few stars. The cluster in Ursa Major, which contains most of the stars of the Big Dipper, is not dense enough or 
massive enough to hold together very well; it is going to pieces 
before our eyes and has a life expectancy of perhaps 200 million 
years. The Pleiades, both denser and more massive, with a weight 
equal to about four hundred suns, may live, as Bok has shown, from 
first to last about 3000 million years — not far from the distance to 
the early time horizon — and may end by collapse rather than by 
disintegration. We can hardly suppose that these clusters are older 
than the atoms, but they may perhaps be much younger — possibly 
very much younger. A loose, light cluster that is beginning to go to 
pieces is likely to be older than a cluster of comparable population 
that is still compact. We notice with interest that the galactic clusters 
that are loosest contain, on the whole, fewer bright stars and fewer 
hot ones. In the same way, the close double stars, which we discover 
as spectroscopic binaries, include all the luminous ones of high 
temperature (as well as a great number of cooler, fainter ones); the 
widely separated double stars, seen as visual doubles, are never 
among the very luminous ones at high temperatures. We begin to 
see a thread of development: the clusters and the double stars that 
are closely compacted, have drawn apart the least, and are therefore 
probably the most recently formed, contain the brightest, hottest 
stars. We shall see the significance of this fact in the last chapter: 
they are probably the youngest of their kind. The stellar associations 

THE DRAMA 
that we met in Chapter 4 must (if they are real physical systems) 
be at most a few million years old.

The globular clusters move in paths highly inclined to the 
Milky Way. They are far denser, far more massive than the galactic 
clusters, and are in small danger of disruption under the influence 
of the galactic system. They are so massive that their own attraction 
will keep their members under control for an indefinite time. And 
they are free from another influence that is a potent disintegrator of 
galactic clusters: they are not subject to the disrupting effects of the 
differential rotation of the thin layer where the galactic clusters 
move, within the central haze of dust and atoms. Clusters so compact and populous would be little affected by the distortion of the 
rotating galaxy. Globular clusters have an enormous life expectancy, 
and may well be of enormous age.

Ages of Galaxies. — What of the ages of the galaxies themselves? 
The elliptical galaxies, which resemble globular clusters on a huge 
scale, have a similar future and probably a similar history. Their 
life expectancy is practically indefinite, and they, too, may be of 
enormous age.

Spiral galaxies tell a very different story. They are spinning, and 
spinning nonuniformly. At the center they move more slowly than 
farther out, and in their outermost regions again they move more 
slowly. In other words, they do not rotate like wheels. But if they 
are to maintain their present shape, their rotation must be wheellike.

Any change of the angular speed of rotation along a spoke would 
distort a wheel. And we know that the speed of rotation varies in 
galaxies along their imaginary spokes. So their shapes, and the forms 
of the spiral arms, must be steadily twisting into new forms. We can 
calculate that a galaxy that started out with spiral arms like those of 
Messier 33 (Plate 53) would, within a few thousand million years, 
be wound up as tightly as a ball of twine. But we do not find spirals 
that are wound up tightly. Most of the arms show only one or two 
complete turns; many display less than one. The inference is inescapable: the arms that we see today cannot be old; they would be 
quite torn out of existence in ten to a hundred million years.

Are the galaxies, then, so much younger than stars like the sun, 
which must be thousands of millions of years old? Here we touch 

THE AGES OF THINGS 
the core of the problem. The conspicuous features of the galaxies, 
their spiral arms, must be young; and notice that they are about the 
same age as the spendthrift stars. But it is only these spendthrift 
stars that reveal the spiral arms — the hot, luminous stars, and star 
clusters, the nebulosity that they excite, the Cepheid variables. We 
begin to see the spiral arms as evanescent structures, marked out by 
groups of young stars that lie within the layer of dust and gas, with 
lifetimes from a teuth to a hundreth of the interval since the early 
time horizon.

But, as we saw in the last chapter, the spiral arms are only a small 
part of the galaxies that display them; they comprise 1 to 10 percent 
of all the stars in the whole system, and probably about 1 percent 
of its mass; notice that the ratio 100 occurs in the numbers, as it did 
in the ages. Here again, as with the stars and the galaxies, the conspicuous is not the most important; faint stars outnumber the bright 
stars that strike the eye; faint galaxies outnumber the bright galaxies; spiral arms obtrude themselves on our attention, but they are 
not the whole cake; they are only the rare and evanescent features 
of the central filling. The stars of the surrounding haze may be very 
old indeed.

What, then, of the irregular galaxies, the objects like the Magellanic Clouds? I shall speak of them in the next chapter, which deals 
with the development of stellar systems. They show little or no spiral 
structure and seem to be populated largely by spendthrifts. My own 
belief is that these are systems that are as young as the spiral arms 
of galaxies. The Large Cloud seems to show rudiments of spirality, 
the Small Cloud none at all; either it has had no time to develop 
spiral structure, or is not capable of doing so. Certainly the Clouds 
seem to bear none of the marks of antiquity. Perhaps they are 
spendthrift galaxies, comparable to the individual supergiant stars; 
the Magellanic Clouds are the Rigels among the stellar systems. On 
the other hand, the elliptical galaxies are more of the nature of bankrupt galaxies, and comparable to the white dwarfs among the stars.

Irregular galaxies, like Rigels, are uncommon; like the white dwarfs 
the elliptical galaxies are very common indeed. But the analogy is 
only an analogy, and should not be pressed too far. Elliptical galaxies do not consist of bankrupt stars (though they may contain 

THE DRAMA 
many, inaccessible to observation because of their remoteness); but 
they are bankrupt in the sense that their capacity to produce new 
stars has been exhausted. They have no dust and gas from which 
stars can be born.

Ages of Clusters of Galaxies. — The greatest of all the groupings 
of objects in the universe are the clusters of galaxies. We have seen 
small groups of galaxies: Messier 31 and its elliptical companions; 
cur own galaxy and its Magellanic Clouds; Messier 81 and its companions — these are the analogues of double and multiple stars. But 
there are great clusters, groups of several hundred galaxies, that correspond to the galactic clusters. These, like the galactic clusters, 
can provide one more test of the ages of things. The motions of their 
members can be measured, and the interval during which they can 
be expected to hold together can be calculated. Some of the largest 
can be shown to have a life expectancy of about 10,000 million years.

The fact that we observe many of these great clusters of galaxies 
~ and their known number is being augmented all the time — shows 
that they fit within the frame of the time horizon that was given by 
the atoms.

Another argument is often used to estimate the age of the system 
of the galaxies. When their speeds are measured with the spectroscope, all the galaxies appear to be receding from us, and the most 
distant ones seem to be going the fastest. This observation — the 
apparent recession of the galaxies, often interpreted as an expansion 
of the universe —can be naively regarded as evidence of a true 
explosion. But such a view introduces great difficulties: it leads to a 
figure of only 1000 million years since the expansion started — less 
than the interval allowed by atoms, or stars, or even the age of the 
earth itself! A more sophisticated view takes into account the difficult concepts of the theory of relativity, which ascribes some of the 
apparent recession to the curved nature of space. This view leads 
us to expect delicate changes in the observed numbers and colors of 
galaxies with distance, at about the limit that can be reached with 
the 200-inch telescope, and the data are still being collected. At 
present the observed recession of the galaxies is compatible with a 
wide range of time scales, and certainly cannot be used to date the 

THE AGES OF THINGS 
beginning of the expansion, without making assumptions that are 
not justified by the present state of our knowledge.

If we try to summarize our present ideas about the ages of 
things, I think we can state that the ages of the earth, of most stars, 
TABLE 2. APPROXIMATE Cosmic AGEs (years).

Ages of Atoms 
Plutonium over 20,000 
Neptunium over 20,000,000 
Uranium: lead ratio 4,500,000,000 
Uranium: helium ratio 5,500,000,000 
Uranium balance 6,000,000,000 
Age of the Earth 
Civilization 2,000 
Prehistory 7,000 
Man 100,000 
Mammals 50,000,000 
Reptiles 100,000,000 
Life 500,000,000 
Crust of the earth 3,000,000,000 
Life Expectancies of Stars 
Faint dwarfs 600,000,000,000 
Sun over 5,000,000,000 
Supergiants 500,000 to 10,000,000 
Life Expectancies of Stellar Systems 
Double Stars less than 10,000,000,000 
Star Clusters: 
Ursa Major 200,000,000 
Pleiades 8,000,000,000 
Globular clusters over 10,000,000,000 
Galaxies: 
Elliptical over 10,000,000,000 
Spiral: 
Arms 10-50,000,000 
Nuclei 10,000,000,000 
Irregular 400,000,000 
Clusters of Galaxies less than 10,000,000,000 
of star clusters, and of clusters of galaxies, fit reasonably well within 
the framework of time suggested by the age of the atomic population, with a time horizon of several thousand million years (Table 
2). Two groups of objects lead to very much smaller ages: the spendthrift stars and the arms of spiral galaxies. As these two phenomena 

THE DRAMA 
are closely bound up with one another, and the arms of galaxies are 
made visible and marked out by the stellar spendthrifts, we cannot 
but conclude that the latter are really young. We can even toy with 
the idea that stars are being born continuously; and the places 
where the young stars are found suggest very definitely that they 
are born of the interstellar dust. Our current ideas about the way in 
which stars come into being, and the course of their subsequent 
careers, will be the subjects of our final chapter.


7 ~The Evolution of Galaxies 
0.: own galaxy contains perhaps a hundred thousand million stars. But it is only one of many; there are millions, if 
not hundreds of millions, of accessible galaxies (accessible, that is, 
to our present telescopes). Our own system has the distinction of 
being one of the biggest, brightest, and most massive.

As we saw in the last chapter, galaxies differ very much in structure. Some, like the companions to Messier 31, are globular or 
elliptical — quite structureless and beautifully symmetrical. In fact, 
they recall the globular clusters (though many of them are much 
more flattened). However, all of them are so much larger and most 
of them so much brighter than globular clusters that they must be 
regarded as a different kind of individual.

Some galaxies are quite irregular in form, ragged complexes of 
stars, gas, and dust; such are the Magellanic Clouds, our own companions. And some, the most beautiful of all, are spiral. There are 
many kinds of spirals, from lightly outlined systems with faint 
central nuclei, through systems with small, well-marked nuclei and 
sharply defined arms, to systems that seem to be mostly nucleus, 
with faint arms encircling them.

Our problem is this: can we arrange the galaxies in a continuous 
series; and if we can do so, which way is the series headed? Which 
are the young galaxies, which are the old ones? 
We spent some time on the family portraits of groups of stars; 
galaxies have their family patterns too. In sketching the features of 
the stars we found that brightness, size, and color were among their 

THE DRAMA 
important properties. I have said nothing so far about the lineaments 
of galaxies; but here, too, size, brightness, and color are very significant.

Between the most luminous and the faintest galaxies known, 
there is a ratio of about 200 in total brightness. Our own galaxy is 
perhaps the brightest known, and the faintest hitherto recognized is 
one of the small companions of the Andromeda galaxy. An isolated 
elliptical galaxy in Sculptor may be even a little fainter.

This range of 200 in brightness among galaxies is not nearly as 
great as the range of brightness among stars, which amounts to 
millions. But it is large enough to produce on our observations of 
galaxies the same effect as variety in brightness produces on our 
observations of stars. Very luminous stars, visible at great distances, 
obtrude themselves on our attention, and we tend to overestimate 
their numbers and perhaps to exaggerate their importance. Very 
bright galaxies, also, are seen more readily than faint ones at great 
distances, and lead us to exaggerate our ideas of their frequency.

We remember that the faint, small stars of small mass are the 
enormous majority. In the same way, when we make the proper 
allowance for the modesty of the fainter galaxies, we find that they, 
too, are in the majority. The average galaxy in space has been found 
to be about one hundredth as bright as our own, and the faint 
galaxies are so very self-effacing that quite possibly an average 
galaxy may be even fainter than this.

The sizes of galaxies, too, have a large range, though not as 
great as their range of brightness. The companions of the galaxy 
in Andromeda have perhaps a tenth or a twentieth of the extent 
of the great spiral.

The sizes, luminosities, and structures of galaxies are closely 
related with one another, and the connection between them is certainly very important. All the spirals are large and bright. Some are 
not, it is true, as large as our own. The beautiful spiral in Canes 
Venatici (Plate 42) is perhaps one quarter the size and a couple of 
magnitudes fainter. But below these limits we do not seem to find 
many spirals.

The relation between size and brightness for the irregular galaxies is not quite so clean-cut. But on the average they are smaller 

THE EVOLUTION OF GALAXIES 
than the spirals, and many of them are smaller than any spiral ever 
found.

Elliptical galaxies are even less restricted in size and brightness.

The great majority are small and faint — smaller and fainter, indeed, 
than any other kind of galaxy — but we also observe large, bright 
ones. Some of them rival the brightest spirals in brightness, if not 
in size. As we shall see, size and brightness must be taken into account, as well as form and structure, before we can arrange galaxies 
in a coherent scheme.

I have mentioned that the small, faint galaxies form the great 
majority. That statement can be refined a little. The commonest 
galaxies are the small, faint, elliptical systems; next in numbers 
come the spirals. Among these, the smaller, fainter spirals are commoner than the large, bright ones like our own; but let me repeat 
that there are no spirals at all below a certain limit of brightness, 
as Shapley first pointed out. Irregular galaxies are the rarest of all.

We hardly know enough to say whether large or small irregular 
galaxies preponderate; but it is fairly certain that very big ones like 
the Large Magellanic Cloud are quite rare.

If we are to arrange the complex system of galaxies, with all their 
variety of structure, size, and brightness, in an orderly series that 
represents their course of development, we must find some criteria 
of age and state of evolution on which to base our arrangement.

But when we bear in mind the analogy with men and mosquitoes, 
we shall realize that age and aging are not necessarily the same. A 
system that is relatively young in years may be old in development.

There are some very broad principles on which one can evaluate 
aging among stellar systems. First, and perhaps most important, is 
orderliness. It seems to be an inexorable law that time smooths out 
all things, that irregularities tend to disappear with aging, to be 
replaced by order, homogeneity, and monotony. An aged system 
seems to lose its enterprise.

There is a deep-seated reason for this. In the last chapter I said 
that I believe (without, it is true, advancing all the arguments in 
favor of the belief) that atoms came before stars. From the atoms 
were built the dust, the stars, and the stellar systems that we know 
(not necessarily in this order). The stars and galaxies must have 

THE DRAMA 
originated from clouds of atoms, in other words from masses of gas.

Now diffuse gas has some properties that are very different from 
those of solid matter, or even of gas compressed into stars. Odd as 
it may sound, gas is sticky; it possesses viscosity. Moreover, large, 
diffuse masses of gas are bound to be swirling and churning; even 
if they were not doing so to begin with, they would be certain to 
break up into eddies as time went on. The solid particles that begin 
to form within the gas, and produce the dust and haze, are caught 
up in the motions of the swirling gas; they ride the atomic winds, 
and we see the shredded clouds, for example, in the neighborhood of 
the Pleaides. The solid particles are not sticky; they are too far apart 
to affect one another very much. The stars are even more widely 
separated, and affect one another very little, so that, as I put it 
earlier, stellar collisions are virtually impossible, and stellar unions 
are practically indissoluble.

The swirling, churning motions of the underlying gas, and the 
motions of the interstellar clouds that they carry with them, cause 
a young system (which contains much of both) to be irregular in 
form and to lack symmetrical structure. If our idea of the development of cosmic objects from a primitive cloud of gas is at all correct, 
it follows that systems rich in gas and dust must be young systems, 
and will moreover be expected to be irregular in form. It is significant that the irregular galaxies are rich in dust and gas, richer indeed 
than systems of any other kind. This fact is the basis of our belief 
that they must be the most youthful of the stellar systems.

Another fact strengthens this conviction. The irregular systems 
are particularly rich in stellar spendthrifts, and, as we saw in the 
last chapter, these spendthrifts must be young stars; they can last 
only a short time, a fraction of the distance from the early time 
horizon. We began to associate youthfulness with Population I — 
the stars that show the family portrait typical of the galactic clusters.

And we note with interest that the Magellanic Clouds, the hotbeds 
of Population I, which are full of stellar spendthrifts bedded in nebulosity, seem to be innocent of any members of Population II. Here 
we have an indication that Population II, typical of the globularcluster family, is characteristic of stars that have aged more.

We find a confirmation that this idea is on the right lines when 

THE EVOLUTION OF GALAXIES 
we turn to the galaxies that contain only Population II stars, uncontaminated by spendthrifts, dust, or gas — the elliptical galaxies.

They are at the opposite end of the series of galactic forms. They 
are beautifully symmetrical, utterly monotonous in structure. It is 
not hard to reach the idea that they have aged to the point where all 
irregularity has been obliterated, all enterprise has been abandoned.

Stars are no longer being born in these galaxies. The reason is not 
far to seek; the raw materials are absent; dust and gas are lacking.

There are no stellar spendthrifts, for the material of which they 
could have been formed was exhausted long ago — perhaps by making stars, perhaps in other ways to be mentioned later.

Already we have made considerable progress in arranging our 
sequence; the irregular galaxies are youthful, the elliptical galaxies 
have aged. Can we fit the spirals in between, with their complex 
structure, their intermingling of Populations I and II? 
The spirals are the crux of our problem. It will be recalled that 
members of the two populations are distinguished in our own system 
not only by their physical features, but also by their positions and 
motions. Population I, characterized by the bright, hot stars, moves 
round the galactic rotary within a very thin layer of dust and gas.

The stars of this population are perhaps not much more than 1 percent of the whole stellar content of the galaxy. The stars of Population IE move in all directions, and in orbits of all shapes and sizes, 
through the central layer, not within it. As a consequence, they are 
arranged in a very thick system, nearly structureless, and condensed 
toward the nucleus of our galaxy. The stars of Population IT in other 
galaxies form similar substrata, while the spiral arms, marked by 
Population I stars, dust, and gas, travel with a rotary motion within 
the central layer.

A spiral galaxy, in fact, consists of two interpenetrating and concentric systems: a structureless substratum that contains most of the 
stars and probably most of the mass, and strongly resembles an elliptical galaxy; and a system of arms. The arms, as we saw in the 
last chapter, must be evanescent; and their age is quite comparable 
with the ages of the stellar spendthrifts that inhabit and define them, 
and excite the gas layer to luminescence. Save for their graceful 
form, the arms of a spiral galaxy have a great deal in common with 

THE DRAMA 
an irregular galaxy. Without stretching the imagination too much 
we may picture a spiral galaxy as an irregular galaxy rotating within 
an ellipsoidal galaxy, and swirled into pinwheel form by its rotational motion around the nucleus of the former. We begin to see the 
spiral structure as something churned out of the layer of dust and 
gas by the rotation of the system, something that is progressively 
twisted out of existence by its own differential rotation. So long as 
dust and gas are present, spiral arms will form, and dissipate, and 
new spiral arms will re-form. The process will go on while there is 
dust and gas present; when all the raw material is used up, there 
will be no more spiral arms. We shall be left with a system that will 
soon be nothing but substratum; it will be indistinguishable from 
an elliptical galaxy — in fact it will be an elliptical galaxy.

We have made another step forward. We have fitted the spiral 
galaxies in between the irregular and the elliptical galaxies. But is 
our problem completely solved? I think not. We have still to account 
for an enormous variety of spirals that range from large to moderate 
in size, and from forms with a scarcely visible nucleus to forms that 
are mostly nucleus. We have also to recall that spirals may be associated, as the galaxy in Andromeda is, with elliptical galaxies that 
are probably of the same age. And then we must remember our own 
galaxy, accompanied by the Magellanic Clouds — are they the same 
age as our system? The grouping of spirals with both very old and 
very young galaxies seems inconsistent.

In considering this thorny problem we must distinguish carefully between age and aging. Perhaps the speed of development 
depends on something besides the age in years. To decide about 
this question we must scrutinize the process of development a little 
more closely.

One of the first clues to the details of the process lies in a statement that I made at the beginning of the chapter. Stars and gas 
have quite different properties. Gas is sticky; it forms swirls and 
eddies. But stars affect one another very little. A star that starts out 
in a certain path may be counted on to pursue that path, or something very close to it, indefinitely. Double stars hang together. Clusters of stars travel through space together, and only the poorest and 
loosest clusters have dissipated very much since their birth. I have 

THE EVOLUTION OF GALAXIES 
insisted that they must have originated together and have been 
traveling together ever since. This idea leads us naturally to the conception that the motion of a group of stars reveals the motion of the 
material from which it was built. An associated group of stars has 
the same motion as the dust and gas that gave it birth.

Look for a moment at Population II in the galaxy. Its most eminent numbers are the globular clusters, with almost spherical distribution and motion in elliptical, highly inclined orbits. The RR 
Lyrae stars, perhaps a hundred thousand of them, have very similar 
distributions and motions. We can but conclude that these distributions and motions tell what was the distribution and motion of the 
gas from which the stars of Population II were born. We can envisage an almost spherical mass of primitive gas and dust, greatly 
concentrated to the galactic center.

Other kinds of stars, such as the long-period variables, are distributed in systems that are rather more flattened and have motions 
that are less extreme. Probably they originated from a mass of gas 
and dust that was less spherical, but still extended very far upward 
from the central plane of the galaxy. The Population I stars of today 
are confined to a very thin plane indeed, perhaps 5 percent of the 
original thickness. In fact, the galaxy may be pictured as a complex 
of a number of concentric subsystems that are flatterled to different 
degrees, an idea first expressed by the Swedish astronomer Lindblad.

What conclusion is to be drawn from the variety of distributions 
and motions? I think we can picture the past development of a spiral 
galaxy in a very general way, though the basic theory is still, frankly, 
of the vaguest kind. If a mass of gas, originally spherical, begins to 
rotate, the gas will probably sink steadily toward the central plane.

I do not think that the rate of sinking has been accurately calculated, 
but I suspect that for a system the size of the galaxy it would be 
about a thousand million years. Thus we can suppose that the more 
spherical is the group in which a particular kind of star is arranged, 
and the more inclined its motions to the central plane, the earlier 
was it formed in the history of the system. We can picture a galaxy 
gradually building up its Population II substratum within the steadily sinking mass of dust and gas. The more spherical a subsystem, 
the older can we suppose it to be (Plate 62).


THE DRAMA 
It can be shown, with great plausibility, that the rate of such 
process of development must depend on the size and the mass of 
the galaxy concerned. For a small, light galaxy it will go faster than 
for a large, massive galaxy. Here we see the sharp distinction between age and aging. At a given age in years, a large, massive galaxy 
will have aged less than a small, light one. Our own galaxy must age 
very slowly, for it is one of the largest as galaxies go. On the other 
hand, a large, massive galaxy starts out with more available material 
than a smaller one; therefore it can be expected to continue to form 
stars and to display spiral structure longer.

Here, however, we touch upon a problem that is still unsolved.

We do not know exactly what decides the rate at which the gaseous 
substratum is converted into stars. Its density, its state of motion 
(eddies and swirls), its temperature, all must be involved. The last 
factor will to some extent depend on the presence of nearby stars 
(especially bright and hot ones). Therefore, if it is true that the 
bright, hot stars are indeed the young ones, the very formation of 
such stars may temporarily inhibit the formation of more stars in 
their neighborhood, and further star building may have to wait on 
the extinction of the spendthrifts. Perhaps this factor, and possibly 
others that we have not thought of, restrains the promiscuous formation of stars from the dust and gas, and conserves the raw materials.

Obviously they have been conserved; in our own system there seems 
still to be about as much interstellar matter in the central sandwich 
as there is material in the form of stars. And although we know that 
stars spill off gases from their surfaces, there is no indication that the 
rate of spilling is anything like enough to maintain as much interstellar material as this.

We are now in a position to make a guess as to the stages through 
which a galaxy passes. In its initial stages it is an irregular galaxy, 
but it is bound to have some tendency to rotate, and rotation will in 
time begin to produce spiral arms. The shape of the Large Magellanic Cloud gives just a suggestion that it is becoming a spiral 
(compare Plates 46, 60, and 61). Like many other spirals it has a 
central bar, dense with stars and full of dust and gas, and from the 
ends of the bar spring what looks like the beginning of spiral arms.

Certainly most of the mass of the Large Cloud is in the bar, and 

THE EVOLUTION OF GALAXIES 
probably the bar contains enough gas to be quite viscous, so that it 
is turning almost like the spoke of a wheel. The stars within it may 
have been born so recently that they have had little time to leave 
their original positions; they still lie within the clouds that gave 
them birth.

There are two main types of spirals, and the Magellanic Cloud 
seems to be an embryonic barred spiral. All barred spirals have a 
central bar from the ends of which spring a pair of spiral arms.

Probably all barred spirals have a considerable concentration of 
interstellar material in the bar.

The Andromeda galaxy (Plate 39) and the great spiral Messier 
33 in Triangulum (Plate 53) are examples of the other type of spiral, 
the normal spiral. Here, on the picture we have sketched, we should 
expect the first stage of development to involve only vaguely defined 
arms and not much of a nucleus. But as development proceeds, the 
nucleus would grow in size and prominence, as more and more stars 
were born from the gaseous cloud that was sinking toward the 
central plane. Probably in early times, when star-building material 
was common, there would be a large proportion of stars in the arms, 
and they would illuminate the interstellar gas very brightly. A galaxy 
in this stage would be like Messier 33. As development went on (see 
Plates 53 to 62), supplies would grow less rich, fewer stars would 
adorn the arms, and bright nebulae would not be so conspicuous.

The galaxy in Andromeda and our own galaxy may be in such a 
stage. Finally all the material would be gone, and nothing would 
remain except the substratum; the spendthrift stars would run their 
brief course, and only an elliptical galaxy would finally remain.

The total age of our galaxy must be at least as great as that of the 
sun, which is fixed (at a lower limit) by the age of the earth. Our 
galaxy seems indeed to go back about to the early time horizon, 
perhaps 5000 million years ago. Smaller spiral galaxies that have 
reached the same stage must be younger in years. Perhaps it is 
significant that spiral galaxies are rare among galaxies in general, 
and that small spirals are unknown. A small spiral of the age of our 
own would by now have run its course — as such. The small elliptical 
galaxies may have been small spirals once, but their careers are 
over and they are bankrupt of star-building material, or very nearly.


THE DRAMA 
One of the small companions of Messier 31 still has a very little, and 
it is fascinating to note that within the dark streak that crosses this 
elliptical galaxy there are a few “young” stars, though the rest of 
the system consists of typical Population II stars.

Can we conclude that all galaxies are the same age, and that the 
present distribution among the types is a consequence of different 
rates of aging? I think not. An egregious example is right at our 
door in the shape of the Magellanic Clouds. If what I have said is 
true, and the irregular galaxies are the youngest, how is it that two 
youthful systems are teamed up with our own galaxy, which seems 
to be about as old as the stellar universe? There is only one possible 
answer. These two systems are not as old as the galaxy. They may 
well be less than a hundred millions years old. They do not even 
both seem to be of quite the same age; the Large Cloud is thick with 
interstellar material, but the Small Cloud is practically transparent, 
and therefore contains very little. This would make the Large Cloud 
even younger than the Small Cloud, and the latter is not old, since 
it contains neither RR Lyrae stars nor globular clusters, typical of 
Population II. I think we must conclude that the Magellanic Clouds 
are really much younger than our galaxy, and were formed out of 
dust and gas at a comparatively late epoch in the life of the latter.

Old as the galaxy is, it still has a future before it; it still contains 
the makings of a good many stars, and the possibility of forming 
some future spiral arms. But the end will come at last, and I think 
we can find some other galaxies that reveal what our own will look 
like then. The gigantic elliptical galaxy Messier 87 is about as luminous as our total Population II population; and like our own system 
it is surrounded with a great haze of globular clusters, just resolved 
with the 200-inch telescope (Plate 52). In Messier 87 we are perhaps 
looking at a system even older than our own, and can foresee in it 
our own future. It may be slightly smaller and fainter than I have 
suggested, and therefore may have aged a little faster than our own 
galaxy, so that its age in years may be no greater.

Even Messier 87 has not developed beyond all enterprise; a 
gigantic jet (invisible in Plate 52 against the brilliant center) seems 
to be spurting radially outward from its nuclear region.

I have outlined the scheme of development of a galaxy from an 

THE EVOLUTION OF GALAXIES 
irregular system, through spiral forms, to the final stage of an elliptical galaxy. The great majority of systems can be fitted into the 
scheme, but there are odd ones that do not conform. We also find 
strange bedfellows, such as we found among stars — for example, 
elliptical and spiral systems in close association. If what we have 
just said about the dependence of aging on size is true, we should 
expect that of two galaxies that started out together, the smaller 
and the less massive would arrive at the elliptical stage before the 
other. Messier 31 and its companions are related about as we should 
expect. But such a pair as Messier 60 (elliptical) and the fainter, 
spiral N.G.C. 4647, if they are really associated in space, are in the 
wrong order, for Messier 60 is far the brighter of the two. Our own 
galaxy and the Magellanic Clouds are even more flagrant. Can anything that happens to galaxies affect their development? 
The most fascinating example of what looks like arrested development among stellar systems is found in some of the great, dense 
clusters of galaxies, such as the one that lies comparatively near to 
us, seen through the constellation Coma, and called the “Coma 
cluster” (Plate 67). It contains about eight hundred galaxies, some 
of them round, some of them spindle-shaped and therefore probably 
greatly flattened. But the striking thing about them is that none 
show spiral structure, even though such structure, and especially 
the central dust sandwich, would be expected in the elongated ones.

They seem all to be Population II systems. Where are the spirals 
and what has happened to the dust within the systems? 
The answer to this question, when it was given by Spitzer and 
Baade, was almost as spectacular as the observations. The Coma 
galaxies form a dense cluster, so dense that they must be suffering 
frequent collisions (frequent cosmically speaking, that is). Since 
the time horizon each one must have collided, on the average, with 
twenty other galaxies. This is an inevitable result, deduced from 
the compactness of the cluster and the observed motions of the 
galaxies within it; there is nothing speculative about it.

But where is the evidence of the collisions? The galaxies seem 
unscathed; they are sharply defined and symmetrically shaped. And 
a little reflection shows that this is as it should be. Galaxies are exceedingly “open-work.” The stars are so far apart that two galaxies 

THE DRAMA 
can pass through each other without noticeably disturbing the 
motions or positions of their stars.

But with the dust and the gas in the galaxies it is another story.

Gas, as we recollect, is sticky, or viscous. If two galaxies collide, the 
stars move on undisturbed, but the sticky central layers of gas 
collide, and collide with explosive violence, because the speeds of 
the galaxies through one another are immense — several hundred 
miles a second. The impact of gas on gas is so great that the gas 
clouds must be thrown violently out into space, carrying with them 
the dust and smoke. The two systems will sweep one another clean 
of interstellar matter. Twenty collisions per galaxy have probably 
been enough to purge away all the star-building material in the 
Coma cluster. The systems have been arrested in their normal 
course, and we see a group of galaxies that would now be in all 
stages from spiral to elliptical if they were not so closely crowded.

All are frozen into the forms that they had when collisions finished 
the cleaning job. Is Messier 87 undergoing a final explosive 
cleansing? 
There are other dense clusters of galaxies too, such as the one 
in Corona Borealis, that have swept themselves clean and are in a 
state of arrested development. Such a fate seems inevitable for 
galaxies that have suffered repeated collisions. There are still questions to be answered: what, for example, has happened to the dust 
and gas? Our authors think that it has probably formed into new 
systems long since — perhaps long enough since for collisions to 
have cleaned them out also.

The idea that colliding galaxies may interpenetrate without affecting their stars, but with the effect of cleaning out their interstellar material, is one that has far-reaching implications. How often 
has Messier 82 passed through the Andromeda galaxy, and with 
what effects? Have the Magellanic Clouds ever passed through the 
galactic plane? If they move under its gravitational pull in circular 
orbits, their periods of rotation would be about as long as we suppose their total life to have been. Were they born, or was the Large 
Cloud perhaps born, of the dust and gas thrown out in an intergalactic collision? It is a fascinating thought.

I hope that I have succeeded in giving a clear sketch of the 

THE EVOLUTION OF GALAXIES 
possible course of the evolution of galaxies. Some of what I have 
said would be the opinion of most astronomers; but some of the 
opinions are my own. The mode of formation of spiral arms that I 
have advocated, for instance, seems to lead inevitably to arms that 
trail, at least on the outside of the galaxy. There are eminent 
astronomers, such as Lindblad, who think otherwise.

But the main course of development, from irregular galaxies, 
through spirals, to elliptical systems, is, I think, fairly generally 
accepted. It is true that it reverses the order, assigned by Hubble 
many years ago, of “early-type” and “late-type” spirals; but the 
reversed order has long been advocated by Shapley. The general 
theory of the development of spirals owes much to the brilliant 
imagination of Carl Friedrich von Weiszicker, and I own that I 
have been greatly influenced by his ideas. There are still many 
problems; first of all we need more observations, and the 200-inch 
is getting them. Only when enough observations are available shall 
we be in a position to make new theories. The very basis of the 
theory of the motions of the interstellar gas is still in its infancy.

But I feel a growing vein of confidence that we have at least arranged the systems in the right order, and that we know at least 
some of the factors most important in their development.

But the subject is so new, so replete with promise and with 
pitfalls, that only the incurable optimism of the astronomer can 
excuse the temerity with which I have described it. The evolution 
of galaxies is still “hot off the griddle”; perhaps a more cautious man 
would have dismissed it as “too hot to handle.” 

8 The Evolution of the Stars 
The problem of stellar evolution is the most fascinating and the most elusive in astronomy. The stars are spread before us in extraordinary variety, and for many of them our knowledge 
of the superficial properties, such as brightness, size, surface temperature, mass, and external composition, is fairly complete. We also 
know a great deal about the relations within groups of stars, and 
we have learned that within a galaxy both motion and distribution 
(which are inevitably connected) are intimately linked with other 
physical properties.

Our task is to knit all these facts into a connected story of the 
development of stellar character, to infer the changes by which a 
star proceeds from infancy to old age. And here we run into our 
greatest stumbling block. The development of stellar character 
stems from within; the springs of stellar behavior are deep-seated, 
unobservable. We know, it is true, that the internal conditions of 
stars are very different from the exterior ones, that the central 
temperatures and pressures must be very high. But the actual 
temperatures and pressures depend upon the stars’ structure and 
current composition. We are fairly confident that most stars are 
subsisting on the energy of their own nuclear substance; a steady 
change of composition is inevitable, and necessarily brings with it 
an ultimate change of structure.

The Basic Information. — I have tried in the preceding chapters 
to summarize the basic facts that seem to me to be the most important leads in our problem. First in order are the observable 
properties of stars: their variety in brightness, size, and mass; their 
overwhelming tendency to form doubles, multiple systems, and 

THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
even larger groups; the close relation of twinning and spinning; 
their unquiet surface conditions, the prevalence of spilling and 
spurting into space.

Second in importance is the recognition of the family relationships of stars — the tendency of a prevalent pattern to dominate a 
stellar group. A galactic cluster has a distinctive family picture; a 
globular cluster has an equally definite but quite different one.

These family pictures attain an even broader significance when we 
see in them the mirrors of Populations I and Hf, which inhabit, respectively, the fattened arms and the spheroidal substratum of our 
galaxy, and of many other galaxies. A few galaxies seem to contain 
only Population I; probably the great majority are confined to 
Population IJ; and in the spirals we witness both populations in 
company. In the last chapter I suggested that this relation is only 
temporary, that the stars of Population I are bound up with the 
interstellar material of a more or less thin central layer in a spiral, 
and that they, and the spiral arms they populate, are evanescent 
features, fated to fade away and leave a more or less flattened, 
structureless system — an elliptical galaxy.

The third cardinal fact in speculating on stellar development is 
distance to the time horizon — an interval of something less than 
10,000 million years, within which we may suppose that the character building of stars has been in progress.

Of these tangled threads it is our problem to weave a coherent 
web; and I must be frank — the web is full of holes at present, and 
if I were to attempt to foist it off as a well-woven fabric I should do 
it at the price not only of compromising with my own conscience, 
but also of incurring the derision of my astronomical colleagues.

What I shall say about the development of stars is the result of my 
own gropings in the darkness of the subject. The gloom is fitfully 
illuminated by the light of many of the best minds in astronomy.

The pioneers were Eddington, Jeans, and Russell. Among the torchbearers of today are Struve and von Weiszicker, Ambartsumian and 
Krat, Hoyle and Lyttleton, Spitzer, Whipple, Schwarzschild, and 
Chandrasekhar. But their lights seem to lead in many directions, 
and some at any rate must be will-o’-the-wisps. I fear that I am not 
the least likely to be carrying an ignis fatuus.


THE DRAMA 
From Population I to Population II. — In the last chapter I gave 
some of the reasons why I believe that Population I represents 
young stars — younger, at any rate, than Population II. I shall start 
from the premise that a rich galactic cluster, such as the great group 
Fic. 11. Speculative sketch of the course of development from Population [ to Population H.

These ore only bare outlines for single stars; a star that divides may distribute itself along the 
main sequence. The downward curvature of the arrows denotes the onset of underiuminosity.

Sizes are on a conventional scale.


THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
in Perseus, represents a young family of stars of the same age, similar 
in birth and history. I suggest that in time —a very long time — 
this group will have developed the family traits characteristic of a 
globular cluster. I leave aside for the moment the enormous differences in size and population between the galactic and the globular 
clusters in our own system, only recalling that the Large Magellanic 
Cloud does seem to contain clusters that are “globular” in form but 
“galactic” in population. How are we to suppose the stellar characters to develop so that the first family portrait will transform into 
the second? We have here a problem like the child’s word game 
that requires us to change “swan” into “bear” by a series of transformations that involve known words, such as swan-swat-seat-searbear. Can we visualize a series of steps by which one group portrait 
can pass, through a series of known types of stars, into another? If 
so, do they fit within the time framework that we have set up? 
Let us take a close look at the population from which we propose 
to start. The most important fact about it is, I think, that the great 
majority of its members are small, faint, and of low mass. The great 
blue supergiants, even the stars like Sirius, are rare. At least down 
to stars a tenth of the brightness of the sun, we must imagine that 
the numbers continue to increase. If we compare the picture with 
that of the stars in the population with which we wish to finish, we 
notice that the two diagrams seem to coalesce for the faint stars, 
which are the preponderant members of the first and very likely 
of the second. This is not to say that there are no differences: Population II (if we are to judge from the high-velocity stars of our own 
neighborhood) includes large numbers of faint subdwarfs. But the 
two pictures differ much less for their fainter stars than for the stars 
higher up. And it is just these fainter stars that we have seen, when 
we considered the ages of things, to have very long life expectancies, 
longer than the interval since the time horizon; therefore they can 
be expected to have aged very slowly.

But when we turn to the rare, brilliant stars we find that the 
two diagrams have fanned apart. The brightest stars in galactic 
clusters, with almost a million times the luminosity of the sun, have 
no counterpart in Population II, where the best a star can achieve 
is a thousand times the sun’s brightness. But, as we have seen, a star 

THE DRAMA 
a million times as bright as the sun (if it fits the “mass-luminosity 
curve”) has a very small life expectancy: ten million years would 
have bankrupted it. Two hundred million years would bankrupt 
the brightest of the Pleaides; the brightest of the Hyades have about 
2000 million years to go. The place where the diagrams for the two 
populations begin to fan apart is suspiciously near to the brightness 
of stars that would be bankrupted in an interval comparable to the 
distance from the time horizon.

The factual basis for this attractive idea is very slender. Only 
two globular clusters have at present been surveyed down to the 
junction with the main sequence. And it is precisely when the data 
are meager that oversimplification is most tempting —and most 
treacherous. But, few as they are, these measures, by Baum, Arp, 
and Sandage, give a hint of a slight difference between the points 
of junction with the main sequence for the two clusters. The two 
may actually differ somewhat in age or history, for the pictures outlined by their variable stars differ too, as we shall see.

We can discern suggestive differences, not only between the 
main backbones of globular and galactic clusters, but also between 
those of individual galactic clusters. In some, the main sequence of 
stars runs up to tremendous luminosities, as in the twin Perseus 
clusters. In others, it seems to be shorn off — at high luminosities in 
the Pleaides, at lower brightness in the Hyades. Perhaps the highest 
point in a given cluster marks the stars that have exhausted their 
supplies. This idea, as will readily be seen, suggests that the great 
Perseus clusters are very young, the Pleaides not much older, and 
the Hyades-like clusters the oldest of the three. Perhaps it is no 
coincidence that the Hyades are the least compact and the least 
populous, the Perseus clusters the most concentrated and the richest, 
in the series.

Globular clusters, it will be remembered, are often rich in the 
rapidly vibrating RR Lyrae stars that are so characteristic of Population II, and seem to be strictly confined to that population. They 
contain also, in smaller numbers, the equally characteristic Population II variables of the so-called W Virginis and RV Tauri types, 
and a few —a very few — long-period variables. These pulsing stars 
in globular clusters have a family pattern all their own. They do not 

THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
conform to the main backbone of the Population II family, which 
runs from cool, moderately bright stars toward fainter ones of 
higher temperature, and meets the main sequence near to the 
luminosity and color of the sun. They lie on, or above, a less conspicuous branch of the family, which runs almost horizontally across 
the family portrait at a level that corresponds to about a hundred 
times the sun’s brightness. This branch contains some stars of high 
temperatures; a few, in fact, are actually hotter than main-sequence 
stars of similar brightness.

The RR Lyrae stars are confined to a limited domain of this 
horizontal branch; they are all very nearly of the same color and 
the same brightness. Therefore they must all be very nearly of the 
same size, though their periods of vibration range from about an 
hour and a half to almost a day. We may note in passing that this 
is a most remarkable fact. If the conventional rule, that the square 
of the period is inversely proportional to the mean density of a 
pulsating star, is valid for these RR Lyrae stars, the factor of 16 in 
the periods implies a factor of over 150 in mean density. We are 
fairly sure that these stars are all of about the same size, and (unless 
our simple period-density rule is at fault, which may quite possibly 
be the case) we can only attribute the large range in mean densities 
to an equally large variety among their masses. We do not know 
the mass of even one of the RR Lyrae stars; but as they are all of 
similar luminosity we can safely say, without knowing their actual 
masses, that some of them, at least, deviate from the mass-luminosity law. This, however, is a digression, to which we shall advert a 
little later, for other stars of Population II seem to depart from the 
usual relation between luminosity and mass.

The family pattern of the variable stars in globular clusters is 
our present concern. It was Martin Schwarzschild who made the 
important observation that RR Lyrae stars are found only within 
narrow limits of color and brightness, and this fact explains their 
total absence from some globular clusters, their presence by the 
hundred in others. For the horizontal branch of the family portrait 
may not run across at quite the same luminosity in all globular 
clusters. If it is present in a cluster, but does not cover the RR Lyrae 
domain, these stars will not appear in that particular cluster.


THE DRAMA 
The luminosity of the horizontal branch of the globular-cluster 
family portrait does differ slightly from one cluster to another, and 
so does its richness in stars other than the pulsating variables. In 
fact, the two globular clusters that have been surveyed down to the 
main sequence differ not only in the point of junction, but also in 
variable-star population and in the level of the horizontal branch.

Here is a possible index of the age and history of a globular cluster 
that is rich in possibilities, but it would be premature to expatiate 
on them. One can always put a straight line through two points; 
more data are needed before we can indulge ourselves in the luxuries of speculation.

The RR Lyrae stars are by far the commonest variables in globular clusters; the few W Virginis and RV Tauri stars are known, 
largely through the work of A. H. Joy, to be luminous yellow stars.

They show relations between behavior, color, luminosity, and period 
that are far more complicated than the familiar period-luminosity 
curve of the Cepheids. These variables in clusters are pulsating too, 
but their behavior is distinctively different from that of the Cepheids.

Variable stars in globular clusters have their well-known counterparts in Population II of the substratum of our galaxy. These luminous yellow variables “pulsate” in waves that pass off successively 
from the stellar surface; for a short time both waves can be seen 
at once, one through the other, as was discovered by R. F. Sanford 
at Mount Wilson. No Cepheid variable behaves in this manner; but 
the RR Lyrae stars (also of Population IT) do the same thing, as 
Sanford and Struve have both shown; in these stars the two rising 
waves coexist for a mere twenty minutes, and their detection was 
a great feat of observation.

The Cepheids, characteristic variable stars of Population I, have 
a simpler family pattern which is defined by the period-luminosity 
law. The most rapidly vibrating Cepheids rarely have periods of less 
than two days, in strong contrast to the 90-minute RR Lyrae stars.

The ascending pattern of luminosity with period rises to its greatest 
height for periods longer than those found for most Population II 
variables of comparable brightness.

I have placed the Cepheid variables in Population I: they share 
the rotary motion within the galaxy, and cling to the galactic plane.


THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
But not one Cepheid has been found in a galactic cluster. It is quite 
true that Cepheids are rare in our system of stars, but they are 
among the most luminous of stars, and a good portion of luminous 
stars are members of galactic clusters. Ambartsumian considers that 
the high proportion of 90 percent of all very luminous hot stars are 
members of what he calls associations, but he notes that Cepheids 
are absent from these groups. The same seems to be true even of 
the Magellanic Clouds, which are vastly richer than our own system 
in Cepheids: the Cepheid variables do not concentrate in the same 
districts as the dense knots of bright, hot stars and nebulosity.

If we hope to fit the Cepheid variables into the general pattern 
of Population I, we must conclude, I think, that they are somewhat 
older than the main-sequence stars of similar brightness in the galactic-cluster diagram that we took as the starting point for the 
family line-up of Population I. They are not associated with the very 
youngest groups.

Another observation goes to strengthen this view. The hot, bright 
stars outline the spiral arms of our galaxy, for they illuminate the 
bright nebulae by whose light Morgan has photographed the arms.

But the Cepheids are not confined to narrow arms. Their distribution 
appears to follow the curve of the arm, but instead of falling along a 
narrow line, they are spread into a wide band. The same impression 
is given by the bright Cepheids that were discovered by Hubble in 
the outer parts of the galaxy in Andromeda, which is in many ways 
so like our own. The Cepheids do not fall into narrow lines, as do 
the bright nebulae photographed by Baade, which look almost like 
beads on a string. The Cepheids may have been born in the narrow 
lanes, but they have lived long enough to move a small distance from 
them — not far enough to form a very thick layer in the central 
plane, but far enough to blur the sharp outline of the arm.

If the Cepheids of Population I transform gradually into the 
yellow variables of Population II, the route by which they travel 
eludes us. The only clue that we have is that (if they maintain similar luminosity during the transformation) they grow somewhat 
smaller with age. Perhaps in their final stages they derive some of 
their light from contraction, a suggestion that we shall meet for 
other stars later in the chapter.


THE DRAMA 
Between the Two Populations. — Another group of variable stars 
presents us with an unsolved mystery. These are the long-period 
variables, diffuse and large, of low density and low temperature, 
fainter than the brightest Cepheids or RV Tauri stars. They are not 
found in galactic clusters, and rarely (if ever) in globular clusters, 
so we must base our conclusions on their behavior within the galaxy.

In motion and in distribution they fall between the two populations; 
in fact, they fill the whole gap between them.

Here we clearly have stars in various stages of transition. The 
are the most interesting and the most puzzling group of all. One 
thing, however, they do bring home to us. The two populations are 
not sharply divided at all levels. We have seen that there is little 
division for the numerous, very faint stars; it is interesting that some 
of the least luminous variable stars show a blurring of the outlines 
too. But we must not forget that the RR Lyrae stars, which are no 
brighter than the long-period variables, are quite clearly confined to 
Population II.

Observed Changes of Stars. — So far we have merely taken two 
extreme types of stellar group portrait, and attempted to stretch 
the one to the shape of the other. Incidentally it will be noted that 
we have tacitly rubbed out the brightest stars of the first population, 
and left nothing but stars up to two thousand times as bright as the 
sun. We are not justified in distorting the facts, so to speak, in this 
way, or in throwing some out altogether, unless we can show that 
the nature of the stars themselves makes them capable of the 
corresponding changes.

Let us summarize the changes that we either observe stars to 
undergo, or suppose them to undergo.

If stars do indeed subsist on their own internal hydrogen, they 
must maintain their masses almost unaltered. For the whole 
of the hydrogen is not destroyed: it is frozen (if I may so speak of 
a process that takes place at 20 million degrees) into helium, and 
the total loss of mass is about 0.7 percent. Even if a star were all 
hydrogen, it would lose only this fraction by converting all its mass 
into helium. It follows that a star will always have essentially the 
same mass (so far as its nuclear consumption of hydrogen is concerned), and if it conforms to the mass-luminosity law throughout 

THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
its life, it will not only keep up its brightness, but will actually grow 
a little brighter with increasing mean molecular weight, as described in the first chapter. Therefore, so long as it is sustained by 
the carbon cycle or some similar hydrogen diet, and follows the 
mass-luminosity rule, it will keep on the same horizontal line in the 
conventional picture (Fig, 10) that shows brightness plotted against 
temperature or size, or will even rise a little above it.

If a star always keeps almost the same mass, and follows the 
mass-luminosity law, it will always, therefore, be of about the same 
brightness. On this assumption, once a bright star, always a bright 
star (until bankruptcy supervenes), and any permissible stretching 
or distortion of the family portrait will be horizontal or upward.

This statement presumes that the star is kept well stirred, so 
that new hydrogen atoms keep moving in to replace those that have 
been used up. A star that is not well stirred (and rotation very likely 
promotes stirring) may grow rather fainter and possibly cooler at 
the surface as time goes on — perhaps, in the end, much fainter.

So much for what we think a star can do. What are stars actually 
observed to be doing? Most spectacular, perhaps, is the throwing 
off of material. Rapidly spinning stars whirl off atoms from their 
surfaces, and the zones of glowing atoms can be seen around some 
eclipsing stars such as RW Tauri. For other stars, a growing number 
in fact, the spectroscope gives evidence of the ejection of atoms, 
sometimes in a steady shower, sometimes in spurts. These observations should give us no surprise when we remember the sun with 
its never-ending play of prominences, surges, spicules, and the like.

And we should not forget the more spectacular ejections, the cataclysms that tear off the whole surfaces of novae, following some 
explosive burst below the surface. The brilliant novae undergo 
these cataclysms perhaps once in a million years; but milder novae 
do so every decade or so, and the so-called dwarf novae repeat the 
process on a smaller scale every few weeks.

Have we here an example of rapid loss of mass that could displace the stars vertically on the diagram as well as horizontally? 
That matter is lost is a certainty; but when we measure it we find 
that the cataclysm falls very short of a catastrophe; at each burst 
the star loses perhaps one thousandth of its material. At the rate of 

THE DRAMA 
one outburst in a million years, we can see that a serious reduction 
in weight would need an interval not very different from the interval 
since the time horizon. The novae, besides, are rather exceptional 
stars, at least from our insular standpoint as members of Population 
I. Their distribution, and perhaps their motions, place them in 
Population II, and between outbursts they have much in common 
with the subdwarfs. I suspect that they have taken a long time to 
get to their present stage.

We have learned to think that Population I is old, and perhaps 
the novae represent the final struggles of stars that are well on their 
way to bankruptcy. They still possess a certain amount of hydrogen, 
at least on their surfaces, so they are not completely down and out, 
though they may have less within. But perhaps each outburst marks 
a step on the downward path; they may suffer explosions of smaller 
and smaller intensity, and at progressively shorter intervals, and 
move in the process from normal novae to recurrent nova, finally to 
end as dwarf novae with a mild outburst every few weeks. As to 
what happens after that I should not hazard a guess.

There are, however, explosions of quite another order, that seem 
to be real stellar catastrophes —the supernovae, which literally 
commit suicide, and blow most of their substance violently into 
space. The remains of one such stellar catastrophe are to be seen 
today, still scattering into space. The remains of the star are still 
there, apparently a white dwarf—the Crab Nebula (Plate 27), 
debris of the supernova explosion observed in a.p. 1054. Supernovae 
must fit into the pattern in quite a different place from ordinary 
novae. They are rare — perhaps one in a galaxy in several centuries; 
only one star in ten thousand in our own system would (on this basis ) 
have been a supernova since the time horizon. Supernovae, then, 
cannot be our only source of white dwarfs, for probably there are 
well over a hundred times as many white dwarfs as this in our stellar 
system.

It is certain that many stars, from novae down, are steadily or 
spasmodically throwing off material into space. But it hardly looks 
as if they are throwing it off in quantities great enough to displace 
them very much in the group picture. They move downward a 
little as they spill and splutter; but they can hardly move far.


THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
How about the opposite possibility, that stars are picking up 
material as they move through space, feeding on the interstellar 
dust and gas? It is possible for a star to do exactly this, but the conditions have to be just right. If a star is too hot it will blow the 
potential food away; if it is moving too fast it will miss the feast. A 
fair estimate is that a star must be more massive than the sun, not 
too hot, and stay within a dense cloud for at least ten million years, 
if it is to pick up an appreciable amount of interstellar food. Probably not many stars fulfill these conditions, and I doubt whether the 
consumption of dust and smoke is an important factor in increasing 
the masses of stars, and therefore causing them to move upward in 
the diagram.

Nutrition of Red Giants. — Are there any unknown nuclear processes that might sustain the stars, in addition to the consumption 
of hydrogen? There are several possible ones, such as subsistence on 
lithium, beryllium, and boron, and these would go forward at low 
temperatures, which, as we shall see, would make things easier for 
the giants (or at least for astronomers trying to understand the 
giants! ). But the trouble with these processes is a scarcity of materials. They could not possibly sustain the stars for very long.

Stellar infants probably feed on them for a time. But for a steady 
stellar diet, hydrogen is the only one among the atoms that fills the 
bill, for the simple reason that almost all the universe is made of 
hydrogen.

The problem of nutrition of the red-giant stars is particularly 
acute. It hinges on the rather technical question of the stars’ internal 
structure. If the red giants are built like the stars of the main sequence, their internal temperatures (which depend on the ratio of 
mass to radius) must be fairly low, too low to actuate the carbon 
cycle that consumes hydrogen. The proton-proton reaction might 
serve, but it has other problems, and the question is still sub judice.

Is there any way of releasing energy within red giants? 
There are two schools of thought (and each has its own ramifications) on this knotty question. The supporters of one seek to “fix 
up” the centers of the giant stars in various ways so that they will 
have the necessary high temperatures; and to some extent the trick 
can be done, though no one has yet succeeded in imagining a model 

THE DRAMA 
that will keep the extreme red supergiants going. Another school is 
beginning to turn back to the contraction hypothesis that was devised over fifty years ago to account for the sun’s continued vigor.

The sun is a star of low mass; perhaps a more massive star, which 
has therefore more available gravitational energy, might be able to 
sustain itself on contraction for longer periods. The variable stars, 
for example, may perhaps be contracting. Of the two sequences of 
variable stars, characteristic of Populations I and II, the members 
of the second sequence, at the same luminosity, are about one fourth 
the size of those of the first. We do not know how a star that was 
subsisting partly on contraction would feel about the mass-luminosity law, and quite possibly the variable stars do not conform to it.

We have no measure of the mass of a periodic variable star, and their 
unique behavior suggests that they differ in some definite way from 
other stars of similar brightness. Contraction might conceivably be 
associated with pulsation. But one thing is sure: if these stars are 
contracting, they are doing so very slowly, or their periods would 
be changing noticeably. Certainly the RR Lyrae stars are undergoing some interesting internal adjustments, for they are all of the 
same brightness and the same size, though their densities (if we 
are to trust the well-known relation of period to density ) must differ 
by a large factor, as we saw earlier.

If contraction is to supply a star with energy for an appreciable 
time, it must reduce the interior to the condition of a white dwarf.

Thus a developing giant may finally reach the supernova stage, and 
a final explosion lay bare the degenerate core.

The problem of red-giant stars is somewhat clarified when we 
realize that there are giants and giants. The aura of high-luminosity 
red supergiants about the twin Perseus clusters must be a group of 
extremely youthful stars. We have seen reason to think these clusters 
very young, and their huge red members may be true spendthrifts 
of small life expectancy.

The large, diffuse Population I stars, such as Aldebaran and 
Capella, have longer life expectancies, but still not very long. Capella “conforms” to the mass-luminosity relation, and its life expectancy, at the present rate of expenditure, is seen from Table 1 
to be 20 million years.


THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
But the large red stars that head the backbone of the family 
portrait of a globular cluster are a very different problem. If we are 
right in supposing that such a family group is very old, how have 
these red stars survived, and what has kept them going? Even if 
their structure can be adjusted to meet the requirements of the 
carbon cycle, their life expectancies are only of the same order as 
that of Capella, if their masses dictate their luminosities in the usual 
manner, And this interval is shorter than the supposed age of a 
globular cluster by a factor of ten at least.

Let it be admitted at once that the spectra of the bright, cool 
stars in globular clusters (so far as the very difficult problem of recording them has been resolved) are definitely not similar to those 
of Population I stars of similar color and brightness. The chemical 
composition of the Population IT stars seems to differ significantly, 
and perhaps they actually do contain less hydrogen, a sign of partial 
exhaustion of food supply.

Even more important information is given by the few highvelocity stars (which are therefore members of Population II) that 
are red giants, and are probably comparable to the red giants of 
globular clusters. We saw in Chapter 6 that Arcturus, best-known 
of these stars, is underluminous. It does not conform to the massluminosity law, and its life expectancy is correspondingly increased.

The figure given in Table 1 for Arcturus, 50 million years, is not 
large enough to stretch to the time horizon, but it is a move in 
that direction. Other high-velocity red giants seem to be underluminous also, as was discovered by Keenan. Perhaps the bright red 
stars in globular clusters are all more massive than their luminosities, and the mass-luminosity law, would lead us to expect.

If the bright stars in globular clusters are underluminous, they 
not only receive an increased lease of life, but they suggest a 
possible answer to the question what becomes of the bright supergiants of Population I? Galactic clusters, as we have seen, do not 
contain only main-sequence stars. Many contain red giants, and in 
each cluster the red giants seem to lie at about the level in the family 
portrait at which the main sequence comes to an end in the upward 
direction. Are we witnessing the beginning of progress toward a 
population of red-giant stars? Possibly the red giants in the Hyades 

THE DRAMA 
have larger masses than their brightness indicates. Perhaps they 
represent steps taken by stars such as Rigel or the bright members 
of the Pleiades as bankruptcy approaches — first steps that will ultimately carry them to the head of a family of Population II.

They may be sustained by a combination of declining nuclear processes and contraction, with contraction finally assuming the major 
role.

After this brief survey of the possible processes that can change 
stars, let me summarize my own opinion by saying that loss of mass 
by ejection, or gain of mass by feeding on interstellar matter, can 
be important only for very few stars, and are not a major factor in 
general stellar development. The consumption of hydrogen, and 
the ultimate exhaustion of the supply, are the main causes of stellar 
change; for the red giants neither the study of special models nor 
that of the possibilities of contraction have gone far enough to lead 
to a definite conclusion, but some red giants may exist for cosmically 
long intervals if they become underluminous and draw energy from 
contraction. From this point of view, the course of stellar development is determined at the very outset; the stars start out with essentially the masses that they are to have through life, and more 
small stars are born than large ones.

The Birth of a Star.—So we come back to the problem of the 
birth of stars. The ideas of stellar origins are converging in the same 
way as the ideas of the origin of the solar system. Gone is the picture 
of fifty years ago, when we thought of the earth as the child of the 
sun; now we see her as the sun’s small sister. We took the development of galaxies back to the primeval eddies of gas, and I think that 
the stars must have formed as part of the same process from dust 
and grains within the gas. This, I imagine, is why the oldest members of the stellar system (as I suppose the globular clusters to be) 
are so large and populous, for the available material was richer then.

As the layer of dust and gas sank toward the galactic plane, stars 
continued to form. Dust and gas still lie dense in a thin layer, and 
stars are still being formed there. The motions of the dust, its density, and the light of the stars nearby, all determine whether a star 
will form. Probably the birth of a star, from dust to luminescence, 
takes about a million years.


THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
What are these primitive stars like? They must contract into 
globes, slowly at first, but with increasing speed, until at last they 
heat up rapidly, the temperature within rises to the level of nuclear 
cookery, and the star becomes a star. If we are to look for such stars, 
we must search the thin layer in the galactic plane for stars that are 
hot, with envelopes in violent motion. Are the Wolf-Rayet stars 
the newborn? They cling to the galactic plane; they people the 
spiral arms. They are particularly common in the younger Magellanic Cloud, the Large one; they fit the other conditions.

But there is another place where we see stars that may well be 
in the birth process. Within some of the large, dark nebulae, such 
as those in Taurus and Orion, we see peculiar stars, surrounded by 
streaks of luminous gas, that may be stars in process of formation.

There seem too many of them to be chance travelers passing through 
the cloud and picking up matter as they go, though some astronomers prefer that explanation. In any case, when we look at the 
established stellar population, we cannot deny that small, faint 
stars must have been formed in the greatest numbers.

What will be the adventures of the newborn star? The chances 
are that it will be rotating, because eddies must have assisted at 
its birth. Some theories of stellar development hinge on this rotation, which they see as leading ultimately to the stars’ splitting in 
two — perhaps in several steps that lead to a multiple system such 
as that of Castor. Because the enormous majority of stars are double, 
no picture of evolution is satisfactory unless it accounts for the 
stellar preference for company. If most stars were formed by the 
splitting of rapidly spinning primitive stars, this condition would 
be met; and it is very significant that the bright, hot stars are spinning the fastest (and spinning almost without exception), whereas 
stars like the sun, and fainter, have very little rotation, unless they 
are members of close pairs.

Another advantage of the idea that newly formed stars spin 
rapidly, and divide, is that it provides a way of moving them down 
the main sequence. The mass-luminosity law states that the luminosity is proportional to a little over the cube of the mass. So if a 
star splits into two equal halves, and both continue to conform to 
the law, each will have only one eighth of the brightness of the 

THE DRAMA 
original star. If the process were repeated several times the resulting stars might be distributed in widely different parts of the main 
sequence, like the components of Castor.

Strange Bedfellows among the Stars.— But the matter is not 
quite so simple. This explanation will not account for Sirius. The 
companion weighs less than Sirius, and if (as seems likely) it has 
always weighed less, it should be less far along the road to bankruptcy, instead of having arrived there. One may speculate that it 
was originally formed from matter that was very low in hydrogen.

This picture of the formation of the Sirius system suggests that 
Sirius and its companion were never one; they were formed together 
out of material of nonuniform composition. Another school of 
thought than the one that derives binary stars from splitting supposes that double stars were not formed from the division of a single 
one, but were born together at the same time from the interstellar 
dust. This view has something to commend it; nobody can suppose, 
for instance, that a star cluster was formed from the fission of a 
rotating star; and some systems like that of Sirius almost seem to 
require individual origins. But I do not think that the evidence on 
the prevalent rotation of the bright, hot stars, and the virtual disappearance of rotation for stars a little fainter than Sirius, coupled 
with the large numbers of binary stars that are almost in contact, 
can be explained except by splitting.

There is another possible route by which Sirius and its companion may have reached their present stages. If the Sirius system was 
once a pair like Algol, or even like Zeta Aurigae (Fig. 7), it consisted of a main-sequence star and a star of smaller life expectancy.

The red component of Algol, if it resembles those of similar unlike stellar twins, is probably overluminous. Many Algol-like pairs 
certainly have this peculiarity, as Struve has emphasized. Perhaps 
Sirius B has reached white-dwarfdom because it was a spendthrift: 
its luminosity was out of proportion to its mass (as anticipated from 
the mass-luminosity “law”), and it exhausted its supply before its 
main-sequence companion. This suggestion is not an explanation, 
for it leaves us with another problem: what is the history of a system 
that contains one normal and one overluminous star? Struve has 
made the suggestion that such pairs are newly formed and have 

THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
not had the time to “settle down.” But though our idea does not 
provide a fundamental explanation, it suggests how we can derive 
one type of system from another known type of system, so that two 
problems are potentially reduced to one.

Perhaps we are coming to the belief that the mass-luminosity 
relation is primarily a characteristic of main-sequence stars. Most 
double stars, whose masses can be measured, are members of this 
sequence. Some, at least, of the subgiants, as well as some supergiants, are overluminous; some Population IT stars are underluminous. It is only too likely that in our quest for regularity we have 
oversimplified the relation between luminosity and mass, and have 
thus overlooked some of the deviations that hold the key to our 
problem. Most of the stars that we know to be overluminous — 
diffuse components of Algol stars, and components of W Ursae 
Majoris systems (dwarf twins) — are members of close pairs, which 
is a mark of relative youth. The W Ursae Majoris stars are also 
spinning very rapidly, another character that we are beginning to 
associate with recent origin. And the suspicion is arising (though 
on more slender evidence, for we have no direct knowledge of their 
masses) that bright Population II stars tend to be underluminous.

Possibly overluminosity is a characteristic of very young stars, and 
underluminosity of very old ones. But other factors, as yet incompletely understood, must modify such a tendency. Mass, rotation, 
internal structure, and original composition must be involved, and 
they are probably interconnected also.

A Possible Course for Stellar Development.— Let me end by 
sketching the development of stars, a highly personal view. They 
are formed from the interstellar dust, the majority small at birth, a 
few large, a very few enormous. The protostars contract rapidly, 
heat up, and begin to shine, most of them as main-sequence stars.

The youthful stars, born of dust within the eddying gas, and played 
upon by localized radiations of other stars, come into being with a 
tendency to rotation. Those that rotate rapidly undergo division 
(perhaps in the prestellar stage, perhaps after they have already 
begun to shine), and distribute themselves along the main sequence.

All these stars are of the same structure, but the heavier ones are 
rather hotter at the center. They proceed to consume their hydrogen, 

THE DRAMA 
each at the rate prescribed by its mass. The population resembles 
that of a galactic cluster.

As the brighter stars use up their hydrogen and go toward exhaustion, they move off the main sequence toward the right if they 
are not rotating, and are therefore poorly mixed. At the same time 
they begin to build up large envelopes, and become giant stars, 
which may gradually decline in luminosity, and ultimately line up 
as the giant sequence of the globular-cluster population (Population 
II). The variable stars are somehow involved in this transition, but 
I confess I do not know what distinguishes them from the nonvariable red giants. They seem to be uniformly brighter, color for 
color, and this must reflect some difference, but whether of structure 
or composition I should not like to guess. I suspect that the variable 
stars of Population I are the ancestors of those of Population II, but 
the huge number of RR Lyrae stars in the latter needs explaining, 
and I am not sure that the observed number of Cepheids is in 
harmony with the idea. However, it is very interesting to notice 
that the Small Magellanic Cloud (which, as we have seen, seems 
older than the Large) contains great numbers of Cepheids of very 
short period, perhaps on their way to becoming RR Lyrae stars.

For every few stars that move to the right and become giants, 
probably some move slightly to the left, and in time become subdwarfs, poorer in hydrogen than the main sequence, and typical 
of Population II. These stars, at least some of them, are probably 
the stars that finally become novae, and propel themselves down the 
subdwarf sequence with diminishing outbursts at shortening intervals. The final end of these stars should be the white-dwarf stage.

It is interesting that most of the white dwarfs that are members of 
binaries have faint red. stars as companions. A few known white 
dwarfs that are coupled with brighter main-sequence stars such as 
Sirius and Procyon, or even with red-giant variables such as Mira 
Ceti, represent a different problem.

The theoretical astronomers have shown convincingly that only 
stars less massive than about one-and-a-half times the sun are able 
to reach the white-dwarf stage. A heavier star that exhausts its 
supply of hydrogen must presumably find another way out. Possibly 
the outburst of a supernova represents the liquidation of such a star.


THE EVOLUTION OF THE STARS 
Such is the highly personalized picture. I am only too conscious 
that it is out of drawing, that the chiaroscuro is improperly treated, 
and that I have laid the color on too thickly in some places and 
neglected others. I have at least made a crude attempt at naturalism, and have striven to avoid the influence of the nonobjective 
school that relies on theories of what ought to be, rather than on the 
observation of what is.

A final question: where is it all headed? What will be the ultimate fate of the stellar universe? I can look forward with some 
pleasure to a world of symmetrical, structureless, elliptical galaxies, 
pure Population II. Long after that, perhaps, will come pure whitedwarf population for the less massive stars, enlivened by sporadic 
supernovae as the more massive stars pass to their rest. One thing 
seems clear. Such a universe cannot be rejuvenated. The white 
dwarfs are in a blind alley; their material is truly degenerate; they 
cannot even solidify. If the imagined conditions at the beginning 
are beyond conception, so are those at the end — but in a different 
way. Fortunately it is far in the future, further than the time horizon 
of the past. Perhaps we are wrong in thinking that it can happen at 
all. Science has a long way to go yet.

Awake, awake! The world is young 
For all its weary years of thought.

The starkest fights must still be fought, 
The most surprising songs be sung.
